

UNITED STATES
NAVAL INSTITUTE
P R O CE E DINGS
Vol. No. 51, No. 8
AUGUST, 1925
WHOLE No. 270
1319
VY
..............
1398
Contents
Flying Over the Polar Sea. By LIEUTENANT COMMANDER
RICHARD E. BYRD, JR., U. S. N., Rer. .........
FINDING GEOGRAPHICAL POSITION IN THE REGION OF THE
North POLE. By G. W. LITTLEHALES .....
1339
NATIONAL STRATEGY. By LIEUTENANT COMMANDER H. H.
Frost, U. S. NAVY .................... ........... 1343
NOTES ON ADMINISTRATION OF INDUSTRIAL WORK IN Navy
YARDS. BY CAPTAIN HENRY WILLIAMS (CC), U. S. N. 1391
SUBMARINE CAPABILITIES AND LIMITATIONS. BY LIEUTEN-
ANT WILDER D. BAKER, U. S. Navy ..
The SALVAGE OF "S-19." By COMMANDER ROBERT B. Hil-
LIARD (CC), U. S. NAVY .......
1408
How the Navy HELPED THEM HOME, BY LIEUTENANT
(jg) F. V. BARKER, U. S. Navy .........
1415
THE SELECTION AND USE OF BINOCULARS. BY ENSIGN
ALAN R. McCRACKEN, U. S. Navy ................
The Dacia DILEMMA. By Rear ADMIRAL Richard WAIN-
WRIGHT, U. S. Navy, RET. .......
1452
A BACHELOR LOOKS AT THE NAVY PAY BILLS. BY LIEU-
TENANT HARRY A. ROCHESTER, U. S. Navy...........
Honi Here's War of 1845 in New ZEALAND. BY MAJOR
Edwin N. MCCLELLAN, U. S. Marine Corps......... 1459
The ARMY INDUSTRIAL COLLEGE. BY CAPTAIN ELLIOT
Snow (CC), U. S. Navy.........
1469
POWELL'S "PERRY'S VICTORY ON LAKE Erie.” BY CHARLES
LEE Lewis, Assistant PROFESSOR, U. S. N. A. .. 1473
The Pacific ZONE. BY SIR HERBERT RUSSELL...... 1480
DISCUSSION ........
1489
PROFESSIONAL NOTES ..
1499
NOTES ON INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS...
1563
BOOK REVIEWS .....
SECRETARY'S NOTES ..........
............. 1570
The writers only are responsible for the contents of their respective articles
1446
1455
......................
1500
.
Editor, Captain H. A. Baldridge; Assistant Editor, Lieutenant Com.
mander R. S. Field.
Copyright, 1925, by U. S. Naval Institute.
Published monthly at 450 Ahnaip St., Menasha, Wis.
Executive, Editorial, and Business Offices, U. S. Naval Institute,
Annapolis, Md.
Entered as second-class matter at the post-office at Menasha, Wis.,
April 4, 1922, and at the post-office at Annapolis, Md., under Act of Aug. 24,
1912. Acceptance for mailing at the special rate of postage provided for
in section 1103, Act of Oct. 3, 1919, authorized
Membership dues (including Proceedings), $3.00 a year.
Subscription Rates, $5.00 a year. (Foreign postage extra.) Single
copies, 50c.


  p. 1318 (#232)                      #

OFFICERS OF THE INSTITUTE
President
REAR ADMIRAL HENRY B. WILSON, U. S. Navy
Vice-President
REAR ADMIRAL RICHARD H. JACKSON, U. S. NAVY
Secretary-Treasurer
CAPTAIN H. A. BALDRIDGE, U. S. Navy
Board of Control
REAR ADMIRAL HENRY B. WILSON, U. S. Navy (ex officio)
Rear ADMIRAL RICHARD H. JACKSON, U. S. Navy (ex officio)
BRIGADIER GENERAL GEORGE RICHARDS, U. S. MARINE CORPS
CAPTAIN W. T. CLUVERIUS, U. S. Navy
CAPTAIN W. G. DUBOSE, (CC), U. S. Navy
CAPTAIN P. B. DUNGAN, U. S. Navy
COMMANDER BYRON MCCANDLESS. U. S. Navy
LIEUTENANT COMMANDER W. G. GREENMAN, U. S. Navy
CAPTAIN H. A. BALDRIDGE, U. S. Navy (ex officio)
PAST PRESIDENTS
ADMIRAL DAVID D. PORTER, U. S. Navy, 1873
REAR ADMIRAL JOHN L. WORDEN, U. S. Navy, 1874
REAR ADMIRAL C. R. P. RODGERS, U. S. Navy, 1875-78
COMMODORE FOXHALL A. PARKER, U. S. Nayy, 1878-79
REAR ADMIRAL JOHN RODGERS, U. S. Navy, 1879-82
REAR ADMIRAL C. R. P. RODGERS, U. S. Navy, 1882-83
REAR ADMIRAL THORNTON A. JENKINS, U. S. Navy, 1883-85
Rear ADMIRAL EDWARD SIMPSON, U. S. Navy, 1885-87
REAR ADMIRAL STEPHEN B. LÚCE, U. S. Navy, 1887-98
REAR ADMIRAL WM. T. SAMPSON, U. S. Navy, 1898-1902
REAR ADMIRAL H. C. TAYLOR, U. S. Navy, 1902-04
REAR ADMIRAL C. F. GOODRICH, U. S. Navy, 1904-09
REAR ADMIRAL RICHARD WAINWRIGHT, U. S. Navy, 1909-11
Rear ADMIRAL BRADLEY A. FISKE, U. S. Navy, 1911-23
REAR ADMIRAL WILLIAM L. RODGERS, U. S. Navy, 1923-24


  p. 1318 (#233)                      #



  p. 1318 (#234)                      #


80°
Peary, April 6, 1909
85°
85°
North Pole
NE X PLO
R
E
D
hoan
Directions in which planes
Wilt explore
REGION Cape Corumbieren
OOOO
bondoo
ODOO
Hubbard
ERE 1
0000
LOFALASKA
HARCTIC
CIR
0
N
HU (
THE MACMILLAN ARCTIC EXPEDITION
UNDER THE AUSPICES OF
THE NATIONAL GEOGRAPHIC SOCIET
Wauwe
......... Route of Ships
111. Route of Planes to Establish Airplane Ba
000000 Proposed Routes of Exploration Flights
0. 100 200 300 400 500
STATUTE MILES
Drawn in Map Dept. of The National Geographic Society
120°
110°
100°
Published by courtesy National Geographic Society, Washington, D. C.


  p. 1319 (#235)                      #

UNITED STATES
NAVAL INSTITUTE
PRO CE E DI N GS
Vol. No. 51, No. 8
AUGUST, 1925
Whole No. 270
FLYING OVER THE POLAR SEA
By Lieut. COMDR. RICHARD E. BYRD, JR., U.S.N., Ret.
Editor's Note: The following article was written by Lieutenant Com-
mander Byrd on board ship while making passage from Wiscasset, Maine,
to Sydney, Nova Scotia, and mailed to the U. S. Naval Institute just
prior to the departure of the expedition from Sydney for Etah. It is,
therefore, the last written account of the proposed flying operations over
the Polar Sea by a member of the expedition. This article, although writ-
ten exclusively for the PROCEEDINGS, was made possible by the courtesy of
the National Geographic Society.
W H EN Admiral Robert E. Peary, in 1906, made his farthest
westward trip to Axel Heiberg Land and the western part
of Grant Land, he twice thought he saw from the shores
of the Polar Sea the summits of a high land. The first time he
saw it was from the top of Cape Colgate, 2,000 feet above the sea
level. Of this experience Peary wrote: “North stretched the
well-known ragged surface of the polar pack, and northwest, it
was with a thrill that my glasses revealed the faint white summits
of a distant land which my eskimos claimed to have seen as we
came along from the last camp.” Again he saw this land from
Cape Thomas Hubbard. “I could make out,” he wrote, "appar-
ently a little more distantly the snow clad summits of the distant
land in the northwest, above the ice horizon.” Peary called this
land Crocker Land. Eight years later Dr. Donald MacMillan
went out 150 miles over the Polar Sea toward that land but he
never reached it. In his book he refers as follows to his experi-
.ence one hundred miles out from the shore: “There could be no


  p. 1320 (#236)                      #


5 NAVY
Naval Aircraft Factory
NavAL ARCTIC PLANE No. I


  p. 1321 (#237)                      #

1925)
1321
Flying Over the Polar Sea
doubt about it. Great heavens! What a land! Hills, valleys,
snow capped peaks extending through at least 120 degrees of the
horizon.” He went on fifty miles further and the land got no
closer, so he decided that it was a mirage and mirage it seems to be.
But, between Point Barrow, Cape Columbia and the North Pole
there lie one million square miles of unexplored region and there
are indications that within that area there is land. For example,
at Point Barrow, Alaska, the food stream of the tide should come
from the north if this million square miles were but a deep polar
basin. The times and ranges of the semi-daily tide from the
Greenland coast to the Alaskan coast also indicate that there is
land in the Polar Sea. Another indication is the great age of the
ice found in Beaufort Sea.
At any rate, the mission of the Naval Arctic Aviation Unit is
to co-operate with the MacMillan expedition in the exploration of
some of this vast region. The expedition is going under the
auspices of the greatest geographic society in the world, the Na-
tional Geographic Society which publishes the National Geographic
Magazine. It is sending along for scientific investigation an
ichthyologist and a geologist and the naval unit includes in its per-
sonnel an aerologist.
TYPES OF PLANES USED
The Navy has assigned three Loening amphibian airplanes to
this expedition. They have been designated the NA-1, NA-2, and
NA-3. It is a new type of plane designed and built by Mr. Grover
Loening. Only four of this particular type have been turned out.
The Army got the first one and would have received the next three
had not General Patrick generously given the Navy priority of de-
livery on them for this Arctic expedition. In order to get the
propeller forward on this amphibian it became necessary, due to
a protruding pontoon, to keep it high by inverting the Liberty
motor. It is interesting to note that on account of the cooling
system the inverted Liberty develops a little more power than the
upright Liberty.
The wheels are raised and lowered by an electric motor and they
can also be moved by a hand crank, in case the battery gives out.
The pontoon extends several feet beyond the propeller and makes
a satisfactory seaplane when the wheels are up. The plane is


  p. 1322 (#238)                      #


A-6921
U.S. NAVY
Naval Aircraft Factory
LOENING AMPHIBIAN, 34 REAR VIEW


  p. 1323 (#239)                      #

1925)
1323
Flying Over the Polar Sea
practically all metal with the exception of the fuselage bracing
and the wing covering. The whole machine is compact and
strongly built. Its wing spread is forty-five feet and length
thirty-three feet. It is a two-place machine with controls both in
the forward and after cockpits.
With an extra gasoline tank, two pilots, navigation equipment,
rifle and ammunition, and a month and a half supply of food
aboard, she is capable of making about one thousand miles if the
take-off is from the land. That is a splendid performance for an
amphibian. With the same equipment aboard she could take off
from the water with sufficient fuel for about seven hundred miles
flight.
Bases
The S.S. Peary and S.S. Bowdoin, which are conveying the am-
phibians and the pilots and mechanics into the Arctic, will base
somewhere neår Etah, 713 miles from the North Pole. There is
no land landing field at Etah. It will, therefore, be necessary to
look up and down the Greenland coast until a suitable field is
found. It would be dangerous to base the planes in the water,
due to the drifting ice in Smith's Sound. There are periods when
the water may be clear of ice, but no one can predict when the ice
will begin to descend. The planes would be crushed in between
the floes.
The Puary is only !34 feet long and there was some difficulty
in getting the planes and equipment aboard. The planes are stowed
astern, close together, with the wings removed. They cannot be
erected 0:1 the ship, due to lack of space, and it would be very diffi-
cult to put the wings on in the water, not to speak of the danger
of drifting ice. An endeavor, therefore, will be made to find a
beach so that two wingless planes can be put overboard, lashed
together and towed ashore. Without the wings or other support,
a plane in the water would, of course, upset. When the beach is
reached the wheels could be lowered and the planes pulled onto
the land by their propellers. There is such a beach twenty miles
sốuth of E:ah. With the two planes off the ship the wings could
be placed on the third plane on the ship and she could take off
from the vater and land at the land base. The advantage of the
amphibiou,: quality of these planes is clear..


  p. 1324 (#240)                      #


S. S. “PEARY” WITH THE THREE PLANES ABOARD. WINGS DISMANTLED

S. S. “PEARY" WITH WINGS IN Boxes


  p. 1325 (#241)                      #

1925)
1325
Flying Over the Polar Sea
After the first base is formed on land, practice Alights will be
made for the following purposes :
1. To give each motor ten or fifteen hours flying (including
what they have already had), so as to get as many as possible of
the kinks out of it before the actual expedition is started. There
is no reason why the inverted Liberty should not be as reliable as
the upright Liberty, but, like all new things, it has had many kinks
to overcome. The Naval Aircraft Factory took out most of these
troubles, which, in the short time allotted, was very remarkable.
The factory worked day and night, and had the Navy had no such
institution available, this polar project would have been impossible
this year.
2. To test out radio communication and radio compass bearings.
3. To investigate landing conditions toward Axel Heiberg Land
and Cape Columbia. (See frontispiece) Cape Columbia is to the
northward of Etah and is 413 miles from the pole. To go there
the flying would be over water and ice and there will probably be
landing places along the route in the water in the inlets along the
irregular coast lines. To get to Axel Heiberg Land there will
be rugged land and some fjords to Ay over. It is thought that the
base on the shores of the Polar Sea probably will be formed at
one of the above-mentioned places—the one that affords the best
landing facilities en route. We know that there are landing places
at Cape Columbia and Cape Thomas Hubbard, Axel Heiberg
Land.
It would not seem wise to load the planes to the limit for the
character of work that lies ahead of the naval unit because to make
the proper speed the motors would have to be opened up to such an
extent as would lessen their reliability. Therefore, the most prac-
tical way to accomplish the mission of the unit is to form an inter-
mediate base half way between the surface ships and the base on
the Polar Sea; in other words, to work gradually toward the ob-
jective rather than make spectacular dashes with overloads.
The distances from Etah (the ship base) to the following points
are approximately as follows: to the pole, seven hundred miles; to
Cape Columbia or Cape Hubbard, three hundred miles; therefore
it is seen that if the naval plane unit succeeds in establishing a base
on the Polar Sea, and an intermediate base between it and the ship
base (Etah), the planes will at all times be not more than seventy-


  p. 1326 (#242)                      #

1326
[Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
five miles from some one of the three bases while the preparatory
work is being carried out before flights are made over the Polar
Sea. At each of these bases will be food, engine fuel, supplies
and fire arms. The base on the Polar Sea should have, in addition
to the above: a radio operator, radio outfit, one eskimo, sleeping
bags and one small tent. The success of the establishment of such
an intermediate base should have military significance, in that it
will have been demonstrated that small plane bases can be located
by amphibian planes.
RADIO
Every effort has been made by the Navy to insure getting two-
way communication from plane to plane and between the planes
and the two bases—the ships and the base on the Polar Sea. The
planes now have installed on them both high and low frequency,
the former supplied by the Zenith Radio Corporation of Chicago
and the latter, standard navy sets. For the flights out over the
Polar Sea one plane probably will be equipped with a high fre-
quency set and the other with the low frequency. The third plane
will be held in reserve at the Polar Sea base. This plane, of course,
will also be equipped with radio. The radio set at the Polar Sea
base will not be powerful enough to transmit radio bearings direct
to the planes, so they will be sent to the base ships (Etah) which
will relay to the planes their bearings from the Polar Sea base
It is doubtful that entire dependence for navigating can be placed
upon these bearings. The high frequency set has the advantage
that if down and not smashed the plane can still send messages
back to the bases. Though the low frequency sets cannot send
from the ground they have the advantage of being standard
equipment and, hence, thoroughly known.
It is common knowledge that it is very difficult to get radio
messages through during daylight. Of course, the naval unit
will be operating in the Arctic during that time of yeir when the
sun does not set. As high frequency sets are the only ones that
can get through during daylight the expedition has been supplied
with them and it is hoped that the Peary and the Bowdoin can
at all times keep in touch with the Navy Department. That,
however, cannot be guaranteed.. . . . .


  p. 1327 (#243)                      #


GREEN LA
ONS
HYDROGRAPHIC OFFICE'S LINE OF VARIATION CHART


  p. 1328 (#244)                      #


our phil Pole
GREEN
TIE
C REGIONS
CHART MADE UPON SUGGESTION OF THE HON. CURTIS D. WILBUR, SECRETARY
OF THE NAVY, SHOWING MAGNETIC Dip CIRCLES AND LINES OF MAGNETIC
FORCE DRAWN WITHOUT REGARD TO THE GEOGRAPHICAL POLE


  p. 1329 (#245)                      #

1925)
1329
Flying Over the Polar Sea
NavigaTION
Navigating a plane over the North Polar Sea presents some in-
teresting problems. The Magnetic Pole lies on Boothia Peninsula
about twelve hundred miles south of the geographic pole and the
part of the unexplored region over which the naval unit expects
to fly lies between the two poles. Consequently, variations as
high as 180 degrees will be encountered. The exact amount of
this variation, however, cannot be known except by actual observa-
tions. The Navy's Hydrographic Office has constructed a “Line
of Variation' chart of the polar regions for the naval unit, but
these theoretical values may be in error as much as ten or fifteen
degrees..
To add to the difficulties of the dead-reckoning navigation the
ordinary magnetic compass will probably not be dependable in a
plane, due to the weakness of the horizontal component of the
earth's magnetism in that region. For example, Washington,
D. C., has a seven times greater component of horizontal force
than there is in the region over which the naval unit is to fly.
There is more of a tendency, of course, for the compass needle to
swing in an airplane than there is in a surface ship. One of
Amundsen's aides reported that the ordinary magnetic compass
was of little use even as far from the Magnetic Pole as Spitzber-
gen. However, this question can be settled only by actual trial.
It would have been unwise, therefore, to take airplanes into
the Arctic putting entire dependence upon the magnetic compass.
A sun pelorus made by Kelvin and Wilfrid O. White Company
has been procured. This instrument is set for the local apparent
time, declination, and latitude of a place, and the true course is
shown on a dial by a shadow thrown by a shadow pin. To steer
a course with this instrument, however, would require calculations
and a resetting of it at intervals, due to the changing azimuth of
the sun. It became advisable, then, to construct a similar instru-
ment with a twenty-four-hour clock so that the shadow could be
made to follow the hands of the clock and do away with the ne-
cessity of repeatedly resetting the dials. Mr. Bumstead, of the
National Geographic Society, was requested to construct this
compass, which he did in a very short time, working day and night.
The first instrument was successful and Dr. Grosvenor then took
him off from all work for the society so that he could give his ex-


  p. 1330 (#246)                      #


KELVIN AND WHITE COMPANY'S AVIATION PELORUS

BUMSTEAD TWENTY-FOUR HOUR WATCH SUN-COMPASS. NOTE THE SMALL
SHADOW PIN ON THE HAND OF THE CLOCK


  p. 1331 (#247)                      #

1925)
1331
Flying Over the Polar Sea
clusive time to constructing two more sun compasses. These com-
passes were delivered the day the expedition reached Wiscasset
en route to Etah. One of them was tested by taking it with a navy
standard compass to a locality free from local metals, setting it to
north, and moving the face of the watch parallel to the equator,
setting the twenty-four hour watch to local apparent time, and then
comparing the compass with the true north thus indicated. (The
sun compass shows the true course it is set to when the shadow
thrown by the shadow pin falls on the hand of the watch.) The
difference between the north of the compass and the north of
the sun compass was exactly the amount of the variation in that
locality. There will be errors when the plane is not flying level
but the general direction can be followed.
Of course, the Mercator projection is not practicable in the
polar regions. The most suitable chart available is a conventional
projection, the polar chart, No. 2560, published by the Hydro-
graphic Office of the Navy Department. (Opp. page 1339.) On
the polar chart the rhumb line would be spiral but the spiral would
not become very ominous until very near the geographical pole.
When steering by the magnetic compass alone (when between the
magnetic and geographical poles) it would seem advisable to use
the rhumb line, the curved course on the chart, because to steer a
straight line would necessitate changing the true course and the
variation every few minutes, whereas the rhumb line would ne-
cessitate only changes of five degrees in variation every fifteen
minutes. If the navigator is attempting to steer a straight line
and gets off his course because of fog or unknown variations or
bad compasses or other causes, he will then be in a bad shape for
he will be applying the wrong corrections when he changes his
varjation and his true course; his errors will be cumulative and
he may readily get lost.
If Amundsen's reports so far published are correct, they in-
dicate very clearly that he was considerably off his course and
wasted much gasoline because of it. He was steering due north,
so his true course should have remained constant and his variation
between Spitzbergen and the pole should have changed only ten
degrees. But, when the fog (and certainly it was no fault of his),
got him off his course he began cutting lines of variation and his


  p. 1332 (#248)                      #

RANZOS
PELA

1651-65
165
L
True Course North Compus Custs
705' for 100 miles, vos For 100 mio
Te for 100 miles, 110 for de miles
True Course 30
COLR
LE
CHART SHOWING THE RHUMB LINE COURSES THAT WILL BE STEERED OVER
THE POLAR SEA WHEN THE EARTH INDUCTION OR MAGNETIC COMPASSES
ARE USED. THE SUN COMPASS WILL GIVE A STRAIGHT LINE BY USING THE
LOCAL APPARENT TIME AND THE LATITUDE OF THE MIDDLE MERIDIAN-AT
LEAST A LINE THAT IS VERY NEARLY STRAIGHT


  p. 1333 (#249)                      #

1925)
1333
Flying Over the Polar Sea
troubles began. On his return trip he landed one hundred miles
to the eastward of his course.
It seems that the best method of using the sun compass is to set
it for the local apparent time and latitude of the middle meridian
that is to be passed. This gives for all practical purposes a great
circle which can be drawn as a straight line and it will not be
necessary to apply so many changes of uncertain accuracy. An
approximate rhumb line, however, can be steered with the sun
compass by resetting the course dial every twenty miles or so.
Science has no information on variation in the regions to be flown
over; it is hoped that the use of the sun compass will facilitate
the obtaining of information concerning this uncertain quantity.
Of course, when the sun is behind the clouds the sun compass
is useless and other means had to be found to supplant the sun
compass and the magnetic compass in case the occasion should
arise.
The Pioneer Instrument Company has developed an earth in-
duction compass which is much more sensitive than the age-old
magnetic compass and will probably react to the small horizontal
component of the earth's magnetism that prevails in the Arctic
regions. It is subject, however, to the same errors of large and
unknown variation as is the magnetic compass. Its principle
is simple. There is a coil which is revolved by a small electric
motor. When this coil revolves in the field of the earth's mag-
netism a current is generated which actuates a pointer on the
pilot's instrument board. When the instrument is set to the de-
sired course (after applying the variation and the deviation), the
pointer is on zero and the coil is parallel to the lines of force of
the earth's magnetism. Any movement of the plane off this course
turns the revolving coil at an angle to these lines of force and so
induces a current of electricity which increases with the angle the
plane is off the course. This throws the steering pointer off zero
and it becomes the pilot's job to bring it back to zero. This
compass is subject to a deviation which is especially large when
the plane is not flying on an even keel. Other deviations can be
eliminated by placing the coil far out on the wing where it will
not be affected by the metal, switches, radio, etc., of the plane.
The standard navy steering compass in the forward cockpit of
these amphibians showed some deviations as high as eighty de-


  p. 1334 (#250)                      #


The BYRD SEXTANT


  p. 1335 (#251)                      #

1925)
1335
Flying Over the Polar Sea
grees. It became advisable, then, to put another compass in the
after cockpit away from the starting switches.
ASTRONOMICAL OBSERVATIONS
It is evident that quick and reliable methods of locating the
Sumner line must be available to the naval unit. Mr. G. W.
Littlehales, the Navy's hydrographic engineer, with his usual
genius, filled in the breach by calling attention to the very in-
teresting situation peculiar to the spot that we call the North Pole.
The north pole of the heavens and the zenith coincide. Hour
circles and meridians of longitude coincide with azimuth circles or
vertical circles. Parallels of declination coincide with parallels
of altitude. That means that the values of declination of the sun
and moon as given in the Nautical Almanac for any given time
equal the altitudes of those bodies at the North Pole. The moon
will be visible in the Arctic regions during August. The observer
taking sights in the Arctic regions can take the North Pole as his
computed point and he has his altitude for that point all worked out
for him in the Nautical Almanac. But that may better be left to
be told by Mr. Littlehales himself.
The naval unit is provided with sidereal watches as well as
G. M. T. clocks in order to facilitate working out moon sights.
In the location where the flying is to be done, using the above-
mentioned hydrographic chart, it will be sufficiently accurate to
lay down the Sumner line as a straight line on the chart so that
the lines of position can be plotted graphically with almost no
calculation.
The following instruments developed for the Navy's trans-
atlantic flight (1919), and which are now standard equipment,
will be used: bubble sextant, speed and drift indicator, course and
distance indicator, and smoke bombs, the latter being an improved
type. The drift indicator should show (when not in fog) the
drift within two degrees. This is a big factor in air dead-reckon-
ing for it sometimes greatly changes the course and speed. The
(nurse and distance indicator is an instrument which solves the
triangle of forces without resort to mathematics. Knowing the
speed through the air and the drift angle, it is possible to find the
speed over the ground by use of this instrument.
'Editor's Note. An article on this subject by Mr. Littlehales appears
in this number.


  p. 1336 (#252)                      #

1336
(Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings

COURSE AND DISTANCE INDICATOR
Another method that will be utilized in finding the drift is
effected by having radial lines drawn on the horizontal stabilizer,
five degrees apart, with the position of the observer's eye as a
center. By dropping a smoke bomb and noting on the graduated
radial lines the angle at which the smoke shows up aft the angle of
drift is ascertained.
FOOD
This article would not be complete without mention of the food
to be carried to the base on the Polar Sea. Lieutenant Com-
mander J. R. Phelps, Medical Corps, U. S. Navy, has made an
exhaustive study of food values with special consideration given
to the great limitation of weight-carrying in aircraft. The object
was to supply the proper proportions of proteins, fat, carbohy-


  p. 1337 (#253)                      #

1925)
1337
Flying Over the Polar Sea
drates, and vitamines needed by the human body to make possible
a carefully balanced diet with regard to actual experience over a
period of many years in the Navy. The great Arctic food is
pemmican, which consists of 53 per cent dried beef, 31.5 per cent
oleo oil, 9.5 per cent raisins, and 6 per cent sugar. Lieutenant
Commander Phelps has worked out a diet that is undoubtedly
much superior to the pemmican diet, though pemmican is included.
He concluded that five thousand calories per man per day would
be needed for the work in hand.
Two months' food will be taken to the base on the Polar Sea
for the seven or eight men who will be there. There follows a list
of the food that will be taken. Dr. Phelps' analysis of the calories
is also given.
TABLE AND REMARKS BY LIEUTENANT COMMANDER
PHELPS, (M.C.), U. S. NAVY
CONDIMENTS
Salt ..............1 lb. ............. for 7 men for 10 days
Pepper ...........I OZ.............. for 7 men for 10 days
Celery salt .......8 oz...... ...... for the expedition
Onion salt ........8 oz.............. for the expedition
Cloves, powdered ..2 oz.............. for the expedition
Cod Liver Oil.—It might be well in order to be further protected against
dietary troubles to take along one gallon of cod-liver oil.
Total
cal.
ories
15,599.4
49.093.7
24,936.9
46,395.2
The Arctic RATION AND ITS CALORIC VALUE
Weight Calories Calories Calories
pounds protein fat carbohy.
7 men
drate
10 days
Flour ....
...10.0 1.852.3 490.3 13,256.8
Pilot bread ..........
....28.0 5,644.1 5,720.4 37,729.2
Bacon, medium fat ....
8.5 1,528.2 23,408.7 ........
Whole milk powder ...... .......20.0 9,712.0 22,881.6 13,801,6
(Merrell-Soule Co.)
Navy Beans ........
3.5 1,430.1 257.4 3,788.2
Cracked wheat or oatmeal ........ 3.5 1,023.3 1,029,7 4,290.3
Chocolate .........
3.5 819,6 6,964.6 1,925.8
American full cream cheese
3.5 1,646.2 4,819.4 152.6
Pemmican .......
.....70.0 26,695.2 103,824.0 17,164.0
Paoli tomato paste ......
..2.25 224.7 230.0 980.6
Orange and lemon
.6.0 166.7 115.2 10,329.4
(Merrell-Soule Co.)
Powdered orange 4 lbs.
Powdered lemon 2 lbs.
...
5,475.7
6.343.3
9,710.0
6,618.2
147,683.2
1,435.3
10,611.3


  p. 1338 (#254)                      #

1338
[Aug
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
........... 3.0
1,353.5
........
1,353,5
Vegex
(Vitamin Food co.)
Butter, tinned ...........
Sugar ...................
Tea ................
Coffee ..............
127.1
24,311.7
15.0
24,438.8
27.240.0
21
......
27,240.0
2.0
.. 5.0
52,223.0
13.85:1,
194,053.0
51.48%
130,658.5
34,66%
376,934.5
Calories
per man
per day
5.384.78
SUMMARY
The Ration Including Pommican
Protein
Fat
Carbohydrate
Total calories
calories calories
calories
per man per day
13.85%
51.48%
34.66%
5,384.78
211 lbs.
Weight = - 0 = 3,01 lbs. per man per day
70
Protein = 186.51 grams per man per day
Los
Protein
calories
25,527.8
11.14%
The Ration Without Peminican
Fat
Carbohydrate
calories
calories
90,229.0
113,494.5
39.36%
49.50%
Total
calories
229,251.3
Calories per
man per day
3,275.02
Weight = 2.01 lbs. per man per day
Protein = 91.17 grams per man per day
Pemmican 1 lb. per man per day
Protein
calories
Carbohydrate
calories
Fat
calories
1.483.20
70.30%
Total
calories
2,109.76
381.36
18.08%
245,20
11.62%
Protein = 95.34 grams per man per day
Someone else might have approached this problem in a some-
what different manner. Different articles of food might have been
recommended. But, the assumed variables with which we must deal
necessarily limit selection to a few outstanding foods. The caloric value
per pound must be high and the foods chosen must be acceptable to those
who will eat them. It is necessary to assume that little or no cooking may
be possible and that you may have to fall back on high protein and high
fat concentration in case of accident involving a stay through one winter.
At the same time, provision should be made to furnish a list of foods that
will permit a reasonably varied diet consisting of cooked food served
hot, in case everything goes well.


  p. 1338 (#255)                      #


CONVERSION TARIX
PATHOXS TO METERS
Pachen Waars Feshow Yours
123
146
16.5
TA
20.3
21.9
23.8
256
Taimir
PECHORA
RIVER
31.1
329
366
549
712
914
1289
1546
C. Chelyuskin
skoro 8
on
EMPEROR
Topphen
ndel
6
RO
109 vaste
38
Fare Bay
338
Breidis
Snofellsnes
134
BAFF
*
s
220
610
075
33
oss
695
1000
A
C.Adair
Scarper
IOSO
Sligion
Christ
710
1260
.
Neelong
Lake
No.2560


  p. 1338 (#256)                      #



  p. 1339 (#257)                      #

FINDING GEOGRAPHICAL POSITION IN THE
REGION OF THE NORTH POLE.
By G. W. LITTLEHALES
Hydrographic Engineer, Hydrographic Office, Nazy Department,
Washington, D. C. . .
A T THE North Pole, the zenith coincides with the north
A pole of the heavens and hence parallels of altitude coincide
with parallels of declination and vertical or azimuth circles
with hour-circles and meridians of longtitude. The values of the
declination of the sun, moon, and other celestial bodies registered
in the Nautical Almanac are, therefore, for the specified times, the
values of the altitude that these celestial bodies would have above
the horizon of an observer at the North Pole, and likewise, the
specified times indicate the azimuthal direction of the celestial body
with reference to the prime meridian.
The Nautical Almanac is therefore to be regarded as a complete
Altitude and Azimuth Table at the North Pole. It is the realiza-
tion of this fact that teaches a convenient and rapid course of
procedure for finding the Sumner line of an observer in a geo-
graphical position as yet unknown, since the observer, having by
measurement ascertained the altitude of the sun (for instance)
at a given instant by a time-piece keeping the time of the prime
meridian, may at once compare this altitude with the declination
of the sun as registered in the Nautical Almanac with reference
to the given time.
The difference between the altitude thus obtained by measure-
ment and the altitude that the sun would be at the same instant if
the observer was situated at the North Pole is the interval of
latitude between the pole and the Sumner point on the meridian
of longitude passing through the "geographical position” of the
sun at the instant of observation; that is, the meridian correspond-
ing to the Greenwich hour-angle of the sun at the given time


  p. 1340 (#258)                      #

1340
[Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
Through the Sumner point thus specified to the observer by the
mere comparison of the declination and altitude, the Sumner line
passes at right angles to the meridian; it may be drawn on the
chart as a straight line in moderate lengths, but, when circum-
stances require it to be delineated in a great extent, it may be
drawn, with equal convenience and celerity, in its actual curvature,
by means of a template showing the shapes of the Sumner circle,
according to the altitude of the observed body, on the observer's
circumpolar chart. (H. O. Chart No. 2560).
In circumstances that are less restricted by the exactions in
equipment and working space than those that are often imposed
upon operations in the Arctic, the required extent of the Sumner
line may be at once described from the "geographical position”
of the observed celestial body on a stereographic chart projected on
the plane of the equator, as a circular arc whose radius has the
same arc-measure as the zenith distance and must therefore pass
through the Sumner point. This method may be extended to
regions of any degree of remoteness from the pole, provided only
that the limits of the equatorial stereographic chart are such as to
embrace the geographical position of the observed celestial body,
the geographical position of the observer, and the Sumner point
whose co-latitude on the meridian of the observed celestial body is
found by comparing the altitude of the celestial body as obtained
by measurement with the altitude that the body would have if ob-
served at the Pole, as indicated by the declination.
Although in cases where the observer has set one of his watches
to Greenwich apparent time for the day of observation and another
to Greenwich sidereal time, he will probably find himself ready
to make the required solutions with little writing or none, yet, for-
the purpose of illustrating the specific steps that are to be taken
into account, the details are set down in the treatment of examples
as follows:
Example: In the Arctic Zone, July 27, 1925, at Greenwich civil time
6h 06m 20%, by sextant observation the true altitude of the sun's center was
found to be 16° 07'. Required, the Sumner line of position from this
observation.


  p. 1341 (#259)                      #

1925]
1341
Geographical Position at North Pole
Time
G.C.T., July 27, ..........6"06m208
Equation of Time from
Naut. Alm. ............. 6 20
Comparison of Altitude
Alt. at pole (Declination
from Naut. Alm.) ... + 19° 20' 2
Alt. from measurement.. 16 07
G.A.C.T. (from midnight) 6 00 00
3° 13' .2
Polar distance of Sum-
ner point ............
(to be laid off away
from the direction of
the observed body
since the true altitude
is less than the altitude
at the pole: i.e., on the
meridian 90° west
from Greenwich).
Note: The Sumner point, marked A on the accompanying copy of
H. O. Chart 2560, is plotted at an interval of 3° 13.'2 of latitude, on the
opposite side of the pole, from the meridian 6h (90°) west of Greenwich mid-
night, on which the sun is located at the time of the observation; and
through this point the Sumner line is drawn at right angles to the meridian.
Example: Immediately after the observation stated in the foregoing
example, the altitude of the moon's center was found from sextant ob-
servation to be 3° 53'. Required, the Sumner line of position from this
observation :
Time
Comparison of Altitude
G.C.T., July 27 ....... 6h06m208 Alt. at pole (De-
Sidereal Time of oh
clination from
G.C.T. ... ......20 16 37 Naut. Alm.) ..-1° 06'.6.
Cor. for G.C.T. ........ 102 Alt. from meas-
urement ...... 3 53
G.S.T. ................ 2 23 59
R.A. Moon ...........13 00 55 Polar distance of
Sumner point. 459 .6 or 5° oo'
10 36 56 E. (to be laid off
G.H.A. ...............13 23 04 W. toward the di-
(from noon)
rection of the
(Meridian 159° 14' E.
observed body)
from Greenwich)
Note: The Sumner point, marked B on the accompanying copy of
H. 0. Chart 2560, is plotted at an interval of 5° of latitude on the same
side of the pole on the meridian 13h23m048 or 200° 46' west of Greenwich,


  p. 1342 (#260)                      #

1342
(Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
or 10"36m564 or 159° 14' east of Greenwich, on which the moon is located
at the time of observation, and the Sumner line is drawn, at right angles
to this meridian.
In conclusion, it remains only to point out that the intersection
of the two Sumner lines, defining the geographical position of the
observer, has the advantage of having been brought out upon the
chart itself, where, in fact, it must always be eventually put, in
order to enable the navigator to act upon the information which
it thus affords him in relation to his destination.


  p. 1343 (#261)                      #

Second Honorable Mention, 1925
NATIONAL STRATEGY
By LIEUTENANT COMMANDER H. H. Frost, U. S. Navy
Motto: “War is the sum of all the forces and pressures operative at a
given period."
CHURCHILL.
I. War and National Strategy.---War is the weighing of our
national capacity to exert and resist pressure against that of the
enemy nation or nations.
A war is decided when the national strength or the will to con-
quer of one of the opposing nations or alliances breaks. As there
is no nation, however strong or powerful, whose national strength
will not break if subjected to severe enough pressure for a suffi-
cient period of time, it is necessary that we bring the enemy nation
to the breaking strain before our own nation reaches it.
Due to the very great strain to which the economic forces of a
nation are subjected by modern war, it is not only necessary to
win, but it is extremely desirable to win with as little economic
effort and as quickly as possible. This expenditure of eco-
nomic effort makes such inroads upon our economic strength that
usually many years are required for recovery and sometimes, as
in the World War, the victors are reduced to practically the same
ruinous economic condition as the vanquished. This would not
have been the case had the war been decided in 1915 or 1916. In
addition to economic disaster, a long war similarly makes grave
attacks upon the moral strength of a nation and produces that
unrest and instability, which, after the World War, was as serious
a problem as economic recovery.
In his analysis as to why the allied powers, with their great
superiority of men and resources, did not win except through the
exhaustion of their enemies, Churchill strikes to the root of the
matter. "War,” he says, “which knows no rigid divisions between
French, Russian and British Allies, between Land, Sea and Air,


  p. 1344 (#262)                      #

1344
[Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
between gaining victories and alliances, between supplies and fight-
ing men, between propaganda and machinery, which is, in fact,
simply the sum of all forces and pressures operative at a given
period, was dealt with piecemeal.”
To break the moral power of the enemy nation, our government
should direct the operations of the following forces against similar
enemy forces in the combinations best designed for exerting and
resisting pressure:
a) The armed forces, including the military and naval services.
b) The economic forces, including the mining and manufactur-
ing industries, the transportation, communication, financial, com-
mercial and agricultural systems, the scientific organizations and
other similar national institutions.
c) The political forces, including the diplomatic service, the
news, publishing, educational and religious systems and the social,
political, labor and fraternal organizations.
These various forces must be used in the most effective com-
binations and along the most advantageous lines in order to exert
the greatest concentrated national pressure upon the enemy nation
and at the same time to raise to the maximum our national capacity
to resist his pressure.
This offensive and defensive use of our armed, economic and
political forces in proper coordination may be called national
strategy, and a thorough knowledge of this subject is the secret
which will win the next war.
National strategy is one of the most difficult and complex of sub-
jects because every action in war of our armed, economic and
political forces affects all the activities of our own and the enemy
nation, and even neutral countries, in a manner and to a degree that
it is practically impossible to estimate in advance with even ap-
proximate accuracy. This interplay of forces with its tremendous
influences upon the course of the entire war is a subject which will
be well worthy of the most careful consideration by our economic
and political leaders, as well as by our military and naval
services.
II. The Development of National Strategy.-National strategy
has changed greatly during the last two centuries. Formerly, the
armed forces played by far the most important part in war, while


  p. 1345 (#263)                      #

1925)
1345
National Strategy
the requirements of the economic and political forces were com-
paratively simple. This was due to the following facts:
a) Both army and navy could then more generally decide a
campaign by battle.
b) But little material was required for the armed forces, and
the principal economic force employed was money, for which
everything, even soldiers and political power, could be bought.
c) Most governments were autocratic and public opinion had
little force. The political forces were therefore small and nations
were influenced by gaining the favor or hatred of a few powerful
persons.
The growth of the modern form of national strategy commenced
with the wars of the French Revolution, was further developed by
the German general staff, and reached its present form in the
World War.
The principal changes in national strategy are the greatly in-
creased importance of the economic and political forces, which,
however, are still distinctly less important than the armed forces.
These changes are due to the following:
a) The technical developments which have favored defensive
tactics on both land and sea to such an extent that it is becoming
more and more difficult to decide a campaign by battle without
first weakening the enemy forces by other forms of pressure.
b) The great increase in the amount of material required by
the armed forces, which requires a corresponding development of
the economic forces.
c) The increased importance of public opinion, which requires
a great upbuilding of political forces, including propaganda sys-
tems, to influence it as well as governmental opinion.
III. Uses of the Armed Forces.-In considering the operations
of the armed forces, they can be divided into three classes, accord-
ing as their primary mission affects :
a) The armed forces of the enemy nation or nations.
b) The economic forces of the nations at war.
c) The political forces of the warring and neutral nations.
Usually, in order to exert the greatest pressure upon all parts
of the enemy nation and to resist its pressure upon us, it is de-


  p. 1346 (#264)                      #

1346
(Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
sirable to use our armed forces simultaneously in all three of these
main forms of operations. In order, however, to simplify the con-
duct of operations, no particular military, naval or combined force
should be given more than one primary mission. As, however,
every use of our armed forces has widespread influences through-
out the warring and neutral nations, the execution of this mission
usually either automatically or incidentally accomplishes other pur-
poses or tends favorably toward their accomplishment. It is
therefore important, when assigning a primary mission to any task
force, to see if it cannot be so drawn as to permit the operations
of the force to have other favorable influences, which, in some
cases, may be almost as important as the execution of the primary
mission itself. Thus, assuming that the primary mission assigned
von Mackensen for his Serbian campaign of 1915 was the destruc-
tion of the Serbian Army, his operations were so designed as to
accomplish economic and political results perhaps even more im-
portant.
IV. Operations Against the Enemy Armed Forces.—The first
and most important class of operations to be carried on by our
armed forces is strictly military or naval. Our object is to exert
directly the maximum pressure upon the armed forces of the
enemy and to resist that of the enemy armed forces upon ours.
The armed forces are therefore pitted directly against each other
and fight their campaigns to a finish regardless of economic or
political considerations. We think of nothing but fighting and of
inflicting such losses of personnel and material on enemy forces
that we will gain the moral ascendency over them. If this is our
purpose and we wish to accomplish it as quickly as possible it fol-
lows that we should seek out the largest enemy forces to destroy.
We must, therefore, collect the most powerful units of our forces
to accomplish this purpose.
This results in the principal military forces of a nation being
formed into field armies, which have their fronts covered by vari-
ous advanced troops attached to the armies for the purpose of
obtaining information of the enemy and to prevent him from ob-
taining information of our forces. These advanced troops rejoin
the main bodies of the field armies before a battle in order to bring
all of our available forces against the enemy in a concentrated
mass.


  p. 1347 (#265)                      #

1925]
1347
National Strategy
In exactly the same way the principal naval forces are formed
into a battle fleet, which likewise has its front covered by advanced
forces, which we call the scouting fleet, to perform the same duties
as the advanced forces of the field armies. They likewise join the
battle fleet before an action. The battle and scouting fleets are
both equal subdivisions of the United States fleet and operate
directly under its commander-in-chief.
A field army, with its advanced forces, takes for its primary
mission the complete defeat of the enemy field army. A battle
fleet, assisted by its scouting fleet, takes for its primary mission
the decisive defeat of the enemy battle fleet.
V. The Campaign of the Field Army.—Where two nations at
war have common land boundaries, the military forces, and in par-
ticular the field armies, are usually the principal instruments of
warfare. Their primary mission is the decisive defeat of the
enemy field armies. In modern history this principle developed
from the rapid and decisive purely military victories of Napoleon
and Moltke. A close examination of the campaigns of these great
leaders will show:
a) The opposing forces were usually greatly inferior in either
numbers, efficiency or leadership.
b) The technical developments favored offensive tactics, par-
ticularly in the Napoleonic wars.
c) Little or no use was made of permanent or field fortifica-
tions.
d) The forces were too small to form a continuous front.
Where these conditions have not been present rapid and purely
military decisions have seldom been the rule. Even in ancient his-
tory this principle was applicable, for, in contrast to Alexander's
rapid successes, we see Sparta and Athens fighting for thirty
years; Pyrrhus engaging Rome for nine years, and, finally, Han-
nibal holding his grip on Southern Italy for fifteen years, and even
then only relaxing it to defend Carthage.
In the long wars for Dutch independence, due to the equality
between the opposing armies in numbers, efficiency and leadership,
and the extensive use of permanent fortifications, there developed
a military deadlock which was almost exactly similar to that of the


  p. 1348 (#266)                      #

1348
(Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
western front. The victory of the Dutch was due to their naval
victories and the consequent attacks on Spanish trade.
In the Thirty Years War the principal weapon, after the death
of Gustavus, was hunger; and in the prolonged wars of Marl-
borough and Eugene not even their great series of victories was
able to win a strictly military decision.
In the Seven Years War the genius of Frederick and the effi-
ciency of his armies were balanced against the superior numbers
of the enemy coalition; in the end it was only political events which
allowed him to retain his hold on Silesia and obtain an even break
after seven years of continuous fighting.
Our Civil War resulted in another protracted struggle in which
economic pressure, exerted through the Navy, greatly assisted our
field armies in winning their decision.
Before the World War von der Goltz predicted that "it was ab-
solutely certain that in a future war events would not march with
anything like the rapidity" of the campaigns of 1866 and 1870.
While it might have been possible for the Germans to have gained
a decisive military success in the French campaign of 1914, this
is now beginning to appear more and more doubtful. Two great
armies, when their morale is unbroken, tend to reach a state of
equilibrium. As an army advances its numbers and equipment
decrease and friction and exhaustion reduce its effectiveness. A
retreating army, as long as its morale remains unbroken, increases
its numbers and equipment by throwing in its reserves and has
all the technical advantages of the defensive. Even admitting
German mistakes the allied armies in any event must have been
considerably superior on the Marne in September, 1914, in both
numbers and equipment, in addition to having the advantage of
resting their flanks on the two great fortresses of Verdun and
Paris. For these reasons it is beginning to appear more and more
improbable that the Germans could have decided the war in 1914.
Admiral von Tirpitz seems to have sensed this at the time and
recommended that the Channel ports be seized early in the advance.
While it is believed that the Germans were correct in endeavoring
to destroy the French Army, still, as it actually resulted, it would
have been advantageous for them had they followed his suggestion.
Once the lines were established on the western front, the in-
creased value of the defensive allowed greatly inferior forces con-


  p. 1349 (#267)                      #

1925)
1349
National Strategy
tinually to throw back the great allied offensives of 1915 with far
greater losses to the attackers than the defenders. The allied
losses, as stated by Churchill, were often twice and sometimes
three times as great as the German.
In February, 1916, the Germans returned to the offensive in a
particularly well-conceived operation. We are coming to see that
the Battle of Verdun was one of the most effective, if not the most
effective, of the offensive actions on the western front prior to
1918. A leading allied authority admits that the Germans came
within a reasonable distance of winning a decision and that it at
least saved the situation for them on the western front by breaking
up the great combined offensive planned on twice the scale of the
Somme Battle. While it adversely affected the morale of both
armies, as do all battles of attrition, it undoubtedly reduced that
of the French far more than that of the enemy. Finally, it is
admitted that the French losses were probably in excess of the
German, an usual feature of an offensive battle of attrition, due
to the favorable tactical position of the Germans. Nevertheless,
the failure of the Germans to win a decision, combined with the
break-through of the Russians, caused the retirement of General
von Falkenhayn.
The real effects of the Somme offensive will never be decided.
The British claim that it did much to break the morale of the Ger-
man soldier. Ludendorff freely admits the anxiety with which he
watched the course of the battle and it is perfectly true that his
army was reduced to a dangerous condition, but with an inferiority
on the western front of five to nine this was to be expected, con-
sidering the fact that his troops had already fought a heavy action
at Verdun and that he was being attacked by a greatly superior
force of fresh troops with an extraordinarily heavy artillery sup-
port. Even at that, his tired troops were able to hold up for
moderate gains the British attack of September 15, which was
made in good weather with a four to one superiority of infantry,
a more numerous artillery, practical supremacy of the air, the
advantage of using the tank as a surprise weapon and the ability
to exploit initial successes by means of a great mass of cavalry.
In the midst of the action Ludendorff was able to spare four of
his divisions for the eastern front.


  p. 1350 (#268)                      #

1350
[Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
But if Ludendorff was compelled to admit that his army was
completely exhausted at the end of the year and that its fighting
power had decreased, on the other hand the French and British
political leaders had lost all confidence in their military leaders.
Joffre and Foch were relieved from command at the front; Haig
was placed under the direction of the new and inexperienced
French commander. “No more Sommes," was the watchword of
the allied politicians.
For 1917 the plan on the western front was for the British to
make a powerful preliminary attack in front of Arras, while
Nivelle broke through along the Aisne. The first British attacks
proved excellent and drew German reserves, but Nivelle's great
attack broke down completely; he was dismissed; Petain was
brought in to restore the broken morale of the troops and the
word was issued to limit all operations to local attacks. In the
meantime the Battle of Arras died down with several costly re-
pulses, having achieved no strategical objectives.
So costly was the effect of the French failure that Ludendorff
was able to send six divisions from the western to the eastern front
where they played an important part in the great counter-attack in
July.
In June the British carried out the completely successful local
operation at Messines as a prelude to their Flanders offensive.
The effects of this terrific battle of attrition, like those of the
Somme, will always be a matter for argument. Again the Ger-
mans were practicaly exhausted and could withdraw only four divi-
sions from the western front for their Fourteenth Army at
Caporetto. On the other hand, the British politicans would not
provide the drafts to make up the enormous wastage of their divi-
sions and this was largely responsible for their defeats the next
spring. A member of the government, when informed that more
men were needed in France, replied "But when we find the men
they are lost." This feeling led the politicians to send the available
troops to Mesopotamia or Palestine, where they could have no
effect on the course of the war, in 1918 at least, or to retain them
in England.
The attack and counterattack at Cambrai showed that attacks
were becoming more effective, due to the thinning of the battle
lines, the exhaustion and moral breakdown of units, and also to


  p. 1351 (#269)                      #

1925]
1351
National Strategy
improved methods of attack. The French proved that carefully
planned local attacks could almost always be carried through suc-
cessfully, but their actions had no strategical effect.
The operations of 1918 showed the exhaustion of the opposing
armies and the greater possibilities of the attack under the more
favorable conditions. In the actions of March 21 and May 27 the
Germans were able to break through and exploit their successes
to a most unexpected degree but could not gain a decision. It was
their last throw. Political and economic weaknesses, together
with the arrival of over 2,000,000 fresh troops on the western
front, were the underlying causes of their downfall. Notable ex-
ploits of the allied leaders and troops contributed to the result.
The German Empire slowly collapsed under the finely coordinated
operations of the armed, economic and political forces of the allies.
On the eastern front the greater lengths of the battle lines 're-
duced the density with which the front could be held and gave the
attacker far more chance of success. Russian superiority in num-
bers and the incomparable bravery of their troops could not
counterbalance German superiority in leadership, efficiency and
material; but even then the Germans, despite great tactical vic-
tories, could not win a strategical decision. Although they did
exert most powerful military pressure on Russia, her collapse was
due to political and economic effects as much as military defeats.
As an example, Ludendorff, at the request of the German Chan-
cellor, suppressed the news of the German victory on the Stochod
in April, 1917. Although this victory showed the weakness of the
enemy, he forbade for some time any attacks on the Russians for
political reasons, and authorized the preparations for the final
attack of July only when it became apparent that the Russians re-
quired one more military defeat.
On the Italian front an overwhelming military success, itself
effected largely by propaganda, could not win a decision, although
it reestablished the Austrian Army and compelled the French and
British to stiffen the Italian front with eleven divisions at the
expense of a more important theater.
It was only where a lesser power, Belgium, Serbia, or Roumania,
was attacked that a purely military decision could be won, although
even here brilliant leadership was usually necessary to supplement
superior resources.


  p. 1352 (#270)                      #

1352
[Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
From the above facts it may be deduced that when a great power
is at war with a small power it will probably still be possible to
win a purely military decision by destroying the enemy field
armies; but when great nations are at war with approximately
equal military forces it will seldom be possible to win a purely
military decision.
In any case, it would appear to be the correct policy to strike
first with full force in the attempt to win a rapid military decision
before the fronts are stabilized. Failing to accomplish this, we
should then endeavor to form our battle lines as far to the front
as possible in order to secure, to use a naval term, the control of
the greatest possible amount of enemy territory and to confine the
operations of the enemy field armies to as restricted areas as pos-
sible, denying him, insofar as possible, areas of industrial and
economic importance. It is interesting to note that this is how
Frederick, in 1778, said he would act if he ever had to fight again.
We should then carry out such offensive operations as may be
possible in order to wear down the enemy by constant pressure and
limited offensives, but only in such tactical situations that the rela-
tive losses, both moral and material, will be to our advantage. We
must always be ready to seize the opportunity for an attack in
full force whenever the opposing field armies have been so re-
duced in physical and moral strength that there is a good prospect
of decisive success.
VI. The Campaign of the Battle Fleet.—Where the two op-
posing nations have no common land boundaries, the navy will
usually be the principal instrument of warfare, particularly in the
first stages of the war. As in military strategy, it is naturally
desirable to endeavor first to defeat the main forces of the hostile
navy. For this purpose the most powerful units, supported by all
of the smaller units necessary for fighting a fleet action, are formed
into a battle fleet. The duties of the advanced forces in scouting
and screening for such a fleet are so varied and important as to
warrant the formation of a scouting fleet which, in our Navy, op-
erates directly under the commander-in-chief of the United States
fleet. Our battle fleet, assisted by the scouting fleet, endeavors to
locate, bring to action and destroy the enemy battle fleet ; but if
at certain periods of history the decisive defeat of the enemy field
army has been a difficult accomplishment, that of the battle fleet


  p. 1353 (#271)                      #

1925)
1353
National Strategy
has been even more so. This is due to the special circumstances of
naval warfare which allow an enemy fleet to decline action by re-
maining in a defended port or so close to it that an assured line
of retirement is always available. This means that a fleet action
could take place only:
a) When both fleets were willing to fight, or
b) One was lured to sea and its retreat cut off, or
c) It was forced out of port by pressure other than that exerted
by our battle fleet.
Due to these facts, fleet actions have rarely occurred, and of
these very few have been decisive. Such as have been, were won
over very inferior opponents and even then only after protracted
campaigns. They have not generally had the same immediate
effect upon the course of the war as great military victories which
have permitted the occupation of enemy countries, but their ulti-
mate effects have been almost as decisive.
The ability of an inferior fleet to avoid action has been increased
by the latest developments :
a) Due to the use of torpedoes, mines and smoke screens by
special vessels, it is easier for a fleet to decline, or even to dis-
engage itself, from action.
b) The use of large numbers of submarines and aircraft renders
it more dangerous to attack an inferior fleet in its own waters.
Nevertheless, despite these difficulties, the importance of de-
cisively defeating the enemy battle feet is so great that every
opportunity for action should be seized; in addition, we must en-
deavor in every possible way to bring about and force such oppor-
tunities, which must not be missed just because all the conditions
are not in our favor. These opportunities occur so seldom to a
superior fleet that they should be regarded as absolutely priceless
and distinctly unfavorable battle conditions should be accepted if
necessary.
If an opportunity does not occur to destroy the enemy battle
fleet and cannot be forced at present by any means in our power,
we must then act along the same lines as a field army which is
unable to gain a decision on land. Our battle fleet, assisted by the
scouting fleet, should push its front as far toward the enemy coasts
as it can be maintained in order to secure the control of the great-


  p. 1354 (#272)                      #

1354
(Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
est extent of sea area possible, in particular that through which
lines of transportation vital to us and the enemy run, and to con-
fine the enemy battle fleet, and, as far as possible, his scouting
fleet, to restricted areas off his own coast or bases, our scouting
fleet and battle fleet taking such dispositions that similar enemy
fleets can initiate important operations outside this restricted area
only with the probability of decisive defeat. In addition, we must
wear down the strength of the enemy battle and scouting fleets
with our light forces, defeat enemy detachments whenever they
come within reach and sweep at irregular intervals through the
area normally controlled by the enemy in the hope of making op-
portunities of inflicting losses on the enemy, as in the action of
Heligoland Bight. And, most of all, we can never know when the
unexpected opportunity to win a decisive victory will be presented
and accordingly we must be ready at all times to seize with the
utmost energy and aggressiveness this heaven-sent opportunity of
ending the campaign.
VII. Cooperation Between the Field Army and the Battle
Fleet.— Usually the field armies and the battle fleet carry on dis-
tinct and separate campaigns, cooperation between them being car-
ried on through the medium of secondary forces. Even when the
war plans are drawn in this way the campaigns of the field army
and battle fleet should be so coordinated that each will give the
other the maximum indirect support. In some cases the battle
ficet, even when operating separately from the field army, should
take for its primary mission the support or assistance of the field
army. It is considered that the high seas fleet had a great oppor-
tunity to assist the German Army during the campaign in France
of 1914. Had it made a threat toward the Channel or the British
coast, or fought even an indecisive action with the grand fleet, it
is very possible that the despatch of the British Expeditionary
Force to France would have been postponed for some time; had
even a partial victory been won over the grand fleet the sailing of
the expedition might have been definitely cancelled. Again, in
1918 the German scouting groups of battle and light cruisers
might have been able to hold up the sailings of our troop convoys
for several weeks by operations in the Atlantic. While these
groups would eventually have suffered heavy losses their sacrifice
might have had decisive effects on the fighting in France. These


  p. 1355 (#273)                      #

1925]
1355
National Strategy
operations of the German naval forces had probably greater
chances of influencing the land campaign than in 1914, for in 1918
both armies were at their breaking strains; the Germans, having
greater reserve power, would have won could our reinforcements
of fresh troops have been even temporarily delayed.
In the same way it is conceivable that a field army should take
for its primary mission the assistance of the battle fleet; if Gen-
eral Nogi's siege detachment be considered a field army we would
have an example of this at Port Arthur. One of the most impor-
tant objects of the costly Flanders offensive in 1917 was the cap-
ture of the Belgian bases; this would have greatly assisted the
British anti-submarine forces and, indirectly, the grand fleet.
In some campaigns the field army and battle fleet will work in
direct conjunction; this is particularly the case where a field army.
attempts to carry through an oversea invasion. Notable examples
are Parma's attempt to invade England in 1588, Napoleon's similar
attempt in 1805, and the Japanese operations in their wars with
China in 1894 and Russia in 1904.
In such campaigns it is believed that either the army or naval
commander should exercise the supreme command, depending
upon the service which has the paramount interest in the actual
operation in progress. This commander should have the power
to assign the tasks for the other service, but not the methods of
execution. This idea has been fully explained by Captain Pye.
As the operations carried on by the combined forces change in
character, the supreme command changes from one service to
another in accordance with which has the paramount interest.
VIII. Operations of the Detached and Control Forces.In
addition to the vessels composing the battle and scouting fleets
there are usually available numerous other more or less obsolete
naval vessels or converted merchant vessels which are not suitable
for use in these organizations. Thus, at the beginning of the
war, Great Britain had a great number of second line vessels, such
as battleships and cruisers, and first line destroyers and sub-
marines; great numbers of merchant vessels were also available
for conversion. These vessels were therefore used for important
subsidiary operations. Sometimes these operations assumed such
importance that first line units-Queen Elizabeth, Princess Royal,
Invincible and Inflexible—were detached from the grand fleet for


  p. 1356 (#274)                      #

1356
(Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
long periods. In addition, many vessels were constructed especially
for subsidiary operations, particularly monitors and anti-sub-
marine craft.
In the same way, the British had considerable forces of Indian
and South African troops and other partly trained organizations
which were not suitable for use in France. These forces were
therefore used for subsidiary operations and, in fact, these cam-
paigns often became so important that good first line troops were
used in them.
In the Navy we call these secondary forces "control forces,"
because they “exercise” the control of the sea after the battle and
scouting fleets have "secured” this control. Such military forces
will be called, for want of a better name, “detached forces.”
Sometimes these forces may comprise an entire service, as:
a) When the enemy has no battle feet, as in our Civil War.
b) When the enemy's battle fleet has been destroyed, as after
Quiberon Bay, Trafalgar, or the Battle of the Sea of Japan.
c) When we have not sufficient naval forces to form a battle
fleet which would have any chance of operating successfully
against the enemy battle fleet, as in the Revolutionary War and
the War of 1812.
d) When the enemy field army has been completely defeated,
but further pressure is required to bring the enemy to terms, as in
the French occupation of the Ruhr.
e) When we are unable to form a field army of sufficient size
to engage in a land campaign against the enemy field armies, as
was the case of England in the Seven Years War, when the troops
were used for diversions.
When there is a deadlock between the opposing field armies and
battle fleets, as in the World War, it is the efficient use of the de-
tached and control forces which will decide the issue of the war.
They are the reserves which may be thrown in on the fighting,
economic or political fronts in accordance with our estimate as to
where they can be used with the greatest effect. There will always
be such a variety of demands made for their use, and such in-
numerable combinations can be made with them that their skillful
use is a problem more difficult and complex than the comparatively
narrow and strictly military or naval problems of the field army
and the battle fleet.


  p. 1357 (#275)                      #

1925)
1357
National Strategy
The first and most natural use of our detached and control
forces is to assist directly our field army and battle fleet in winning
their campaigns. There are times when a certain detachment of
the control forces, having accomplished its mission, may be with-
drawn to the battle fleet, as were the Princess Royal, Invincible
and Inflexible after the Falklands action. Also, sometimes the
operation in which the detachment is engaged develops so un-
successfully that it must be abandoned; in this case the forces
engaged in it may be withdrawn to the battle fleet or field army, as
were the Queen Elizabeth and the Anzacs from the Gallipoli
campaign.
Sometimes our control or detached forces may be within sup-
porting distance of our battle fleet or field army when a decisive
battle is being fought. In such cases they should forget their pres-
ent duty, march to the sound of the guns and intervene with their
full power. This is what Tyrwhitt wished to do at Jutland. The
Germans ordered all their submarines to the scene of action.
As both branches of the armed forces must be considered as
one instrument for waging war, it is important that each should
furnish the other constant mutual support. We have seen that
in some cases the field army and battle fleet work in direct con-
junction, but it is principally the naval control forces which are
most suitable for affording direct support to the field army and the
detached military forces which can best assist the battle fleet in its
campaign.
These supporting forces may be given more or less permanently
to the other service or may be loaned for a limited period. They
may be placed directly under the orders of the other service or
merely directed to cooperate as may be practicable. In some cases
the supporting forces may be very small; in others they may be
very powerful, as was Nogi's siege detachment at Port Arthur.
The decision as to whether forces of one service should be given
to the other depends upon an estimate as to whether these forces
will be able to contribute more to the operations of our entire
armed forces by acting in conjunction with the other service than
with other forces of its own service. The maintenance of good
feeling between the two services and the moral support afforded
are important considerations which favor a general policy of
mutual support wherever possible.


  p. 1358 (#276)                      #

1358
(Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
IX. Support of the Field Army by the Naval Control Forces.
-The field army may be supported by the navy in several ways:
a) By the transfer of naval or marine units to the field army.
b) By giving the army naval guns and other equipment with or
without personnel.
c) By assisting military operations by artillery fire from ships.
d) By safely transporting the field army and its supplies to the
theater of operations.
The siege of Antwerp brought into action the naval and marine
units of three nations. A German naval division was probably
the most reliable unit of von Beseler's siege detachment, while one
British brigade of marines and two of seamen contributed some-
what to the prolongation of the defense. A French force of 8,000
marines under Rear Admiral Ronarc'h was enroute to Antwerp,
but, failing to arrive in time, distinguished itself at Dixmude,
where it lost eighty per cent of its strength.
All the field armies were greatly assisted by the navies in the
supply of long range guns and other equipment. Early in the
war the British Navy organized considerable forces of armored
trains, armored cars, and aircraft which operated from the Channel
ports against the forces covering the right flank of the German
army. After the fall of Antwerp all these forces were given to
General Rawlinson. The British Navy was also largely instru-
mental in developing the tank and the methods of using poison
gases. As early as January, 1915, Sir John French urgently re-
quested the use of the 15-inch howitzers being prepared by the
Navy. Rear Admiral von Usedom, in command of the coast de-
fenses of the Dardanelles, furnished large numbers of howitzers
and guns to supplement the weak artillery of the Fifth Turkish
Army defending the Gallipoli Peninsula. The German Navy fur-
nished the naval guns from which the long range guns for the
bombardment of Paris were built. Our Navy supported the field
army with a battery of five 14-inch railway guns.
On a number of occasions the guns of naval vessels have fur-
nished excellent artillery support for the field army, particularly in
the operations along the Belgian coast in the fall of 1914 before
the Germans had been able to develop their powerful coast defense
batteries.


  p. 1359 (#277)                      #

1925]
1359
National Strategy
The British Navy played an extremely important part in the
assembly of the field army from Great Britain, Australia and
Canada on the western front and later the British and United
States Navies performed a similar duty in transporting our army
to France. The actual transportation of the troops is a duty of
the naval transportation service, but the escort and protection of
the troops and supplies enroute is a function of the control forces.
X. Support of the Battle Fleet by Detached Military Forces.
--Assistance of the battle fleet by detached forces will usually take
the following lines:
a) The use of an expeditionary force to seize and hold bases
for the fleet.
b) The attack of an expeditionary force or siege detachment
upon the base of the enemy battle fleet in order to force it to sea.
c) The intervention of shore based aircraft in an action between
battle fleets.
Due to the fact that both battle fleets operated from their home
bases, there were no instances of expeditionary forces seizing
bases for them in the World War. Unfortunately, the British
plan to seize Borkum for an advanced base was abandoned after
the declaration of war. This form of operations, however, is of
well recognized importance in an oversea campaign.
The campaign of Shafter's army against Santiago and Nogi's
army against Port Arthur were both directed primarily against
the hostile fleets in those ports. In the first case the fleet was
forced to sea and destroyed; in the second it was partly broken
up in the action of August 10 and finally destroyed by the guns of
the Japanese siege detachment. The attacks of the Italians on the
Isonzo front were, partly directed at the Austrian battle fleet in
Pola.
In future campaigns shore-based aircraft, particularly fighting
and bombing planes, attached to either the army or navy, will be of
great assistance should an enemy battle fleet venture into an area
which can be reached by large numbers of such planes, either by
intervening in a feet action or by wearing down the enemy's
strength by unsupported attacks. The shore based air forces
within their radius of action will usually be superior to any which
can be flown from ships, and this fact, together with the increased


  p. 1360 (#278)                      #

1360
[Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
effectiveness of the submarines, practically prohibits an attack in
force on the coast of a powerful nation. This, however, has sel-
dom been a practicable operation and is not necessary for winning
the decision in a naval campaign; other methods of using a naval
force to exert strong pressure on the enemy, such as reduction of
outlying possessions and economic blockade, are practicable with-
out bringing our battle fleet within range of the main air forces
of the enemy.
XI. Indirect Support of the Field Army and Battle Fleet by
Secondary Forces. In addition to directly supporting the field
army and battle fleet the detached and control forces may afford
indirect support by operating along separate lines, the forces not
being attached to the field army or battle fleet or operating in con-
junction with them. These operations take the following forms:
a) Destruction of forces separated or detached from the field
army or battle feet.
b) Diversions to weaken the enemy field army or battle fleet.
c) Attacks by light forces on the enemy battle fleet.
Most of these operations require the closest cooperation between
the two services and by means of them each service can utilize its
excess forces to assist the other service. In many cases combined
military and naval forces can be used most effectively. A general
practice should be made of detailing forces, even very small ones,
from one service to the other, because such forces usually will be
able to afford support out of all proportion to their own strength.
The Dardanelles and Mesopotamian campaigns show this coopera-
tion between the two services in its best form.
XII. Destruction of Isolated Detachments.—Often in war,
portions of the enemy forces become separated from their field
army or battle feet in such situations that we may organize special
forces to destroy them.
In naval warfare opportunities to attack isolated enemy forces
occur most frequently at its beginning before the enemy has time
to concentrate his forces. In 1904 the Japanese were able to
destroy a light cruiser and gunboat at Chemulpo and to isolate
a cruiser division in Vladivostok, thus weakening the Russian
battle fleet based on Port Arthur. In 1914 the British had an op-
portunity to destroy the Goeben and Breslau and thus weaken the
high seas fleet by the loss of two important units.


  p. 1361 (#279)                      #

1925)
1361
National Strategy
In land warfare the opportunity to destroy detached forces oc-
curs most frequently when portions of the field army are left
behind to assist in the defense of fortresses. There were numerous
examples of this in the World War and in 1870 Bazaine's entire
field army was swept into and destroyed at Metz. This form of
operations has a number of advantages:
a) It reduces the forces available to the enemy field army and
battle fleet. The German naval forces on foreign station at the
beginning of the war-one battle cruiser, two cruisers, seven light
cruisers—represented quite a reinforcement for the high seas feet.
In the same way the heavy losses in prisoners and guns occasioned
by the fall of fortresses reduced the strength of the field armies.
b) Such successes are usually assured, due to our superiority
of force, and are often cheaply bought, due to the enemy's knowl-
edge that ultimate victory is practically impossible. There are,
however, some notable exceptions, such as the famous sieges of
Ostend, Genoa and Port Arthur and the remarkable defense of
German East Africa, one of the great exploits of history.
c) Important military or naval advantages will often be gained,
particularly in opening up and securing lines of communication
and transportation, as at Liege and the Falklands action.
d) Economic and political advantages may be gained, as at
Tsingtau.
These operations, however, have the serious disadvantage that
they usually require a superiority of force and to carry them out
we may be compelled to weaken our more essential forces at a
critical time. Where the operation can be quickly decided, such
a weakening of our main forces is justifiable, especially if the
secret is well kept. The Germans did not know that two battle
cruisers had been detached from the grand feet until the results of
the Falklands action were announced and they probably never
knew of the detachment of the Princess Royal. However, if
Sturdee had not had such extraordinary luck in meeting von Spee
so quickly, the loss to the grand fleet of three important first line
units for a protracted period would have been a somewhat serious
one. In some circumstances superiority of force is not required
in these operations. A most spectacular example was von Beseler's
capture of Antwerp with a miscellaneous collection of reserve,


  p. 1362 (#280)                      #

1362
[Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
Landsturm and naval units operating against a force double his in
strength and sheltered by the second strongest fortress in Europe.
XIII. Diversions.-A diversion is usually a most satisfactory
form of operation for temporarily reducing the strength of the
enemy's field army or battle fleet. First, a diversion requires only
small forces. In naval warfare even a single ship, as for example
the Emden, Karlsruhe or Moewe, can create a most successful
diversion. On November 5, 1914, the Germans had at large but
five ships, of which two were armored; to run down this force the
British were actually using about thirty ships, of which twenty-one
were armored, not counting large Japanese and French forces and
armed merchantmen. Second, our force, having the advantage of
initiative, surprise, and the choice of a large number of objectives,
can usually inflict considerable military, naval, economic and po-
litical losses on the enemy. Third, in case our force should hit a
weak spot, it can often be reinforced and changed into an impor-
tant operation, which actually happened at the Dardanelles.
Fourth, the enemy usually is required to employ greatly superior
forces to meet our attack; he must guard a great number of pos-
sible objectives and must always be ready for a repeated attack in
the same place. Fifth, a diversion does not require that our force
be successful or even heavily engaged, although, of course, its
results will be greater if this be the case. Diversions may be
made by:
a) Military forces, as in the Turkish attack on the Suez Canal
and that against the Persian oil fields.
b) Naval forces, as in the first attack on the Dardanelles and
the Ostend operation of August, 1914.
c) Combined forces, as in the attacks on Rochefort and Cher-
bourg in the Seven Years War.
The Turkish attack on the Suez Canal, although made by very
small forces which failed most completely in their attempt to in-
jure the canal, was really a most successful diversion, largely be-
cause of the great importance of its objective. This induced the
British to retain large forces in Egypt and to undertake the highly
unprofitable Palestine campaign, tying down for several years an
army, which ultimately reached 270,000 men, exclusive of fol-
lowers, while the Turkish Army was a fraction of this figure. In


  p. 1363 (#281)                      #

1925]
1363
.
National Strategy
:
the same way a small force of Turks and Arabs attacked the Brit-
ish oil fields in Persia and the pipe lines along the Karun River;
this drew two gunboats and an entire brigade.
The first stage of the Dardanelles attack actually was designed
to create a diversion to assist the Russians. It succeeded in draw-
ing six Turkish divisions to the Dardanelles. While this was an
excellent diversion from the Russian viewpoint, it was not so
favorable when it was decided to change the diversion into an
attack in force.
At the end of August, 1914, the British Navy concentrated a
considerable force in Ostend and landed a brigade of 3,000 ma-
rines. This created a powerful diversion and according to General
Dupont was the culminating element in the German decision to
withdraw from the Marne.
The use of combined forces for diversions was one of the prin-
cipal elements of Pitt's strategy in the Seven Years War. The
attacks on Rochefort and Cherbourg were designed to draw off
troops from the German front and, although they had very slight
actual success, they had excellent strategical results. In the Civil
War combined federal forces at Fort Monroe drew off Long-
street's corps of 15,000 men from Lee's army and compelled him
to fight the Battle of Chancellorsville against great odds.
When an operation can at the same time crush an enemy force
and act as a diversion, it is particularly effective. One of the best
examples of this was von der Goltz's counter-attack on Town-
shend's army and its ultimate capture at Kut. Not only was a
distinct victory won, but the necessity for the British to regain
their moral losses and prestige in the East compelled them to mass
an army which ultimately grew to 280,000 troops, exclusive of
followers, to carry on a campaign whose small results were alto-
gether out of proportion to the forces used. The German-Austrian
attack on Italy in 1917 not only inflicted the heaviest losses on the
Italians, but forced the British and French to use their scanty
reserves to stiffen the Italian front to their own cost in March,
1918. Although made largely for political reasons the German-
Austrian attack on Serbia in 1915 practically destroyed the Serbian
army and drew from the western front great numbers of French
and British troops. In 1918 the army based on Salonica num-
bered, including Greeks and Serbians, 630,000 men, exclusive of


  p. 1364 (#282)                      #

1364
(Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
followers. In addition all the equipment for the Greeks and Ser-
bians had to be furnished by the British and French, and the
Italians had to give two divisions to furnish a front in Albania.
XIV. Attacks of the Light Forces. Our control forces will
often be able to attack important units of the enemy battle and
scouting fleets. Submarines are particularly effective for such
attacks. British submarines torpedoed at various times two battle-
ships and two battle cruisers. Minelayers were also effective; the
Audacious and other important units were lost as a result of their
operations. Shore-based bombing and torpedo planes, both mili-
tary and naval, will be a constant menace to enemy forces ven-
turing near their bases.
XV. Operations Affecting the Economic Forces.—Having
considered the primary missions of our military and naval serv-
ices, that is, the decisive defeat of the enemy field army and battle
fleet, and also those operations of the detached and control forces
which are intended to assist our field army and battle fleet in their
campaigns, both directly as a part of these main forces and in-
directly in distinct and separate operations, it is now appropriate
to consider the further operations of the detached and control
forces which primarily affect the economic forces of the opposing
nations and thereby indirectly affect all the national forces. These
operations fall into three classes, according as their mission is:
a) To exert pressure on the enemy economic forces.
b) To resist the pressure of the enemy armed forces on our
economic forces.
c) To assist our economic forces.
Our armed forces are designed primarily for use against the
enemy armed forces. Their use against economic forces is an
unnatural one which must be justified by unusual conditions. Such
operations are restricted by the prevalent conception of inter-
national law and usually to be successful involve its violation in
important respects. They also often cause great suffering among
the civil population of the enemy nation and great bitterness
toward us; this will be turned to good account by the enemy. In
many cases, particularly in naval warfare, neutral lives and prop-
erty may be destroyed and this may cause powerful neutrals to
take sides with the enemy or at least assume an attitude of benev-


  p. 1365 (#283)                      #

1925)
1365
National Strategy
olent neutrality. Therefore, in deciding upon operations against
the enemy economic forces, the adverse political effect must be
accepted and steps taken in advance to counteract it.
XVI. Attacks on the Enemy Economic Forces.-In general,
direct attacks on the enemy economic forces are made when:
a) Our naval forces are unable to secure the command of the
sea by operations against the enemy battle fleet and must be used
for missions easier of attainment, in particular attacks on trade.
b) Our naval forces have secured the control of the sea by suc-
cessful operations against the enemy battle fleet, thus permitting
our control forces to exercise that control by exerting pressure on
the enemy economic forces by blockade or similar operations.
c) The enemy is unable to organize a battle fleet, thus allowing
a considerable part of our forces to be used for exerting economic
pressure by blockade.
d) Our military forces, due to the defeat of the enemy field
army, can occupy important economic centers or areas which are
vital to the enemy.
In all these forms of operations more or less contact with the
enemy armed forces must be expected, but these contacts are
merely incidental to the execution of our primary mission, the
attack of enemy economic forces.
In the World War the Germans, realizing that they could not
secure the control of the sea by operations against the grand fleet,
while continuing such operations, used their control forces to
attack the economic forces of the Allies. These attacks took the
following forms:
a) Submarine warfare, including mining, against allied and
neutral trade.
b) Cruiser warfare against trade.
c) Aircraft bombing attacks against industrial centers.
The German submarine offensive produced remarkable results,
both favorable and unfavorable. The direct influence upon the
economic forces of the Allies was so great as almost to decide the
war. These results indirectly influenced the military situation
greatly to the advantage of the Germans, but on the other hand
they had a most unfavorable political result, the entry of the
United States into the war, which in turn changed the military


  p. 1366 (#284)                      #

1366
(Aug
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
situation against the Germans. The question of submarine war-
fare is a balancing of favorable economic, military and naval fac-
tors against the unfavorable political factor. While this form of
warfare was greatly criticized by those who suffered from it and
while it is formally barred by an obscure treaty, it cannot be left
out of consideration in contemplating future naval wars, because,
while such forms of warfare are distinctly out of favor in our
country, we must always count upon its use by an enemy nation, a
fact which is accepted by a leading British naval critic. History
affords no instance of a nation losing a desperate war for its
existence without using every means at its disposal to win and it
is even more doubtful if there will be such cases in the future.
Furthermore, it may be possible under special conditions, as was
the case in the Sea of Marmora, to use it in an area where there
are no neutrals or where it is unnecessary to attack without
warning.
Cruiser warfare against trade is sometimes justified on a small
scale, but more as a diversion or threat than for producing any
important actual results. A limited number of raiders should be
used, because in this way we produce a moderate economic effect,
due to delay of sailings, increase of insurance rates, and deterring
neutral ships from serving the enemy. In addition, it creates a
diversion by keeping in play a large number of enemy cruisers.
The cruises of the Emden, Karlsruhe, Mocue and I'olf are models
for such operations.
The actual effects of the air attacks on industrial centers is
still difficult to estimate. During the war the Allies refused to
admit that any economic or military damage had been done. Dis-
closures since the war tend to show that their effects were quite
important in slowing down work, although the actual damage done
was slight. As military diversions they were extremely effective
and they drew many planes away from the western front for de-
fensive work in which they were practically useless. Their po-
litical effect is doubtful. At first they certainly encouraged
enlistments and had a great propaganda value, but these effects
wore off in time and later in the war the continual attacks must
have had a considerable adverse moral effect. Repington describes
their demoralizing effect upon the British Cabinet.


  p. 1367 (#285)                      #

1925]
1367
National Strategy
When a navy has secured the control of the sea its control forces
may then exert economic pressure upon the enemy by preventing
his merchant vessels from passing through it. They may also
prevent neutral vessels from trading with the enemy either directly
or indirectly by:
a) Blockade of the enemy coast.
b) A system including inspection of cargoes, transference to
the contraband list of all articles and material, and pressure upon
neutrals to prevent enemy destination of goods.
Due to the changed conditions of naval warfare it was imprac-
ticable in the World War to declare a blockade of Germany which
would have any pretense of legality. The British, therefore, built
up a large force of armed merchant vessels to cover the area be-
tween Scotland and Norway to intercept all passing ships. As it
was dangerous because of submarines to inspect the ships at sea,
they were ordered by a new extension of international law to pro-
ceed into inspecting stations. The next step was to make every-
thing absolute contraband, despite the generally prevailing ideas
of international law. All that remained was to prove enemy des-
tination. This being impracticable in the case of goods consigned
to neutral countries, such goods were passed only if the consignee
guaranteed that they would not reach Germany; if this agreement
were broken the firms concerned would be blacklisted and no fur-
ther goods consigned to them would be passed. This system
finally resulted in an effective economic blockade of Germany, and
produced great and almost decisive results. Indirectly it struck
the German army heavy blows from the rear and had much to do
with its eventual breakdown. Its starvation feature, accompanied
by great increases of disease, particularly among the children, as
described by Philip Gibbs, struck a staggering blow at the morale
and will to conquer of the entire German nation. Its political
effects on neutrals were bad, but by skillful diplomacy and prop-
aganda, these were kept within limits, and the British were assisted
by the more apparent violation of international law by the German
submarine offensive.
In the Civil War the inability of the Confederate States to or-
ganize a battle fleet allowed a great part of the federal navy to
be used for legitimate blockade of the Southern States, which


  p. 1368 (#286)                      #

1368
[Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
greatly influenced the result of the war. The British naval ex-
pedition up the Yangtze in 1842 so effectively cut the Chinese lines
of communications that they were forced by economic losses to
sue for peace.
Military forces may be used directly against the economic forces
of the enemy, but this is seldom their primary mission until the
enemy field armies have been destroyed. The German invasion
of France in 1914 was primarily to destroy the French Army, but
the incidental occupation of the coal and iron mines was a power-
ful blow at the French economic forces.
· After having gained a definite decision over the enemy field
armies the next objective for our military forces becomes the
economic forces of the enemy. Sherman's march from Atlanta and
Sheridan's devastation of the Shenandoah Valley were both direct
attacks on the enemy economic forces. The organization of a
nation is now so strong and complex and the economic forces of
the world are so interwoven that sometimes a military decision will
not in itself bring about the defeat of the enemy nation. In this
case it is necessary to use our military forces directly against the
economic forces of the enemy as the French did in the Ruhr. Such
operations, although apparently successful in this case, are very
costly and their political effects are doubtful. There is a distinct
limit to the penalties which may be imposed upon a defeated nation.
XVII. Defense of Our Economic Forces Against Hostile
Attack.—The second class of operations affecting the economic
forces is the resistance of the pressure of the enemy armed forces
upon our economic forces. As the enemy military forces will be
used for this purpose only after our field armies have been de-
stroyed, we may consider only naval attacks on our economic
forces.
A passive defense will require naval forces far superior to the
enemy attacking forces. Thus the allied forces resisting the Ger-
man submarine warfare were probably twenty times more numer-
ous than the entire German submarine service. The naval forces
used for resisting attack must be taken from the battle or scouting
fleets or produced at the expense of other naval, military or eco-
nomic forces. The allied anti-submarine organization, including
the shipbuilding industries developed, caused a great drain on all
the allied forces.


  p. 1369 (#287)                      #

1925]
1369
National Strategy
For these reasons it is naturally most desirable to organize
counter-blows against the enemy submarine, cruiser and air bases,
as these operations require only small forces compared with those
necessary for a passive defensive. In the World War, although
many plans were laid for the seizure of Borkum and the Belgian
bases, unfortunately very little materialized, except for the partly
successful blocking attacks on Zeebrugge and Ostend in 1918 and
some ineffective long range bombardments and bombing attacks.
Strong naval or combined attacks would appear to have been far
less costly than the terrible losses of the Flanders offensive which
had for one of its most important objects the seizure of the Bel-
gian bases.
Even with strongly organized counter-blows, it must be recog-
nized that some of our control forces must be used for defensive
purposes, notably escort duty. Such forces have a tendency to
grow to an abnormal and unnecessary size, as did our coastal
forces in the World War, which were useless and costly from both
naval and economic viewpoints. A special effort must be made to
keep such forces to an absolute minimum in the next war.
XVIII. Support of Our Economic Forces. Our third mission
in the group affecting the economic forces is that of assisting our
economic forces. This can be accomplished along two general
lines:
a) By using direct naval or military operations to obtain raw
material or to open up a route for the delivery of finished material.
b) By cooperation with the economic forces in their develop-
ment, maintenance, and operation.
The first line of action is a function of the detached and control
forces. On several occasions during the war military detached
forces were used for the purpose of obtaining raw material. One
example was the German expedition into the Ukraine to obtain
wheat. The necessity for obtaining food and oil was one of the
main reasons for the German offensive against Roumania, although
the primary reason was to destroy the Roumanian army and
shorten the front. This campaign also opened up the Danube as
a line of communications. One reason for the attack on the Dar-
danelles was to obtain food from Russia. The German Navy
assisted in the building of the U-Deutschland, which obtained val-
uable raw material in the United States.


  p. 1370 (#288)                      #

1370
(Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
Two of the main currents in the World War developed from
the necessity for opening up routes for the delivery of finished
material to allied nations temporarily cut off by enemy forces and
neutral nations from their source of supply. These were:
a) The efforts of Germany to supply Turkey which resulted in
von Mackensen's drive through Serbia and the establishment of
a direct line of communication from Berlin to Constantinople.
b) The attempts of France and Great Britain to supply Russia
through the Dardanelles, the White Sea, Vladivostok and the
Baltic.
A most interesting series of attempts was made by the Germans
to supply their forces in East Africa, including one long airship
flight.
The second line of action is a function of the administrative
bureaus and officers of the War and Navy Departments. We of
the Army and Navy depend to a great extent upon the backing
which the economic forces give us. They can only be properly
developed and maintained for war purposes if we assist them with
our cooperation. The following are some of the lines along which
we can help:
a) By assisting the development of our industrial system dur-
ing peacetime. In the past we have done very much to assist our
steel, engineering, electrical, shipbuilding and other activities,
which are essential to us in war. This assistance should be both
technical and financial. Churchill takes great pride in having kept
alive the Coventry Ordnance Works, which comprised one third of
England's capacity for making guns, by assigning them contracts
in 1913.
b) By determining in advance the requirements of the army
and navy and having tentative contracts arranged to be filled at the
declaration of war. Von Tirpitz had made arrangements before
the World War by which the usual peacetime contractors would
be required greatly to increase their contracts in the event of war
during the period of their effectiveness.
c) By cooperation in purchases between the army and navy
and other governmental departments.
d) By deciding in advance the merchant vessels to be allotted
to the army and navy. The navy preferably should operate all
such ships.


  p. 1371 (#289)                      #

1925)
1371
National Strategy
e) By so regulating the draft procedure that there will be the
most suitable distribution of the nation's manpower among the
armed and economic forces.
f) By eliminating unnecessary demands upon the economic
forces.
g) By endeavoring to reduce the dislocation of our peacetime
industries insofar as possible, so our business prosperity will con-
tinue.
Finally, we must again remember the tremendous strain that war
makes upon our economic forces, and that it is not only our mis-
sion to win the war, but to win it as quickly as possible and with
the least drain on our economic forces. This is particularly the
case in a war of exhaustion which is prolonged to such an extent
that the victors are little better off than the vanquished. Rather
than prolong a war to such an extent, where only a Pyrrhic vic-
tory can be won, it is considered proper to force a decision even
if our chances of victory are thereby somewhat reduced. In other
words, we should never be satisfied to win a war as the World
War was won. An alliance with practically double the fighting
forces and economic resources of its enemy should not be content
to win by mere exhaustion after over four years of the costliest
national effort.
XIX. Operations Affecting the Political Forces. The de-
tached and control forces are available for a third general class of
operations, those affecting the political forces. Such operations
usually at the same time exert political pressure upon the enemy,
resist the pressure of the enemy armed forces on our political
forces, and assist our political forces in the execution of their war
mission. Incidentally, they involve contact with the enemy armed
and economic forces, but these are not their primary objectives.
In the first place, it must be distinctly recognized that the field
armies and battle fleet should not be used directly for political
purposes. Their mission is to win their respective campaigns and
by doing so they will indirectly create the greatest political in-
fluence. The Kaiser would not allow the high seas fleet to accom-
plish its only legitimate mission by engaging the grand fleet,
reserving it for use as a "political instrument.” It accomplished
nothing along these lines, but as a "naval instrument,” it might


  p. 1372 (#290)                      #

1372
[Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
then, and later did, have important effects on the course of the war.
The use of military and naval forces for political effect is usually
justifiable only when comparatively small forces are required to
accomplish this mission. It is extremely dangerous to detach large
forces from duty against the main forces of the enemy, where it
is known that they will have a definite military or naval effect, in
order to influence a very uncertain political situation, where they
may have no effect or even an unfavorable one. An example of
this was General Townshend's attack on Bagdad, which was made
mostly for political effect. Had he been successful great political
results would have been won, but when, despite his brilliant leader-
ship and the bravery of his troops, his entire detachment was cap-
tured at Kut, this produced exactly the opposite effect and the
British became involved in operations on a large scale in an un-
important theater of war. In general, forces may be used in the
following ways for political effect :
a) To induce a neutral nation to enter the war on our side or
to prevent one from joining the enemy.
b) To incite revolts or create disturbance in the enemy country.
c) To occupy enemy territory to improve our claims at the peace
conference.
d) To improve the political situation by winning some minor
but striking success of little actual military or naval importance.
XX. The W’inning of Neutral Support.- Naturally, the first
class of operations is by far the most important and here we will
often find great opportunities for winning important results with
small forces. In the World War we have the classic example of
the Goeben and Breslau ; these two ships contributed greatly to the
entry of Turkey into the war in accordance with her secret treaty
of August 2, 1914; they won a political victory which indirectly
liad as important results from military and naval viewpoints as
could have been gained by a succession of great battles. Turkey
and later Bulgaria held in play well over a million allied troops,
whose supply strained the transportation service and its protective
forces to the utmost limit.
One of the greatest problems of the British political forces was
to bring Italy into the war. That they should have been able to
accomplish this at the very time the Russians were being so badly


  p. 1373 (#291)                      #

19251
1373
National Strategy
beaten on the eastern front was a great feat; the British armed
forces used two measures to support their political forces :
a) The landing attack on the Gallipoli Peninsula to induce Italy
to enter the war in time for her share in the partition of Turkey.
b) The agreement to support the Italian Navy with four sec-
ond-line battleships and supplementary light forces, to increase its
chances of controlling the Adriatic.
The Gallipoli attack was also designed partly for its political
effect on Greece, Bulgaria and Roumania; had it succeeded the
Balkan states would have joined the Allies ; even its partial suc-
cess induced Greece to offer to join in the military operations, but
this advantage was vetoed by Russia in the strongest terms. When
the attack failed, Bulgaria could no longer be held back, and even
the offer of 200,000 troops to assist Roumania could not affect
her neutral attitude at this critical time. When later she was won
over, this proved to be to the advantage of Germany rather than
the Allies.
The agreement of Germany and Austria to support Bulgaria
with eleven divisions led by a famous general was instrumental in
inducing her to join the central powers.
Another political reason for the Dardanelles operation was to
further the British policy of giving encouragement to Russia by
winning Constantinople for her. But even in this respect the
political effect was opposite that intended, for when the British
failed when so near their goal the German propaganda service im-
planted the idea in Russia that the British had abandoned the
expedition to avoid having to turn Constantinople over to the
Russians according to the agreement.
XXI. The Incition of Revolts in Enemy Countries. It has
always been a principle of war to stir up portions of the enemy
population to revolt by furnishing the discontented elements with
troops and supplies. France, in her wars with Great Britain,
always endeavored to land troops in Scotland and Ireland. While
not formally at war with Great Britain during the first part of
the Revolutionary War, her assistance of the American Colonies
was meant as an indirect blow at Great Britain, and when that
country was deeply involved, France entered the war.


  p. 1374 (#292)                      #

1374
(Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
In the World War it proved more difficult to incite revolts by
the use of military and naval forces; secret agents and propaganda
proved more successful. A German submarine and auxiliary were
used for landing the leaders and supplies for the Irish revolt of
Easter, 1916; the U-35 was instrumental in inducing the Senussi
tribesmen to revolt in Egypt by carrying a Turkish mission and
towing two boats loaded with military supplies for their use; small
British detachments induced the Arabian tribes to throw off their
Turkish allegiance and to operate with the British during the
Palestine campaign.
XXII. The Seizure of Enemy Territory. In most wars in
which an early decision is not reached, attempts are often made by
expeditionary forces, assisted by attached naval forces, to seize
enemy territory for the purpose of retaining such territory per-
manently or of trading it for other considerations at the peace con-
ference. It was in this way that Great Britain built up her empire
at the expense of Spain, Holland, France and Germany. In the
World War there was in addition the element of competition in
the seizure of outlying territory by the allied nations, as it was
realized possession would determine the allotment of the territory
at the peace conference. The seizure of German territory also
served the useful purpose of denying naval bases to the enemy
cruisers at large.
XXIII. Minor Operations for Political Effect.—Sometimes it
is justifiable to use small forces for the purpose of carrying out
an operation which will have a great political effect. Although the
U-Deutschland was sent to the United States for economic rea-
sons primarily, it was such a spectacular feat that it increased
German prestige in our country. The U-53 was doubtlessly sent
to Newport for political effect. Its remarkable cruise, however,
probably had an effect opposite to that intended. The cruise of
the U-51 to Constantinople and the subsequent sinking of two
British battleships had a great political effect. The sinking of the
Goliath by a Turkish destroyer manned by Germans indirectly
caused an open break in the British War Council as a result of
Fisher's ultimatum on the withdrawal of the Queen Elizabeth.
The sending of our first division to France was largely for po-
litical effect.


  p. 1375 (#293)                      #

1925)
1375
National Strategy
The sentimental value of taking Jerusalem, Bagdad and Da-
mascus probably was one of the minor reasons for undertaking
these operations.
We must remember that operations for political effect are only
justified when they can be undertaken by small forces; however,
there are usually opportunities for such action and in many cases
they will be very profitable.
XXIV. Cooperation Between the Army and Navy.—In a
prosecution of a war along the above lines, it is absolutely essential
that there be effective and constant cooperation between the army
and navy. During peacetime we possess such a means of coordina-
tion of effort in the Joint Board and Joint Planning Committee.
In wartime, by the addition of other officers, these organizations
can be readily transformed into a joint staff for directing the op-
erations of the military and naval forces along parallel lines, where
they can afford each other constant mutual support. This pooling
of the combined resources of our Army and Navy will give us an
inestimable advantage over an opponent who operates his army
and navy along entirely separate lines, as was so frequently the
case in the World War.
The Secretaries of War and Navy should be members of a de-
fense council for the purpose of coordinating the maintenance
and preparation of the armed, economic and political forces during
peacetime and their operation during war.
XXV. The Primary Mission and Composition of the Economic
Forces.--The primary mission of the economic forces is to sup-
port the armed forces. In order to do this they must be built up
during peacetime in such a way that they can be mobilized quickly
to meet war conditions. When war comes the greater part of the
economic forces should continue their normal peacetime activities
so as to carry on the national life. A lesser part must be converted
to such war use as may be necessary. In some cases entire indus-
tries must be devoted to war purposes and even greatly augmented,
but in no case should there be a greater dislocation of our economic
forces than is absolutely necessary, for this reduces our financial
stability. An extreme case appears in the wars for Dutch inde-
pendence when Dutch merchant vessels continually traded with
the enemy and even transported Spanish troops; the Dutch author-
ities sanctioned and even encouraged this unusual form of trad-


  p. 1376 (#294)                      #

1376
(Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
ing with the enemy because they believed it the only means by
which they could earn sufficient money to carry on the war.
The economic forces are principally composed of the following:
a) Mining industries, particularly for coal, oil, iron and copper.
b) Manufacturing industries, particularly for munitions, equip-
ment, clothing, machinery, motor cars and airplanes.
c) Overseas transportation services.
d) Inland transportation services, including railways, inland
and coastwise shipping, motor and possibly even air transportation.
c) Shipbuilding industries, for both naval and merchant vessels.
f) Communication services, including radio, cables, telegraphs,
telephones, mail.
g) Financial system.
h) Agricultural system.
i) Commercial system, including its foreign connections.
j) Scientific organizations.
k) Medical profession.
XXVI. Uses of the Economic Forces in the W’orld War.-
There were many familiar examples in the World War of the way
in which these great national industries, systems and organizations
afforded indispensable assistance to the armed forces.
The Germans used to advantage the coal and iron mines of occu-
pied French territory; the oil fields of Roumania, although de-
stroyed by the British, were reopened in time by the Germans to
give them some much needed fuel. Before the war the British
had been able to design the Queen Elizabeth class to burn oil only
by reason of the Admiralty's investment of large sums of money
in the Anglo-Persian Oil Company.
After the first part of the war had demonstrated the inability of
the War Office to furnish sufficient munitions, a special ministry
was formed for this purpose and by mobilizing all the manufactur-
ing plants in England and even many of those in the United States
it was able to supply ammunition and guns on such a scale that
the pressure upon the German armies was greatly increased. In
our country the development of standard designs for airplane
engines, motor trucks and machine guns allowed us to turn out
great quantities of such equipment and simplified both its pro-
cluction and operation. However, the decision on the standard


  p. 1377 (#295)                      #

1925]
1377
National Strategy
design caused considerable delay, and in a future war we should
have the designs ready in advance. The Germans even went so far
as to form an auxiliary service and finally to draft illegally Bel-
gian workmen to assist in its operation.
The British mercantile marine was used for assisting all the
national forces in the World War. Under the supervision of the
navy it made possible the concentration of the field army in France,
it transported expeditionary forces over great distances to their
objectives and maintained their long lines of transportation during
extended campaigns. It assisted in the transport of our army to
France. It transported fuel and supplies for the British navy and
raw and finished material for the other economic forces.
The inland transportation services were also of the greatest
assistance to the armed forces. Not only did they provide supplies
for the field armies, but they contributed directly to many German
successes by the rapid transfer of troops from one front to another
or along lateral lines of communication behind the front in order
to effect a concentration for a break-through. So important were
strategic railways considered that before the war France loaned
large sums to Russia for the purpose of building up the lines of
communications in the Warsaw salient. These so greatly accel-
erated the Russian mobilization and strategic deployment on the
East Prussian frontier that France was repaid many times over
for her financial aid, even though the loans themselves are never
recovered from the Russian government.
The shipbuilding industry played an important part in the first
part of the war in completing the ships under construction and in
rushing through emergency building programs. The British had
detailed plans prepared for completing their ships under construc-
tion and as these ships joined the fleet its margin over the enemy
was so increased that the chances of the Germans winning a de-
cisive feet action were decreased to almost a negligible quantity.
As soon as these ships were completed, work was started on the
Fisher emergency program comprising ships especially designed
for the duties of the control forces. Later in the war the sub-
marine offensive was countered only by using all the facilities of
the British and American shipbuilding industries for building anti-
submarine craft and merchant vessels to replace those destroyed.


  p. 1378 (#296)                      #

1378
[Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
On the other hand, practically the entire German shipbuilding
industry was used for the production of submarines.
The various communication services were mostly taken over by
the armed forces and proved of the greatest utility for military
and naval operations and for economic purposes; they also were
of assistance to the political forces, particularly the propaganda
systems. Censorship of all forms of communications became a
recognized war duty and it furnished us with much valuable in-
formation in addition to preventing intelligence from reaching the
enemy.
The principal duty of the financial systems of the warring na-
tions was to obtain the funds for the great expenses incurred by
the armed forces and that portion of the economic forces devoted
to war purposes. One of the surprises of the war was the re-
markable strength of the financial forces, despite the predictions
that the cost of the war would bankrupt the nations in six months.
In no case could defeat be attributed to the failure of the financial
systems. It was only after the war that the finances collapsed,
and this was due partly to other causes.
Due to the British food blockade of Germany and the German
submarine blockade of England, agriculture assumed for a time
almost a decisive importance. The failure of the German potato
crop was as great a loss as a defeat on the fighting front. All
Germany was organized for producing food and Russian prisoners
were utilized to great advantage for work in the fields. All occu-
pied territory was cultivated, and frequently troops were used for
gathering crops. Leaves of absence were granted as far as possible
at the harvest time. In addition, rationing organizations were
formed for the distribution of food. Other countries were forced
to follow Germany's example.
The commercial system played an important part in the pur-
chase of supplies and equipment for the armed forces. Connec-
tions in neutral countries proved most important, particularly for
the British who used our country as a source of supplies almost
as effectively, except for price regulation, as though it were their
own territory. Their hold on our economic resources was so
strong that it was only with the utmost secrecy that nickel and
copper could be obtained for the cargoes of the U-Deutschland.
The British commercial organization throughout the world was a
marvel of efficiency, which is worthy of close study.


  p. 1379 (#297)                      #

1925]
1379
National Strategy
All countries found their scientific organizations of the great-
est utility in the invention and design of new instruments of war-
ſare. In addition, the German scientists showed ingenuity in
developing substitute materials to take the place of those cut off by
the blockade.
The possession of a large and efficient medical profession is of
incalculable advantage in wartime. In those countries which had
this advantage, the armies were able to keep their effectives very
high, due to the elimination of sickness and the return of the
wounded to the ranks, while the Balkan nations on the other hand
lost great numbers through sickness and had almost no provision
for caring for the wounded.
XXVII. Minor Missions of the Economic Forces. In addi-
tion to their main mission, the economic forces can perform other
minor functions in war:
a) Resistance to the armed forces, as in the case of the passive
resistance of the Belgians to the Germans and the organized resist-
ance of the German workmen and industrial leaders backed by the
government in the Ruhr. Such resistance has the grave defect
that it weakens our economic forces by the cessation of work.
b) Aggressive action against the enemy economic forces, as, for
example, the black-listing of neutral firms for trading with the
enemy, the refusal to furnish neutral ships with bunker coal un-
less they agree not to trade with the enemy, and an embargo on the
export of coal to neutral nations unless they furnish supplies in
return or agree not to furnish the enemy with supplies.
c) Assistance of our political forces, as, for example, the Anglo-
French loan negotiated in the United States, which welded a
powerful political tie between us and the leading allied nations ;
the war loans to neutral nations granted by the British, which
were practically subsidies for their participation in the war; our
war loans to the allied nations which renewed their political
strength at a critical period.
XXVIII. Organization of the Economic Forces. In order to
operate the economic forces there are needed: personnel, raw
material, money, and transportation. The allotment of these facil-
ities involves many difficult and conflicting considerations and must
be determined on a basis of priority by the defense council, one
member of which should be the "Economic Administrator,” who


  p. 1380 (#298)                      #

1380
(Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
should have the wartime command of all the national economic
forces.
It is extremely important that the war organization of our eco-
nomic forces be worked out at least along its general lines during
peacetime, so that upon the declaration of war the necessary por-
tions of the economic forces can be mobilized into a great national
organization for carrying out their war mission, while the re-
mainder, so far as possible, carry on the national life of the
country as during peacetime. We will in this way avoid the
uncoordinated efforts of the World War, when our economic or-
ganization was built up little by little without any comprehensive
plan. If we did generally very effective work under this organiza-
tion, how much more could we have accomplished had real eco-
nomic war plans have been available at the declaration of war.
The economic administrator should supervise during war the
Departments of Treasury, Commerce, Agriculture, Labor, Interior
and Justice; the senior cabinet officer of this group should serve
as acting administrator during peacetime and should be responsible
for the preparation of the economic war plans.
Upon the declaration of war it will be necessary to appoint as
administrator one of the leading organizers and business men of
the country who has had wide experience along these lines. Pre-
ferably he should be familiar with military, naval and political
affairs. Roosevelt would have been an ideal man for this duty in
the World War.
XXIX. The Missions and Organization of the Political Forces.
The principal missions of the political forces are:
a) To attack directly the morale of the enemy nation.
b) To raise the morale of our own country.
c) To influence neutral nations to our advantage.
In former times the principal duty of our political forces was to
influence a small number of powerful individuals; our diplomatic
service was sufficient for that purpose.
Now that an entire population as well as the government must
be influenced, a propaganda service is formed to support our diplo-
matic service and to exert political influence over a wider field.
The propaganda service works both publicly and privately hand
in hand with the diplomatic service. It acts publicly through the


  p. 1381 (#299)                      #

1925)
1381
National Strategy
medium of news agencies, newspapers, publishing companies
magazines and books; privately, it acts through our educational
and religious systems and social, political, labor and fraternal or-
ganizations.
In the same way that our armed and economic forces must be
built up and prepared during peacetime so must our political forces
be used in peacetime in preparing the ground for their war meas-
ures. The political campaigns should be as carefully planned and
prepared as those of the economic and armed forces.
XXX. Attacks on the Enemy Morale.--In attacking the mo-
rale of the enemy nation we have two general methods :
a) To work secretly against selected individuals or organiza-
tions.
b) To attack publicly the enemy nation as a whole.
In any nation there are weak spots. These may consist of either
influential individuals or groups of people, whose actions weaken
the government through mistaken idealism or deliberate defection
stirred up by past grievances. The encouragement of these in-
dividuals or groups in their opposition to the enemy government is
a delicate question. Often no action is necessary or even desirable,
for their action is hostile to the enemy government rather than
friendly to ours.
Formerly it was easier to cause the defection of influential men
than in the present era. Philip of Macedon used to say that no city
could hold out against him into which he could drive an ass laden
with gold. In the age of mercenary troops treachery was of quite
common occurrence; it was also prevalent in revolutions, there
being familiar examples in the American and French revolutions ;
it also occurs in times of great national disaster, where a great
nation falls before its enemies; notable examples are Talleyrand
in 1814 and certain Germans in 1918; these traitors had little
difficulty in winning over other persons whose resolution had been
broken by military defeats; one may read in the memoirs of the
Crown Prince of the complete moral breakdown of the German
Great Headquarters at Spa in November, 1918, similar in every
detail to that of Napoleon's at Fontainebleau.
But, except at the actual breakdown of nations, when the sauve
qui peut begins, there were very few people of any importance


  p. 1382 (#300)                      #

1382
[Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
whose actions weakened the morale of their own countries; Ger-
many had its Lichnowsky and Liebknecht; France its Caillaux,
Merrheim, Faure and Hubert; only Austria and Bulgaria afforded
numerous examples of defection.
Our secret propaganda can also be directed with effect against
some selected minorities in enemy countries. This usually is a
racial minority. Thus the Germans selected the Poles and the
Irish as the objectives of their intrigues; the French, the Alsa-
tians; the Russians, the Czechs; the Serbians, the people of Bosnia
and the Banat; the Italians, the Austrian citizens of Italian de-
scent; the British, the Arabs. The Bolsheviks worked through
the German Communist party and undermined the very founda-
tions of the German Empire. The French pacifists about ruined
France in 1917. In some way, possibly through our representative
at Sofia, the Bulgarian army was won over, so that the five divi-
sions on the front attacked by the Allies marched home without
making any resistance.
It was expected that the religious, political, labor and fraternal
organizations of international scope would be an important means
for influencing enemy nations, but the national spirit was so strong
that it broke all such ties. Even the relationship of monarchs,
despite reports at the time, had surprisingly little effect.
To work publicly against the enemy nation as a whole we have
two general methods of operation :
a) Official statements of our political and military leaders.
b) Organized propaganda in newspapers and magazines.
The first method was usually employed to detach the people from
their governments. It was used by the Germans in their various
peace offensives to show that the Central Powers wished peace
and that the allied governments were responsible for the prolonga-
tion of the war. It was used even more effectively by President
Wilson who induced the Germans to depose their own leaders and
bring about the downfall of their Empire by creating the impres-
sion that once a republic was formed the German people would
be treated with great consideration; meanwhile the Fourteen
Points found their way into the scrap-basket, as they could not
well remain on the table along with the Treaty of Versailles.
While official reports of military and naval operations are mostly
for the purpose of raising the morale of our own people, they


  p. 1383 (#301)                      #

1925]
1383
National Strategy
should, if practicable, also be utilized for breaking the confidence
of the enemy nation, care being taken that they remain strictly
truthful, so as not to induce overconfidence in our own people.
The German reports were so effectively drawn that, according to
Repington, their publication was prohibited in Great Britain.
The second method, that of using propaganda controlled by the
government, is used principally for breaking the confidence of the
enemy in victory. As this is meant for publication in enemy and
neutral countries and has not the official stamp of approval it is
not so necessary to keep strictly to the truth. This method includes:
a) Exaggeration of the effect of battles. A Somme, a Flanders,
or even a Jutland can be manufactured into a victory. A remark-
able opportunity was afforded to make Pyrrhic tactical victories in
Mesopotamia and the Palestine into great strategic successes.
Much was made of the retreat of the Germans to the Hindenburg
line, although this really strengthened the German position and
had much to do with the total breakdown of the allied offensives
of 1917.
b) The exaggeration of enemy losses, in order to create the im-
pression that the enemy leaders are ruthlessly sacrificing their
troops. The allied propaganda along these lines was most effective,
although now we see that the charge could be made against their
own commanders rather than the German generals.
c) The exaggeration of our reinforcements and new equipment
being prepared. This was a constant feature of our wartime
propaganda. Despite the fact that few of these predictions—as,
for instance, those about aircraft and eagle boats—ever material-
ized, they doubtless had their effect on the enemy; it seems to be
a human failing to think continually of what the enemy can do to
you rather than what you can do to the enemy.
XXXI. Measures to Raise the Morale of Our People. The
second mission of our political forces is to raise the morale of our
own people. This can be accomplished:
a) By working privately through various civil organizations.
b) By public official statements and organized propaganda.
c) By taking appropriate action against unpatriotic individuals
and organizations.
In our country splendid work was done during the last war to
raise the morale of our people by all our civil organizations. Our


  p. 1384 (#302)                      #

1384
(Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
educational system always provides a means for building up a
spirit of patriotism during peacetime and in these days of pacifism
particular attention should be given to training our youth in love
of our country. Our religious systems also form a potent means
of raising the morale of our people and during the war their work
was very effective along these lines; it is to be hoped that our re-
ligious organizations will continue to exert all their efforts in en-
couraging patriotism and love of country. During the World War
all of our social, political, labor and fraternal organizations used
their powerful influences correctly, but some minor political and
labor organizations are now centers of defection.
In wartime great countries usually have one or more great
leaders whose public statements in time of defeat or even despair
can rally their nations once more behind them. Thus time and
time again the Germans rallied behind the towering figure of Hin-
denburg and perhaps could even have been rallied at the very end
had not the exhaustion of four years' struggle finally worn down
the moral strength of their leader himself. Even in the darkest
hours of 1918 the fighting spirit of Clemenceau, who so typified his
people, kept the French to their task. President Wilson, during
wartime, had a remarkable influence over his people, and his de-
cision to draft a large army for use in France-a decision which
decided the war—was accepted without the slightest opposition by
the nation at large. In the first months of the war Lord Roberts,
Kitchener and Fisher raised the fighting spirit of the British to the
highest degree and the people accepted without question all their
decisions for throwing all the nation's strength into the struggle.
All publicity connected with the war should be controlled by the
propaganda service and handled in accordance with correct prin-
ciples. It must be realized that untruthfulness is a dangerous ex-
pedient and that such propaganda may be a two-edged sword,
which may injure us more than the enemy. Thoughtless action
on our part may needlessly embitter the enemy or create over-
confidence in our country. It is strongly believed that the course
of the war should be truthfully described to our people. When we
start concealing defeats and publishing fictitious victories we take
a dangerous course. In the first place, this tends to make our
people overconfident and to believe that all is going well, whereas
in fact a dangerous situation may exist. In the second place, un-


  p. 1385 (#303)                      #

1925]
1385
National Strategy
truthful statements are usually detected in the end and this under-
mines the people's confidence in the government and will lead them
to suspect future official statements; furthermore, if the situation
should continue to grow worse, there will come a time when this
will have to be disclosed and then the issuing of bad news which
has been accumulating for a long period will be a great shock to
the people and a heavy blow at their morale; thus the British
people were entirely unprepared for the news of the German
break-through of March 21, 1918. Where a great crisis or battle
is imminent, it is entirely correct to conceal the news of some minor
defeats, which may be wiped out by the coming engagement,
A measure frequently employed during war is to accuse the
enemy of committing inhuman atrocities; this is almost always a
resort of a defeated army; it is seldom used by a victorious one.
This, it is true, is extremely effective in instilling our people with
hatred for the enemy, but it is the lowest form of warfare; if
submarine warfare and poison gas are to be prohibited, how much
more should be this treacherous and underhanded attack, which
poisons the minds of entire populations and causes unspeakable
bitterness for years to come. If such propaganda embitters our
nation against the enemy it likewise causes equal hatred in the
enemy nation for us. Regardless of the truth of the charges made
the nation with the most effective propaganda will win this in-
famous campaign. Furthermore, it should be remembered that
these attacks are made on our own profession and that they may
react against us in future years.
During the World War such effective action was taken in our
country against disloyal or unpatriotic citizens or residents that
they were unable to accomplish anything of importance; we were
far superior to all the European nations in this respect.
XXXII. Measures to Influence Neutral Nations. The great-
est field for the use of our political forces is that of the neutral
nations. From the start of the war both British and Germans
started political campaigns with this end in view. The diplomatic
service was in the main employed in this campaign, but it was sup-
ported most effectively by the propaganda service and assisted by
the armed and economic forces. In general, the European nations
were swayed by two ideas:
a) Which side would make the best offer.


  p. 1386 (#304)                      #

1386
[Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
b) What were the chances of actually getting the territory or
other considerations offered.
To take an example, the Allies could freely offer Italy large
slices of Austrian and Turkish territory. They could back up
their diplomatic offers to the government by converting the people
at the same time by their propaganda. They could offer Italy
assistance by their armed and economic forces. The Allies also
appeared to have the best chances of victory. On the other hand,
Germany could not induce Austria to cede much territory to its
hereditary enemy; their propaganda was less effective and they
could furnish little assistance with their armed and economic
forces; as a consequence the Germans were fortunate to keep Italy
neutral until their Russian campaign was well under way. They
were also able to keep Italy from formally declaring war on Ger-
many and continued to get many essential materials.
In Bulgaria, on the other hand, the Germans held the trump
cards. They could freely offer Serbian territory, which, hy
Churchill's admission, was rightly Bulgarian. They even induced
their ally—Turkey—to cede immediately a small but important
slice of land. They could offer strong military and economic as-
sistance and could point to their Russian successes and the British
failure at the Dardanelles as proof of their certainty of winning.
As they knew Bulgaria would never enter a war against the United
States, the Germans, especially, stopped the submarine campaign
for this reason. Their one failure was the maintenace of the
United States diplomatic service at Sofia after we entered the war;
this gave us an unrivalled opportunity for propaganda.
The United States was in a different category from the Euro-
pean nations. We wanted nothing for ourselves and would enter
the war either :
a) To assist the side which had our strong moral sympathy in
case it should appear to be in serious danger of losing the war.
b) To resist the illegal action of one of the warring nations.
In the first case it was entirely a question of our sympathy. In
the second it was partly a question of the gravity of the offense and
partly one of sympathy. We would undoubtedly have permitted
Great Britain and France to commit greater breaches of inter-
national law than would have been permitted to Germany. Thus


  p. 1387 (#305)                      #

1925]
1387
National Strategy
the one really important matter was to win our sympathies. The
Allies were certain to win the propaganda game in the United
States, because:
a) The British have always been head and shoulders above the
rest of the nations in diplomacy and propaganda. Their whole
history is based on their ability to win over neutral nations to their
side and to form coalitions against the leading continental power.
Their diplomacy and propaganda were the chief weapons which a
century ago brought down Napoleon. On the other hand, with
the exception of Bismarck, the German diplomacy has always been
clumsy, and their propaganda, while perhaps suited for Russians
and the Balkan people, caused such adverse results in the United
States that it had to be stopped entirely. Von Bernstorff alone
seems to have had some understanding of our character and he
undoubtedly did exceptionally good work until his government,
by the decision to commence again the submarine offensive, took
the matter out of his hands.
b) The British had the advantage that many of our most in-
Auential people made a habit of residing for long periods in France
and England and as a consequence strongly favored those coun-
tries. In addition, the British held all the trump cards for their
propaganda. The power who acts on the offensive, while having
all the military advantages, unfortunately has many political dis-
advantages. As he is the invader, it is easy to prove that he is
also the aggressor. It is easy to allege atrocities by the invader
which it is impossible for him to disprove. In addition, the Ger-
mans, while not generally a military race, were of recent years
considerably dominated by military leaders, and our dislike of
everything military, even reasonable readiness for war, placed the
Germans under a grave disadvantage. Finally, the British were
able to take advantage of several incidents of no real importance,
but which when presented with their usual skill for effect, had a
remarkable propaganda value.
c) The British had the great advantage of a common language
which facilitated their propaganda, while all German propaganda
had to be translated and republished.
d) The British had the advantage of cable and radio communi-
cations, as well as the mail, while the Germans had to rely on a
few radio stations.


  p. 1388 (#306)                      #

1388
(Aug
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
It must be realized that it is not necessarily an advantage to
bring a nation into the war on our side. It was probably an ad-
vantage for Germany-disguised at first it is true—when Rou-
mania entered the war on the opposite side. On the other hand
the Germans believed that we were serving the allied cause as much
while we remained neutral as we could if we entered the war. This
certainly was a mistake which cost them dearly. Had they delayed
the announcement of the submarine campaign until the beginning
of the Russian revolution, they would have seen that it was un-
necessary to win the war; in that case we would not have entered
the war at all, or if so we would probably have delayed until it
was too late to prevent a German victory.
XXXIII. Organisation of the Political Forces.- For the po-
litical forces to exert their greatest influence it is necessary that
all the various forms of our diplomacy and propaganda be care-
fully coordinated; usually propaganda which is suited for under-
mining the confidence of the enemy or winning the sympathy of
a neutral nation is of far too exaggerated a nature to use for our
own population, which must be told honestly the true state of
affairs. In the same way we will not wish the actual conditions
to be known to neutral nations or to the enemy country. As an
example, British leadership had to shoulder the blame for the ter-
rible losses of the Flanders offensive of 1917; this was made
largely to draw the attention of the Germans away from the
French army, whose morale was so far broken that British writers
now admit that the situation throughout 1917 after the Aisne
offensive was the most critical of the whole war, not even except-
ing 1918. At that time, however, the true facts about the French
army could not be revealed to anyone, because it would soon have
become known to the Germans, probably with disastrous effect ;
the skill with which such a large secret was kept was most remark-
able, but as a result British leaders were strongly criticized for
the heavy losses of their troops.
In the World War the State Department, the Army, the Navy
and various other agencies were engaged in propaganda work; as
a result there was little coordination. Our political forces, includ-
ing all forms of propaganda, should be operated in accordance
with a definite system and a carefully thought out plan of cam-
paign. It would appear that the State Department is the agency


  p. 1389 (#307)                      #

1925)
1389
National Strategy
in our government best suited for operating the political forces
and that it should, after consultation with the other interested
departments, draw up the policies to guide our work and the
definite diplomatic and propaganda plans to attack the enemy mo-
rale, to raise the war spirit of our own people and to win the sym-
pathies of the important neutral nations. This should not prevent
the various agencies for spreading propaganda from engaging in
local work suited to their immediate needs, in the way that the
Germans undermined the morale of the Italian armies in the fall
of 1917, but whenever propaganda is of more than local importance
it should be coordinated with the general plan of the State De-
partment.
XXXIV. The Defense Council.-In order effectively to direct
the armed, economic and political forces in proper coordination so
as to create the greatest national effort, a defense council should
be charged with the conduct of the war under the direction of the
President, who is the commander-in-chief of all our forces. The
Secretaries of State, War and Navy and the economic administra-
tor should be the only members of the council. The disadvantages
of a larger council are most feelingly shown by Churchill in his
description of the conduct of the war by the British War Council
in the latter part of 1915.
In important conferences the council will be presided over by
the President. When desirable, members should bring their assist-
ants to conferences; this should apply particularly to the chief of
the General Staff and the chief of Naval Operations. Where
special situations are to be discussed the officers who have made
the closest study of them and are most familiar with their possi-
bilities should be allowed to express their opinions and present
their recommendations.
There should be in addition a defense council staff composed of
persons nominated by the members of the council. This staff
should draw the general plans and issue the orders for combined
operations based on the decisions of the council ; the staff should
be authorized to initiate proposals for combined operations and
make recommendations for the better coordination of the national
forces.
XXXV. Conclusion. In this paper the outline of the problem
of national strategy has alone been sketched. Each one of the


  p. 1390 (#308)                      #

1390
(Aug
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
various phases herein briefly indicated is worthy of a study in
itself. The proposals for a defense council and staff have indi-
cated merely the general ideas for the formation of these important
agencies, preferably by an expansion of the present Joint Board,
which has done so much to bring the Army and Navy together.
The details of its operation would have to be worked out in actual
practice. These agencies are just as important now in peace time
as in war; their formation agrees with the present demand of our
people for economy, because there is no doubt but that the opera-
tion of such agencies would greatly increase our national readiness
for war without added expense. A real coordination of our na-
tional forces in the next war will be worth many army corps and
battleships.
While one object of this paper has been to stress the increased
importance of the economic and political forces, it must still be re-
membered that the armed forces strongly predominate in war.
Furthermore, it is forces which attack which count; we want
armed forces which will be more than a First Line of Defense,
unless by this phrase we mean to insure defense by attack. We
must think of war as comprising attacks on the enemy, attacks in
his own waters, attacks to gain the control of waters which are
vital to him ; only by such operations can we decide the war in our
favor without bringing an excessive strain on our economic forces,
and justify the sums of money which are expended annually for
the maintenance of the armed forces.


  p. 1391 (#309)                      #

NOTES ON ADMINISTRATION OF INDUS-
TRIAL WORK IN NAVY YARDS
By CAPTAIN HENRY WILLIAMS (CC), U.S.N.
Motto: Cooperation and Courtesy are the Parents of Efficiency.
The world bestows its big prizes, both in money and honors, for but
one thing, and that is Initiative. What is Initiative? It is doing the right
thing without being told.
-ELBERT HUBBARD.
Cooperation.—The dictionary defines cooperation as concurrent
effort, or labor, to attain some particular result. In other words
as "working together." Obviously, the first object of any man-
agement is to organize the working force and administer the busi-
ness so as to obtain the largest measure of cooperation among the
members of the organization, among themselves and with the cus-
tomer. It is safe to say that the useful output of any organization
is measured directly by the amount of such cooperation. No or-
ganization, however efficient its individual members, or its gen-
eral arrangement, can succeed without full and free cooperation.
In a navy yard, with its varied functions, its numerous sub-
divisions and shops, cooperation is not easily secured. The conflict-
ing interests of the heads of the departments, heads of divisions,
shop masters, etc., are not always readily reconcilable. Inter-
ferences arise and work is delayed and costs increased unless com-
plete cooperation exists.
The securing of a proper system of organization is the first and
most essential step in the efforts for cooperation. Obviously, all
work must be under the active direction and control of one official,
who, in navy yards, is the manager, and under whom are placed
the industrial activities of the yard, including the labor force and
all facilities of productive shops and offices. The manager is the
industrial aid to the commandant and is charged with organizing
and administering the business allotted to him, that he may accom-
plish the desired result, which is, maximum service to the fleet.
Having in mind the mission of the navy yard, the manager must


  p. 1392 (#310)                      #

1392
[Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
indoctrinate the force under him with the necessity for complete
and unreserved cooperation. He must take measures to assist and
encourage such cooperation, making such physical dispositions of
offices, shops, and so forth, as may be necessary to bring the
closest contact possible among those who must work together.
Organization, however, is only an instrument of management.
Energetic, industrious personnel, actuated by a true cooperative
spirit, will accomplish more, even with poor organization, than a
perfect organization with personnel lacking in initiative and failing
to cooperate. Good management consists essentially in clearing
away obstructions and interferences and keeping them cleared
away so that every individual in the organization can do a day's
work with the maximum efficiency and, therefore, achieve the
maximum output. The matter of keeping obstructions cleared
away means constant and painstaking attention to an infinite num-
ber of details, because obstructions never remain cleared. This,
in turn, means industry, initiative, perseverance, intelligence, and
cooperative spirit on the part of all officers, from the manager
down, and of all supervisors. No amount of carefully prescribed
procedure can take the place of these qualities among the per-
sonnel.
It is of the utmost importance that the cooperation of the work-
ing force with the management and with each other be secured.
The prime requisite for this is for the management to set the
example by cooperating with the men in aiding them in securing
those things which contribute to their contentment and well being.
The principal point is to take all possible steps to keep employ-
ment steady, reduce labor turnover and eliminate, so far as may
be done, the ever present fear of discharge for lack of work. If
the management convinces the force that the best efforts are being
made to keep the force employed, the cooperation of the force to
complete work satisfactorily may be expected. The slogan to em-
ploy in this connection is obviously that, “The best way to get more
work is to do good work.” This has a direct appeal and is most
effective. An important element in securing the cooperation of the
working force is to keep it fully informed of plans for work in
hand and in prospect and what, in general, are the aims of the
management and the steps proposed to accomplish such aims. The
men should be given credit for their work when successful and


  p. 1393 (#311)                      #

1925)
1393
Industrial Work in Navy Yards
appreciation of good work should be expressed freely. The in-
terest of the people in the community should be secured in order
that the men may find among their friends and acquaintances an
understanding of their activity, and interest in the particular work
on which they are engaged. It is natural that a man wants to
discuss his day's work with his home people. If he finds an under-
standing of its importance and its difficulties, his own interest and
desire to make good increase.
It is of importance that the yard working force feel a pro-
prietary interest in the ships and their personnel, their well being,
movements, success in target practice, engineering competition,
and so forth. The idea should be instilled that navy yards are
intended for the service of the ships. The local press should be
encouraged to feature the ships at the yard and their activities
away from the yard. The purpose of major alterations and ex-
perimental installations should be explained as far as possible and
interest aroused in the outcome. Ships arriving at the yard should
be made welcome and the usual telephone, power, water and heat-
ing connections made promptly and without requiring from the
ships more than that they indicate their requirements. The con-
venience of the ships arriving and departing should be consulted,
rather than that of the yard.
At the Norfolk yard it has been possible to meet ships before
arrival for pre-repair trials and inspections and to explain to the
ships' people the plans for the prospective overhaul. The ob-
servance of these amenities assists the morale of the yard, as well
as that of the ships' people and contributes greatly to obtaining
cooperation.
The Customer Is Right.—It is a well-known rule in the commer-
cial world that the customer must be satisfied. Many of the most
successful stores have as a slogan the phrase quoted, “The cus-
tomer is right.” In navy yard work, this doctrine is of the great-
est value and contributes to securing the best and most effective
cooperation between the yard and the ships for which work is
being performed. There should be no argument if work is not
satisfactory to ships' officers and they should be informed that it
is the intention and desire of the yard to satisfy the requirements
of the ships. No one is authorized to find that ships' requirements
are unreasonable, except the commandant or the manager acting


  p. 1394 (#312)                      #

1394
[Aug
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
for him. The amount of work the yard can perform is, of course,
limited by funds available, date of completion and priority, fixed
by the Department. Ships are requested to furnish a list of work
desired by them in the order of importance. All work undertaken
must be completed to the satisfaction of the ship. Courteous
treatment and consideration of their wishes brings the greatest
possible reward in cooperation from the ships' people and in secur-
ing their good will. This is set forth strikingly in the following,
which was embodied in a wall card for display in all shops and
on all bulletin boards:
I am the payer of large dividends,
I am the foundation rock upon
Which is built that great asset-
Good Will.
No man is big enough, or small
Enough, to dispense with me,
I am inexpensive, all can have me-
I am Courtesy.
"It Will Be Done."—When something has to be done, the proper
attitude of mind is—“It will be done and how accomplish it to
the best advantage?" Personnel should be urged to find ways to
do things and not ways not to do them, and to bear in mind Ad-
miral McGowan's slogan during the war that a person saying
something cannot be done is interrupted, generally, by someone
doing it. During the war one of the repair ships overseas had a
sign over the gangway reading, “Yes, you can have it. What is
it?” The limitations of navy yards do not, by any means, permit
such liberal policy. However, the attitude should be that anything
required will be done so far as limitations permit. Above all,
yard personnel should not presume to argue with ships' people as
to whether or not they do need something, or to suggest that they
do not know their own minds. This does not prevent giving freely
of technical information and advice, but does leave to the ships the
decision as to what they desire to be accomplished.
Increasing Output of Force.-If every man in an organization
worked continually at the rate he is capable of working and does
actually work at times, the output of the force would be increased
many times over. It is not humanly possible to accomplish such a
result, but it is quite possible to secure a very marked increase in


  p. 1395 (#313)                      #

1925]
1395
Industrial Work in Navy Yards
the output by methods that readily are available. Many of these
have been referred to in other portions of these notes. One of
the simplest and most effective is to give the men concrete assur-
ance, by keeping plenty of work ahead, that they are not working
themselves out of a job. There should be more work in the yard
than the normal capacity of the force permits of accomplishing.
The average worker on a per diem status has in his mind always
the fear of losing his job. If there is not work in sight for him,
he will “nurse the job" that he is on. If, on the other hand, he is
satisfied in his own mind that there is plenty of work ahead for
him and that his job depends on the manner of performance of his
work, then his efficiency and output will increase. He will do
what he can to complete the job in hand as required.
Date of completion of overhaul of ships, delivery of manu-
factured articles, and so forth, must be rigidly observed. There
should be no compromise; ships' work should be completed and
vessels leave the yard on the date set. It is conceivable that con-
ditions will arise preventing meeting a date, but, it is surprising
how rarely this happens if the management is firm in not con-
sidering pleas for extension. It is surprising how activity of the
force on a job increases when the date of completion approaches
and how it slacks off if, for any reason, a date is extended.
Policy and Doctrine. It is of assistance to the officer and
civilian supervisory force to have in concrete form a statement of
the policy and doctrines of the yard and management. Such a
document assists in crystallizing ideas and guides the conduct of
personnel in their administration of business. The following
memorandum has been drafted and issued to the personnel of the
yard and has assisted materially in obtaining the proper cooperation
of the various persons affected:
The mission of the Norfolk Navy Yard is to make the maximum con-
tribution possible to material upkeep of the fleet, and to maintain an
organization and plant that will permit of the most effective expansion of
its activities in time of war. The location of this navy yard in the Port
of Norfolk, a most active and important east coast port, renders this latter
function of great importance, and it must be kept in mind in considering
questions which affect the yard plant and organization.
The doctrine of the yard based on the above conception of our mission
may be described briefly:
a) To maintain as high state of morale, efficiency and industry as
possible among officers and civilian employees.


  p. 1396 (#314)                      #

1396
[Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
b) To maintain, in the various trades, as uniform force as is possible
with the work to be performed and funds allotted by the Department. To
reduce labor turnover to the minimum possible.
c) To have sufficient work in prospect to give the yard force assurance
that they will not work themselves out of a job. The yard officials should
have as much interest in obtaining work for the yard as would be the case
in a private plant.
d) To distribute force in such a way as to meet the requirements of the
Department as to dates of completion of work and to observe scrupulously
the priority of work as fixed by the Department.
e) To keep outstanding in the yard more work than can be performed,
in order that each shop's task may be slightly in excess of its capacity
rather than less than its capacity.
f) To maintain the morale of the force by keeping them interested in
the work in hand and in prospect. To maintain loyalty among the working
force, to the yard and its interests, and to the management.
9) So to conduct relations with ship's people and others for whom work
is performed as to merit and obtain their good will. So to prosecute work
as to merit and obtain approval of those for whom work is performed.
This includes workmanship, cost, and manner of carrying on work and
administering the business connected with it.
The doctrine of the yard requires that the priority list issued by the
management, and based on the instructions of the Department, is the order
of work sheet and is binding on all yard personnel. Date of completion of
work once fixed or approved by the Department must be met, and no
action taken that might lead to delay in completion without prior approval
of the Department.
The doctrine of the yard requires that ship work be always of first
importance and that no work of a different character, such as work for
other government departments, be permitted even to appear to interfere.
Such work, however, when within the capacity of the force, is of great
importance, for the reason that it makes it possible for the yard to increase
its capacity for ship work by maintaining a more uniform and more skilled
force and better equipment, and by carrying a part of the yard's overhead
expense which otherwise would be paid from the appropriations for ships'
work. There is a considerable portion of fixed overhead expense which
does not change with the amount of work in the yard. This includes items
such as heating and lighting shops, pay of supervisory force, maintenance
of plant equipment, etc. Work other than ship work, in taking the regular
percentage of overhead, pays its share of such charges and so reduces the
amount charged to the appropriations for ship work.
The doctrine of the yard as regards manufacturing work requires all
possible reduction in costs of manufactured articles, so that funds allotted
to the fleet for maintenance be conserved to the greatest extent possible
and so contribute to the better material upkeep. For example, through


  p. 1397 (#315)                      #

1925]
1397
Industrial Work in Navy Yards
the manufacture of paint at a cost less than commercial prices, this yard
has reduced the cost of paints issued to ships by many thousands of dollars,
while insuring to them paints of highest quality and maximum effectiveness.
All of the money so saved becomes available to the ships for their better
upkeep in other particulars, and so is a direct contribution to the main-
tenance of the fleet.
The doctrine of the yard requires that material in excess of probable
requirements will not be manufactured. The stock of manufactured articles
should in no case be excessive, and, if for any reason an excess is in store,
all possible efforts will be made to dispose of the material to best advantage.
The doctrine of the yard in connection with manufacturing work re-
quires that invariably every effort must be made to meet engagements.
This means that there should be no departure from the specifications
except as duly authorized, that dates set for delivery should be met, and
above all that costs should not exceed the estimates. Much of this work
is obtained through the yard submitting estimates in competition with other
yards and private concerns. It is of the utmost importance in all such
cases that we meet our estimates, and that our product complies with the
specifications of the order.
The doctrine of the yard requires that the officers and employees be
kept informed of the conditions of work load, the work in prospect, and
the reasons. for requiring special attention to certain work. In general,
the yard employees and their public, that is the local community, should
be taken into the confidence of the management to the greatest possible extent.
The doctrine of the yard requires that the appreciation and commendation
of the management be expressed fully and freely when the results of the
work justify praise. Conversely, that full information as to any unsatis-
factory work be furnished with statement of the steps taken to obviate
recurrence. In private establishments appreciation of good work is ex-
pressed in terms of money bonus, advances in pay, etc. No such steps
being possible in a navy yard, recourse is to free expression of appreciation,
approval and commendation.
The doctrine of the yard as regards the relations with ship people
requires that their wishes should receive at all times the highest considera-
tion, and that they should be treated with the utmost courtesy. Our
attitude to the ships that come to the yard and have home yard here is
that they are our ships, and we have the same interest in them as iſ in fact
they were our ships. Ships' people must be impressed with the idea that it
is the fixed resolve of the yard to make good and to perform all work so
as to meet their requirements and to merit and win their approval.
The doctrine of the yard also requires that the good will of all must
be obtained. That courtesy is the best means of doing so, and when good
work and courtesy go hand in hand no combination can be more efficacious.


  p. 1398 (#316)                      #

SUBMARINE
CAPABILITIES AND LIMITATIONS
By LIEUTENANT WILDER D. BAKER, U. S. Navy
CUBMARINES have been a part of our Navy for something
like twenty years but only recently has any attempt been
made to incorporate them as a part of the feet. During the
early stages of submarine development, when the Porpoise and
the Shark were the "queens of the seas,” the time of the officers
commanding them was spent in trying to make them run at all, and
beyond an occasional attempt to torpedo a target (probably station-
ary) no tactical data was ever obtained and probably little thought
was given the subject. It was really not until after the World
War that much thought was given to their capabilities as, prior to
then, no one ever heard of much else than their limitations. During
the war, submarines made a name for themselves, not enviable,
but well known and thoroughly feared. The fear that they brought
to the hearts of surface craft officers and crews may have left an
impression that is not quite correct as to their capabilities. It is
for the above reasons that the following outline of the capabilities
and limitations of submarines is submitted. It may not be entirely
correct, but if it causes the service at large to think about sub-
marines in any other than a horrified or disgusted manner it will
have accomplished its purpose.
In the first place the modern submarine is a surface ship with
the ability to submerge completely, remain in that condition long
enough to do certain definite things, and then return to the surface,
ready to repeat the performance only after certain definite con-
ditions are fulfilled. To give a surface ship the ability to sub-
merge and return to the surface it was necessary to make radical
changes in the design. These have taken the form of the installa-
tion of large and cumbrous storage batteries to supply power when
submerged; a change in hull shape and strength to withstand the
high water pressures at great depths ; the installation in the hull
of large tanks which may be filled with water to destroy the sur-


  p. 1399 (#317)                      #

1925)
1399
Submarine Capabilities and Limitations
face buoyancy; the fitting of planes for control of depth while sub-
merged; the addition of long periscopes which give a certain
degree of vision to the officer on watch and the development of
a special engine with which to propel the boat on the surface and
to renew the electric power in the storage battery after emerging.
All these things have contributed to make a new type of ship which
the service at large understands but vaguely. I will try to list the
various capabilities and the corresponding limitations so that this
valuable arm of the fleet may be better understood.
To start with: A long cruise—say 10,000 miles—is quite prac-
ticable. Provisions and fuel can be carried for a trip of that length.
No one of the crew of a submarine would care to start on so long
an uninterrupted run, as the living conditions are not what they
should be and at the end of it all hands would need a week in
which to rest before doing anything else. Such a trip would
require about forty days at a minimum and would leave the crew
pretty well done up. If this long trip were reduced to 4,000 miles
a certain reserve of strength of personnel would be left that
would admit of more or less protracted war operations at the end
of the cruise. The two features are complementary and the ex-
tension of one automatically reduces the other. The additions and
change of design of the surface type to permit submergence have
left the submarine crowded, shorthanded, with consequent hard
watches, poorly ventilated and tremendously active in a seaway.
There is no room for setting up exercises except in a dead flat
sea which is seldom encountered on a long cruise. These con-
ditions result in loss of tone by all hands and at the end of a ten-
day trip a run on the beach is almost imperative. The same con-
ditions that make the submarine poor living quarters also make
poor working quarters, in that the machinery is so closely crowded
that repairs on one piece usually require the disassembling of
others. Under these conditions the repair work at the end of a
cruise is apt to look appalling when first listed. The combination
of run-down physical and mechanical conditions after a long run
makes it imperative that a period of rest be given before extended
operations against the enemy be undertaken.
With the submarines at present with the fleet, a thirty-day
cruise would require about ten days' recuperation and overhaul ;
a cruise of two weeks would probably require about five days or


  p. 1400 (#318)                      #

1400
[Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
even less. This does not mean that the boats would be entirely
unfit for war operations on reaching their destination, for there
is no doubt that the American bluejacket can put across the last
drop in him, even after it is apparently gone. A few days of rest
and exercise after any extended cruise will, however, materially
increase the efficiency of the following war operations. All officers
who have served on small ships will appreciate this condition.
Next we will think of the submerged work. As everyone knows,
it is necessary to destroy the buoyancy of a vessel to sink or sub-
merge it. As indicated above, this is done in a submarine by the
admission of sea water to the ballast tanks. By the use of small
tanks the amount of water in the boat is varied so that if a good
“trim” is obtained the vessel has practically neutral buoyancy and
is about equally heavy fore and aft. If the trim is perfect the boat
will "balance” with only a foot or so of periscope above the water.
If it is not perfect she will either sink or rise. Owing to the
varying density of sea water, wave action, and movement of per-
sonnel within the boat a trim is never perfect and it is necessary
to use the forward and after planes and the power of the pro-
pellers to maintain or change depth. The screws supply all power
for advance through the water and for change of plane or depth
in the water. The planes are merely large fins extending out
from the side of the hull and capable of rotation around a hori-
zontal axis. If they are inclined down she will, of course, sink,
the change of depth resulting from the force of the water im-
pinging on the inclined plane surfaces. The rate at which change
of depth is made depends entirely on the rate of travel through
the water and is a function of the speed and the angle of plane to
the horizontal and is, therefore, to a great extent under the control
of the diving officer, although his control is affected by his prox-
imity to the target (allowable variation of speed), the state of the
sea and the expertness of his crew.
With the above points in mind let us consider the attack of a
submarine on a screened battleship. If he is alone, that is, there are
no other submarines attacking in the immediate vicinity, and he
has been able to pick up his target from well ahead, the problem
of the commanding officer is quite simple. He submerges before
being seen and closes his target at maximum speed until he can
definitely decide on his course and speed, ascertain the nature of


  p. 1401 (#319)                      #

1925]
1401
Submarine Capabilities and Limitations
her screening forces and their relation to his target-in other
words make a logical estimate of the situation.
During his first approach at high speed he has been running at
about seventy-five feet, deep enough to be clear of casual traffic
and possibly avoid an outer screen. When he decides it is time to
take a look and make his estimate of the situation he stops and
listens to ascertain the proximity of the screen or other craft. If
he decides that all is clear he comes to periscope depth and ex-
amines the situation closely at a dead slow speed in order not to
leave a wake by which he could be recognized and attacked before
delivering his own attack. After reaching his final decision he
goes to his attacking course, starts his watch and other tracking
instruments and proceeds at the speed necessary to "get in." The
anti-submarine screen is his chief worry now. This he will evade
if his listeners are well trained and his own experience and judg-
ment are sufficiently good. His next “look” will come only when
his listeners report that the screen is astern and his watch tells him
that it is time. This exposure of his periscope will probably be his
last before firing, after which he will try to make good his escape.
The above outline of an attack sounds much easier than it
really is for there will be many unforeseen situations and his crew
will never be trained to the point that everything will work out as
planned. It is given, however, to give the service a picture of
what we try to do. It has been done and, as we get more experi-
ence with the fleet, will be done more often and with a greater
chance of success. This can be done, not only by one boat working
alone, but is quite feasible of accomplishment by a section of three
or four boats working as a unit. It requires more training,
greater permanence in station, and all the other factors that tend
toward successful cooperation, but it can be done if conditions of
sea and light are favorable and the training of officers and crews
is properly carried out.
The conditions outlined above are those which might well obtain
in war under favorable circumstances. Now consider the chances
of success under very adverse conditions. Take a number of sub-
marines, all of which sight a force of capital ships at about the
same time. Their missions are all the same and they have been
placed on the circle of visibility to report the exit of this force
from a harbor and to attack if possible. The capital ships are ex-


  p. 1402 (#320)                      #

1402
[Aug
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
pecting a submarine attack and are well screened close up with
swiftly moving zigzagging destroyers, besides having an outer
screen, covering the exit, of several squadrons of destroyers mov-
ing at such a rate that the time interval between them is from
thirty to forty-five seconds, as it would be if they used a speed of
20 knots. All these destroyers are armed with depth bombs which,
if they really believed submarines to be in their area, they would
drop at frequent intervals. Under these conditions the capital
ships need not fear a submarine attack. If the light screening
forces are numerous enough to maintain the screen outlined they
never need fear such an attack. It will not be made for the rea-
sons indicated below.
In the first place, there would be the danger of collision between
attacking submarines. All of them would be bound for the same
point and as their primary mission was information they would
not be in a position to concentrate for a united attack. When
several ships are all headed for the same place it is very probable
that two or more will get there at the same time, particularly when
they can't see. A collision submerged need not be fatal but it is
something to be earnestly avoided.
You ask "Why can't they see?” You will remember that it is
necessary to use a very slow speed on exposing the periscope when
in the vicinity of other ships to avoid detection. This slow speed
makes depth keeping difficult. Listeners will be helpless, for with
eight or nine ships moving rapidly overhead it will be impossible
to distinguish one from another. If one of the submarines decides
to chance it and gets into the mêlée, his first sight on exposing a
periscope will probably be that of a destroyer charging at him at
a rate of 20 to 30 knots. When it is realized that the maximum
field of a periscope is only 34° and that a destroyer may be
charging him from any one of the 360° it makes his position that
much more perilous. Still, consider the submarine in the mêlée
and that the periscope has shown a destroyer crossing his bow so
that danger of collision is imminent. What can be done? He will
try to dive under as that is the only hope of escape. He is going
at from 1 to 20 knots. His rate of change of depth in smooth
water will be not greater than one foot in twenty seconds at first
and maybe after he has started down will increase to a foot in
fifteen to twelve seconds. As he must drop at least ten feet it will


  p. 1403 (#321)                      #

1925]
1403
Submarine Capabilities and Limitations
take him approximately three minutes. In this time a destroyer
at twenty knots can go one mile. His chances are slim. His time
of diving will be decreased if he can speed up but remember he has
a ship weighing a thousand tons to accelerate from one knot to
something like five before any material increase in diving speed is
actually gained. His turning circle is many times that of a de-
stroyer, and the Y-gun has made a destroyer very broad in effective
beam. As was stated before, the battleships are effectively
screened, and it is doubted that any submarine could get through
such a screen and make an effective attack. If it did it would be
marvelous good fortune and make the commanding officer eligible
for all the honors that the Allies and the Central Powers combined
could shower upon him. What these boats would actually do
under the above conditions would be to gain as much distance as -
possible in the direction of advance of the enemy and lay in wait
for him in hopes that the screen would thin out and night time or
twilight would give submarines a favorable opportunity for attack.
The above discussion will indicate that there are times and
places when a submarine attack on screened forces is practicable
and, contrariwise, there are conditions that forbid such an attack.
The strength of a submarine lies in the fact that she can see
without being seen. This is her one claim to fame. Before the
war developed the depth bomb and the listening devices she could
escape counter-attack by submerging, leaving the enemy without
a point of attack. But the old race between armor and projectile
took a side shoot during the World War with the result that the
submarine has lost much of its protection heretofore gained by
submergence and must now take its chances with counter-attack
which only luck, aided, of course, by skill and knowledge, can
forfend. Surprise is the one great advantage.
This feature is most easily gained by a submarine on patrol.
She is sent to an area known to be frequented by the enemy. At
daylight, or just before, she sinks quietly to where only a foot or
so of periscope is above the water. With two feet of periscope
out she has a horizon of nearly two miles. The tail masts of a
ship add several more to this. It is an easy matrer to lie in wait
and deliver a torpedo attack on a passing troopship or cruiser.
Every advantage lies with the submarine. This method of patrol
can be made into a blockade of an enemy port or into an outpost


  p. 1404 (#322)                      #

1404
[Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
for information. If it is the latter she can forward the news col-
lected or deduced to her superior at night when she comes to the
surface to recharge her storage batteries.
On this patrol her listening devices will give certain information
before her periscope can gather the details. During the last war,
American submarines formed an anti-submarine patrol in shipping
lanes off the coasts of England and Ireland. The listeners, each
on duty twelve hours a day either at the S.C. tube or radio, soon
became expert and could always tell whether the propellers heard
were those of a destroyer, submarine or trawler long before the
periscope gave the information. These details were of great value
but they were not enough. Before an attack could be made or an
escape executed it was necessary to see what the ship was doing.
The other day an old shipmate asked if it wouldn't be possible
to lie on the bottom in a submarine, his idea being to get all
information necessary from the listening devices and to conserve
the storage batteries. Oi course it is possible to lie on the bottom
in a submarine. All that it is necessary to do is to run down and
then take in enough water to give the boat negative buoyancy suffi-
cient to keep her from pounding due to the wave action. This
amount of "negative” will vary with the depth of water and the
condition of the sea on the surface. The higher the sea in relation
to the depth t. eater the amount of “negative” required.
But, after gy: ing on the bottom what good is the boat? There
can be no question of surprise and no real probability of an
attack-certainly not while on the bottom. Consider a boat lying
on the bottom at a depth of 150 feet off the entrance to New York
in November (I mention the month to give an idea of the surface
conditions). To keep from pounding due to wave action from
two to five tons of negative buoyancy will be required. A great
deal of shipping will pass overhead during one daylight period.
Well trained listeners will be able to report with considerable
accuracy whether the engines driving the screws that are heard
are reciprocating steam engines, turbines, or internal combustion
type. By plotting the bearings of these sounds we can get the
approximate course and speed of the ship. But what have we
gained by this ? Nothing.
If our mission is to obtain information to be reported later,
we might be able to report "a flock of turbine-driven vessels, prob-


  p. 1405 (#323)                      #

19251
1405
Submarine Capabilities and Limitations
ably destroyers, headed east, passed out at noon.” That informa-
tion might be of value but it couldn't be reported until night when it
might be too late, and if a periscope patrol had been used our in-
formation would have been increased by giving the exact number
and types and whether or not the ships had changed course to the
southward after passing our audible horizon. Also, with a periscope
patrol it would be possible to run off the beaten track and, if the
information were important enough to warrant giving away our
presence, come to the surface and broadcast it immediately.
If the mission be attack then a patrol on the bottom is worse
than useless. Suppose our “flock of turbine-driven vessels” really
consisted of a division of battleships screened by destroyers. Be-
fore any attempt at attack could be made it would be necessary to
rid the boat of the negative buoyancy taken on to prevent pound-
ing. This would have to be done by pumping, for if the water
were blown out the measurement would be inaccurate and too
much might be blown, making the boat too light and incapable of
control at slow speeds. By the time the boat could leave the bot-
tom and reach periscope depth our target would be a mile ahead
and making such speed that attack would be impossible. It is
believed that the above remarks show the futility of such a patrol
when compared to that at periscope depth, in which condition the
submarine is ready for any eventuality.
W
To be able to bottom has, however, advantages under certain
conditiore .If being trailed with listening devices and depth
bombs it might be very convenient to rest on bottom and stop all
auxiliaries that might make a betraying sound.
Submarines can be used as scouts under certain conditions when
it would be bad policy to use a surface ship. This is particularly
true when negative information is valuable. Three or four sub-
marines could thoroughly search an area of considerable extent by
cruising on the surface and diving at the approach of a surface
ship. In this way a report in considerable detail could be given
without the enemy knowing of the reconnaissance. To use sub-
marines in a search requiring immediate report of conditions and
possible screening is open to discussion. The limit of horizon
from the upper works of a submarine is in the neighborhood of five
miles. It is doubtful that numbers and types of ships could be
accurately determined at a much greater distance than eight miles.


  p. 1406 (#324)                      #

1406
[Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
If the submarines are sighted by the enemy and forced under, their
usefulness as scouts is greatly reduced, but their function as a
distant screen still remains. Scouting and screening ahead is
really dependent on the speed of the main body. If that is low
enough there is no reason why submarines could not be used as
a screen of a slow train or troop transport. From a position well
ahead they might easily reduce the attacking force to numbers that
the escort could control.
One bad feature of using submarines with a merchant convoy
is that to the average merchant master all submarines are danger-
ous. This was forcibly brought home during the war when 0-6
was nearly sunk by the gunfire of her own convoy. The sub-
marine has no friends during hostilities. There is, however, a
definite place for submarines in scouting and screening operations.
Operations against enemy communications are feasible if prop-
erly carried out. Submarines can and will sink enemy ships carry-
ing stores and munitions. The Germans gave submarines a black
eye by doing just this in an unlawful and cruel manner, but the
British accomplished it in the Sea of Marmora without raising any
cries of horror and other nations will use this type of vessel for
the same thing. The United States refused to become a party to
a treaty to abolish submarines, because we could see legitimate
uses for them in this very line.
If you should read “operations against enemy communications”
and think that the cutting of transoceanic cables is meant, please
cast it from your mind. The submarine of Jules Verne has not
been developed in the United States Navy. We can not go to the
bottom and open a door to the sea, allowing our personnel to cut
cables or to hunt submarine game with air rifles. One of our early
submarines, G-3, was fitted with such a compartment and was fitted
with wheels like the famous Nautilus, but this type has long since
been abandoned and the space thus used made available for tor-
pedoes.
Mining from submarines was developed by both the Germans
and British during the World War. It has the element of surprise
attached to it that is so necessary for successful submarine oper-
ations. A submarine mine layer can lay mines just after the
sweepers have reported “all clear” and no one will be the wiser
until he chances to explode one against his bow. Attempts have
use


  p. 1407 (#325)                      #

1925)
1407
Submarine Capabilities and Limitations
been made to obtain funds for development of this type, but as yet
without success. There is no doubt that these boats will be used in
the next war and that success will crown their efforts. In the mean-
time, our Navy is not learning to build or operate mine-laying
submarines and will be that much behind when the time comes.
During the war a good many “stunts” were done with sub-
marines which proved that they have values other than those
usually attributed to them. Several British submarines passed
under the mine fields of the Dardanelles. After entering the Sea
of Marmora and the Bosphorus, these boats were of great value
in cutting communications between Asia and Europe, blowing up
bridges and sinking transports. A submarine, being able to oper-
ate in three planes, can introduce its own element of surprise quite
frequently. The Germans landed spies on the coast of Ireland
and went in to get information from spies already ashore. The
result of this kind of work was apparent and it can be repeated.
A submarine reconnaissance of a port or fortification can be and
has been made, but the value of the information gained in this way
must not be placed too high. It must be remembered that the
observer is looking with one eye from a very low position and he
gets no perspective. The magnification of a periscope is only six
diameters and the details that are missed will materially affect
the value of the report. Certain information may be obtained,
however, and under certain conditions this might be a valuable
method of scouting.
There are many other methods of using submarines, some of
which may be revolutionary, and no attempt is made here to list
them all. The only excuse for this paper is to try to give the
service a general idea of our capabilities and of our corresponding
limitations. When submarines have been with the fleet a few
years longer and have learned more about themselves, the officers
of the fleet will have learned a correspondingly larger amount.
Until this happy day arrives, please do not look on us with horror
or disgust but try to remember that a submarine is built for certain
definite functions and to obtain those had to sacrifice certain fea-
tures which are desirable and without which our limitations are
great. Later development is bound to bring improvement but we
now have submarines which have high value in their own sphere
and as we progress in their use this sphere will widen considerably.
vulg.


  p. 1408 (#326)                      #

THE SALVAGE OF S - 19
By COMMANDER ROBERT B. HILLIARD (CC), U. S. NAVY
DROBABLY no two stranded vessels present the same prob-
:P lems in the matter of salvage. Each case will have individual
difficulties which cannot be foreseen and which previous ex-
perience will not entirely dispel, but it is doubtful if there is any
more refractory combination than that of a submarine and a
sandy beach. There is something about the circular section with
the square duct keel and the bilge keels of the submarine which
makes the grasp of the sand very hard to break.
The U. S. S. S-19 went ashore at the entrance to Nauset Har-
bor, near Orleans, Massachusetts, on the eastern shore of Cape
Cod, during the early morning of January 13, 1925. The life boat
from the Nauset Coast Guard Station reached the stranded vessel
that morning, after having been first capsized in the rough sea
that was running. However, as the submarine was in no immedi-
ate danger, the captain and crew decided to remain on board until
efforts could be made to work off the beach. The same day, the
coast guard cutters Acushnet and Tampa, and the navy tug
Wandank arrived on the scene.
On the fourteenth, an unsuccessful effort was made to get a
six-inch wire line on the submarine. The Department had placed
a contract with the Merritt-Chapman and Scott wrecking company
for salvage operations, and the company's wrecking tug Resolute,
with Wreckmaster Foster, arrived in the afternoon. Incidentally,
the company had offered to sign a "no cure, no pay” contract for
$150,000, but the Department had decided that the legality of
such a contract was doubtful, and had let the contract by the day,
paying a fixed price per diem for the use of each tug, with an
extra charge for wreckers and gear used. Probably the most
equitable form of salvage contract is the "no cure, no pay” type
with cost to be fixed on completion by a board of arbitration.
Such a type is in common use in commercial work but would prob-
ably be impracticable for the Navy.


  p. 1409 (#327)                      #

1925)
1409
The Salvage of "S-19"
The Resolute succeeded in getting a ten-inch manila line on the
submarine and pulled for an hour, with no result save to heel the
ship to about 35°. In view of this inclination and the good weather
at that time, it was decided to remove the crew and their effects.
This was done on the fourteenth and fifteenth, and the crew was
sent to the Boston Yard, with the exception of the commanding
officer, Lieutenant C. F. Martin, and six of his men, who re-
mained on the Wandank to assist in the operations.
The condition of the submarine's tanks at that time was as
follows: Fuel oil, full; main lubricating, full; fresh water, half
full; battery fresh water, full; auxiliary, empty; regulating, empty;
trims, empty; main ballast, nearly empty.
On the fifteenth, the Resolute and Wandank pulled in tandem,
and the Wandank parted an eight-inch manila line. The wrecking
company's tug I. J. Merritt arrived in the afternoon and pulled in
tandem with the Resolute.
MERRITT
S-19
Eel or Special
Salvage anchor
Free Cath
Kanualer
24 Fathoms _15 Manila
Windlass
Towing
Bridle
Beach purchase
L wire Proventor
parts sa Manila Diagram 1
On the sixteenth, forty tons of oil and water were pumped out
of the submarine, and it was estimated that she would float at a
draft of about fifteen feet. It was decided to use a beach purchase
on the Merritt. As the stern of the submarine was farthest out,
the hauling line, 400 fathoms of fifteen-inch cable-laid manila, was
secured to the after lifting shackle of the submarine, with a wire
preventer to the towing bridle. This hauling line was taken to
the Merritt's after bitts. The Merritt was moored with her own
anchors, and a 200-fathom fifteen-inch manila line was carried
ahead to a 7,000-pound Eel salvage anchor. This line was taken
to a beach purchase of seven parts of five and one-half inch
manila on the Merritt's deck, and thence to a windlass. (Dia-
gram I)
The Tampa and Acushnet were released. A great deal of diffi-
culty was experienced in running lines, owing to the absence of a
satisfactory power boat. A really efficient power boat is one of
the prime essentials of salvage operations.


  p. 1410 (#328)                      #

1410
[Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
The layout of gear adopted on the sixteenth was retained
throughout the operations, except that the scope of the hauling line
was increased to 500 fathoms, and an additional Eel anchor, for-
ward line of 200 fathoms of fifteen-inch manila, and beach pur-
chase, were fitted. Continual difficulty was experienced with the
parting of the manila hauling line close to the submarine, ap-
parently due to submerged wreckage, but this was avoided by
tailing the line with 500 feet of wire. The Merritt, which devel-
oped about 1,200 horsepower, hauled in on the beach purchase and
went ahead on her engines at the same time, when pulling. The
tension on the fifteen-inch manila was very great ; oil dripped from
it continuously, and the circumference was reduced from fifteen
inches to about thirteen and a half inches.
The submarine was apparently on, or close to, a bar which was
almost dry at low water. A beach patrol was established to pre-
vent unauthorized persons from approaching the vessel. How-
ever, there was generally a surf breaking close to the ship, so that
access was difficult, except near high water when the weather was
exceptionally good. Whenever it was possible to get aboard.
soundings were taken, and an inspection made of the interior. No
water was entering the hull, a very encouraging fact.
Pulling was continued on the tides throughout January with the
gear described, but there were frequent interruptions due to the
parting of lines. As these accidents almost always occurred during
rough weather, when the chances were best for moving the sub-
marine, it was apparent that the methods in use were faulty.
Finally, late in January, the lines carried away once more, and,
on January 30, the submarine moved 150 feet further inshore. A
change in the method of operations was essential.
The Resolute was relieved by the Commissioner, a smaller tug,
to reduce the cost of operation. This had some disadvantages, as
the Commissioner was unable to ride out rough weather, and had
to run for shelter when such weather seemed probable. This in-
volved delay, as a tender was needed to haul out the Merritt's gear.
On January 31, the submarine rested inside the bar, with her
bow to seaward. It was estimated that she was sunk about eight
feet in the sand, that she would have to be moved out about
600 feet before she would float, and that she was about 2,300 feet
from the bluff at the shore line. It was determined to run a haul-


  p. 1411 (#329)                      #

1925]
1411
The Salvage of “S-19"
ing line from shore. Meanwhile, the Merritt's lines had been
re-laid, the hauling line being passed around the submarine's gun
foundation and secured to the bullnose.
Preparations were begun for the shore station on February 4.
A large buoy, with three tons buoyancy, was planted in twenty
feet of water and secured with four Baldt anchors, from 4,800 to
7,000 pounds. Five thousand feet of six-inch plow steel wire was
secured to the gun foundation on the submarine and led out
through a block on the buoy and back to the bluff. A “box," or
purchase, composed of two four-sheave steel blocks, was provided,
the outboard block being secured with an oak toggle to the six-inch
line, and the end of the purchase taken to a hoisting engine. The
engine and the inboard block of the box were secured by a six-inch
Plank walk way
Box
III
of san ft b'wire
Toggle
Hoisting Engine
5-19
Dead man
Shea ve
Diagrom a
wire line to a "dead man” sunk fifteen feet in a trench 100 yards
back from the edge of the bluff. A plank walkway was run under
the box and a sheave was provided at the edge of the bluff to pre-
vent the lines from burying in the ground. (Diagram 2)
A shanty was run up in three days for shelter of the wrecking
crew of nine men. A field radio set was installed for communi-
cation with the wrecking tugs and was very useful, though not
altogether reliable. A connection was also made to the coast
guard telephone line, connecting with the North Truro radio
station.
The preparations were made rapidly, and on February 8 and 9
the hauling line was run. From that time on, a strain was kept on
the shore line continuously, and slack was taken in as it appeared.
A steam pressure of eighty pounds was used on the hoisting en-


  p. 1412 (#330)                      #

1412
[Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
gine, which was estimated to give a pull of about twenty-seven
tons on the six-inch line. Progress was slow but continuous.
Probably the greater part of the movement obtained was due to
the tugs, but the shore line assured that none of the distance gained
would be lost due to parting lines, or heavy weather forcing the
tugs to drop their gear.
On February 16, a third hauling line was made fast to the sub-
marine. A six-inch fifty-foot wire bridle was run around the con-
ning tower with a wire preventer to the after lifting shackle; then
100 feet of four-inch wire, doubled, was brought forward from the
bridle and secured to the bullnose; to it was shackled a double line
of ten-inch manila, each leg consisting of four 120-fathom lengths ;
Share Lone
MERRITT
5-19
Puutalbums aimaalla derbied
Wandank
wire tewenste
na wser
Diagram 3
Towing Engine
Baldt anches
finally, this was shackled to the end of the Wandank's six-inch
wire towing cable. The Wandank was moored with her own
anchors, and with two Baldt anchors on 120-fathom ten-inch
manila lines, to the southward and outboard of the Merritt. (Dia-
gram 3) She pulled by going ahead on her engines and by taking
a strain on her towing engine. She developed about 1,700 horse-
power, and obtained the best results by surging, pulling and slack-
ing off, alternately. Later, her towing engine was disabled and
she rigged deck tackles to replace it.
There are two theories as to the amount of power to be used in
such operations. The first is that the more power is developed,
, the more results are obtained. This seems reasonable on the face


  p. 1413 (#331)                      #

1925)
1413
The Salvage of "S-19"
of it, but most wreckers consider that it can be overdone. They
believe that too much pull tends to bury the wreck in the sand.
Unless it is moving freely, they do not believe in trying to force
the action; and, in any case, they prefer to stop the pull shortly
after high tide, to permit the sand to wash away from the path of
the wreck. In the present instance, the contours of the bar and
the sand beach were changing continuously. The higher tides were,
of course, helpful, but far more assistance was obtained from
rough seas which broke over the submarine. When a high tide
combined with a heavy easterly sea, the conditions were ideal.
An inspection on March 13 showed that there was water and
probably some sand in the main ballast and auxiliary tanks. It
was thought to be due to leaky kingstons. The tanks were pumped
out and put under air pressure, but no assurance was felt that
they could be kept empty. If flooded, they would increase the
draft to about eighteen feet and, of course, require a longer pull to
float the vessel. No other leaks developed.
On March 15, the submarine heeled to 80°. She righted to about
60° on the sixteenth, but on the seventeenth she went over again
to 90°. As a result, a great deal of acid was spilled in the bilges,
from the batteries, and there were short circuits on the switchboard.
Ranges were established about half a mile away on the beach
both to the north and to the south of the submarine. It was pos-
sible to measure the movement of the ship with surprising accu-
racy. The accompanying table shows the progress made, together
with the weather conditions and the height of tide at each move.
Date
February 5
February 7
February 12
February 24
February 25
February 26
March 2
March 7
March 14
March 16
March 17
March 18
Movement
50 feet
15 feet
75 feet
10 feet
70 feet
60 feet
14 feet
21 feet
80 feet
4 feet
15 feet
Off
Weather
Easterly wind, rough sea
Easterly wind, moderate sea
S.E. gale, rough sea
Fresh N.E. wind, moderate sea
Fresh E. wind, moderate sea
Fresh S.E. wind, moderate E. sea
Light W. wind, moderate E. swell
Light N. wind, moderate E. swell
S.W. gale, moderate S. sea
Light variable wind, smooth sea
Light S. wind, smooth sea
Fresh N. wind, moderate E. sea
Height
of Tide
5.4 feet
5.9 feet
6.0 feet
7.4 feet
7.1 feet
6.6 feet
5.3 feet
5.5 feet
6.4 feet
6.3 feet
6.2 feet
6.1 feet


  p. 1414 (#332)                      #

1414
[Aug
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
The highest tide for February was 7.5 feet on the twenty-third ; the
highest for March up to the eighteenth was 6.4 feet on the four-
teenth and fifteenth.
On March 18, at 5:20 P.M., the submarine was floated. The
shore line was cut with an oxy-acetylene torch at 6:10. March
19, there was a dense fog and a heavy sea, and the ship was an-
chored out in deep water. On the twentieth, the weather improved
and the submarine was towed into Provincetown, where she was
thoroughly inspected, the acid was pumped out of her bilges as
far as possible, and what remained was neutralized with washing
soda. She was towed up that night to Boston and was docked next
morning.
The payment to the wrecking company under the contract has
not been settled at the time of writing, but it is estimated that the
cost of salvage will amount to about $200,000. The cost of repairs
and docking is estimated at $100,000. These figures do not in-
clude any allowance for the services of the navy tugs which took
part in the salvage operations, but they do include the cost of gear
used by the tugs and drawn specifically for the job. As the con-
tract price of the submarine was $1,720,000, it will be seen that the
salvage operations were well worth their cost.
The lessons to be drawn from this instance may be summarized
as follows. As soon as it becomes apparent that the wreck cannot
be towed off by tugs in the ordinary manner, beach purchases
should be gotten out. I believe this should be done not later than
a week after stranding. The crew should be removed as soon as
practicable, in the case of a submarine, but a detail should be re-
tained in the vicinity to assist in the operations. Efficient power
boats should be provided for running lines. Wrecking tugs should
be provided which are capable of retaining their station in rough
weather. Tenders should be provided capable of supplying all
needs of the wrecking tugs and of handling heavy lines and an-
chors. They should also be capable of remaining on station in
moderate weather. If two wrecking tugs are available, one should
keep a steady strain on the line, the other should surge. No at-
tempt should be made to get too much distance on a single tide,
and, unless the wreck is moving freely, pulling should cease shortly
after high tide. With these precautions taken, nothing remains
but to sit tight and wait for a rough sea setting onto the beach.


  p. 1415 (#333)                      #

HOW THE NAVY HELPED THEM HOME
LIEUTENANT (jg) F. V. BARKER, U. S. Navy
THILE the Richmond was lying off Salem Willows, Massa-
chusetts, taking part in a Fourth of July celebration, an
innocent looking despatch was received from the depart-
ment asking when it would be convenient for Admiral Magruder
to confer with representatives of the Army Air Service in con-
nection with a naval patrol of the North Atlantic, or sixth division
of the Army World Flight. Immediately the scuttlebutt began
rumbling and rumoring, and a week of radio silence at sea off
Provincetown during one of the summer search problems gave
ample opportunity for speculation as to the future. Even the
inost exaggerated fantasy of the ship's recognized dope spreader
failed to approach what was in store for that little squadron of de-
stroyers and light cruisers during the forty-odd days which
brought the Navy before the eyes of the public as nothing else has
done since the war.
Newport was selected as the most convenient place for all con-
cerned, and at the conference on board the Richmond it was de-
cided that, to safeguard the flight and maintain proper communi-
cations, four light cruisers and a division of destroyers would be
desirable. The Richmond, Raleigh, Trenton and Milwaukee were
recommended for this duty by Commander Light Cruiser Divi-
sions, the first three to rendezvous at Rosyth, Scotland, on July
28, and the last named to proceed up the North Atlantic coast to
Labrador, establishing bases en route. Operations approved this
plan except that two destroyers of the European squadron, the
Billingsley and Reid, were substituted for the Trenton which was
not available at the time. It was necessary to cut short the
Raleigh's shake-down cruise in order for her to participate in this
duty, but it is believed the change of itinerary turned out every bit
as interesting, at any rate more instructive than the one originally
planned.


  p. 1416 (#334)                      #

1416
[Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
The next ten days were busy ones, every hour one of hurried
preparation. Special chart portfolios covering a part of the world
seldom visited by American men-of-war had to be ordered. Aero-
logical personnel and equipment were received. Stores and sup-
plies were rushed from the Boston and New York Yards.
Communication schedules were arranged and tests planned. As
thorough an overhaul as the time allowed was made, particular
attention being paid to the radio material, on which depended to a
great extent the success of the naval patrol and the flight itself.
Finally the Richmond fueled to capacity, and at 0500, July 21,
stood out to sea full of passengers, stores and hopes for a quick
completion of the duty ahead. Representatives of the Associated
Press, the United Press, the Universal News Service and the
Washington Evening Star and camera men from the International
News Reel and Pathé companies comprised the civilian personnel,
as fine a bunch of shipmates as could be desired.
On the third day out the course was changed to the northward,
and the Richmond settled down on the long uphill climb along the
great circle course to Pentland Firth at 20 knots. Although the
transatlantic steamer lane was followed, traffic was remarkably
light, only two vessels being sighted. The sixth day gave a taste
of the weather to be experienced the greater part of the weeks
ahead, chilly and foggy. The fog lifted nicely just before the Butt
of Lewis was due to be picked up, and the run through Pentland
Firth was made under glorious weather conditions. The sea fowl
had a great time racing the ship, keeping abreast with no apparent
effort. A common puffin misjudged the speed while crossing the
bow, collided with the forestay and broke its neck. The bird's
coloring was tropically brilliant and the beak more like that of a
parrot than a seagoing duck.
The headlands of the Firth of Forth were picked up about 0800,
July 28, in a drizzling rain which held during the entire thirty-six
hours the ship was anchored a mile to seaward of the huge bridge
across the firth. The Raleigh was anchored a thousand yards
nearer the bridge with the two destroyers close by. While the
admiral and the commanding officers of the four ships held a con-
ference with Major Davidson, military attaché at the American
Embassy in London, regarding the disposition of the ships for the
hops from Hull to Kirkwall and Kirkwall to Hornafjord, Iceland,


  p. 1417 (#335)                      #

1925]
1417
How the Navy Helped Them Home
all hands except the few unfortunates with the duty went ashore
to see Edinburgh and experiment with the rate of exchange. The
weather was too vile for any sight-seeing or picture-taking, but,
then, no one really wanted to indulge in such outdoor sports when
those indoors were more attractive.
As a result of the conference, the Raleigh, Billingsley and Reid
sailed that afternoon to take stations between the Orkneys and
Hornafjord on the southeast coast of Iceland. The Richmond,
not having so far to steam to her station, stayed at anchor off
Rosyth until the next day, fueling to capacity once again. About
dinner time all preparations for getting underway had been made
and the order to heave around was expected any minute when a
radio came through from one of the British destroyers, which had
been of so much help in handling radio traffic, stating that a lieu-
tenant was on the dock trying to get back to the ship. A hurried
muster accounted for all the lieutenants but disclosed the fact that
one of the newspapermen was A.O.L., one who had run down to
Hull in an attempt to scoop the others. The admiral's barge, on
its way in, passed a shore boat bringing out the absentee, and at
2030 the Forth bridge was fading into the dusk astern. A course
was shaped back to Pentland Firth in that same drizzle with four
additional passengers on board, two representatives of the Hearst
papers in London, the Paris correspondent of the Chicago Tribune
and Major Davidson, and the flight duty was on in earnest.
The morning of July 30 dawned bright and clear, and the fore-
noon watch found the Richmond standing in through one of the
entrances to Scapa Flow, the great British war harbor. She an-
chored off Houton Bay, south across the main island of the Ork-
neys from Kirkwall, in Admiral Rodman's wartime anchorage.
The scenery was lovely with green rolling hills laid out into small
fields of different colors with not a tree in sight. Those fields not
under cultivation were kept neatly mowed by the hundreds of
sheep and cows, and rabbits were everywhere in evidence. The
hills are perpetually backed with ever-changing cloud effects which
made the late sunsets beautiful indeed.
Since the fliers were expected that same afternoon, working
parties were sent ashore immediately in the motor launches to lay
out moorings for the three American planes, with an additional one
for the Italian pilot, in sheltered Houton Bay. Throughout the


  p. 1418 (#336)                      #


U.S.N. Official Photo
BLUEJACKETS FROM THE "U.S.S. RICHMOND" GASSING THE PLANE "Boston,” 30 JULY, 1924, AT SCAPA
Flow, SCOTLAND


  p. 1419 (#337)                      #

1925)
1419
How the Navy Helped Them Home
afternoon word of their take-off from Hull was awaited anxiously,
and the hope that they had started that day almost had been given
up when a much delaved despatch was received from Wick Radio
telling of their departure. Only a few minutes later three specks
were sighted on the southern horizon, specks which rapidly took
the form of three planes flying in a V formation. Word of their
appearance reached all parts of the ship in an incredibly short
time, and soon the admiral, ill with a touch of the grippe, was on
the bridge in his dressing gown waving them greetings while all
hands were on deck strangely quiet at their first glimpse of the
Army World Flight. Flying low over the masts and upper works
of the scuttled Hindenburg, the planes picked up the moorings and
headed with precision for Houton Bay. Smith in the Chicago
landed first, followed a few minutes later by Wade in the Boston.
Eric Nelson in the New Orleans was not sure of the landing and
circled the bay once before gliding down. The photographers were
rewarded for their long wait, on the dock, and the ship slowly re-
turned to normalcy.
The fiers turned-to right away, refueling the planes, assisted
by the ship's working party, and completed their overhaul before
coming aboard to get cleaned up and for dinner. There was some
rivalry in the wardroom as to which would have the privilege
of turning over rooms and bunks and gear to them. One of their
first desires was an honest-to-goodness American cigarette, and,
similarly, their conversation at dinner tended not toward the feats
behind but rather to the expected joys of being in the States again
which indicated a slight touch of nostalgia. Although pretty well
tired out and anticipating an early start next morning, all of them
sat up after the formalities of being photographed in the long twi-
light were over, glad to talk to people who had seen the Great
White Way only a few weeks before. The sleeping arrangements
were changed at the last minute so that each got a bunk in the sick
bay, it being decided that there would be less noise, and therefore
more rest for them, in that part of the ship.
The weather conditions along the line of flight next morning
did not warrant a start, which gave the fliers an unexpected but
greatly appreciated day of relaxation. Heretofore, at every stop,
their time had been planned for them, and they had felt in duty
bound to attend the numerous functions arranged in their honor;


  p. 1420 (#338)                      #

1420
[Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
as guests of another branch of the service they felt, and rightly,
that they could make themselves at home. That forenoon went to
a visit to the Hindenburg, much to the delight of the news reel
cameramen who exposed many feet of film to be rushed back to
the States through England. About lunch time a British naval
seaplane landed near the Richmond and semaphored a message of
goodbye and good luck, departing within a few minutes, which was
a nice piece of sportsmanship. The afternoon was devoted to ex-
ploring quaint Kirkwall with its ancient church and narrow streets.
The weather the second day was unkind also, but provided an op-
portunity for an Army-Navy golf match over a course on which
the fairways give no trouble, thanks to the grazing habits of sheep.
Captain Cotten and Commander Keppler came aboard victorious
over Major Davidson and Smith.
On Saturday, August 2, the fliers left the ship after an early
breakfast feeling well buoyed up at the weather prospects ahead
and anxious to be moving again. Following an hour of tuning
up, the three planes slowly came out of Houton Bay in column
and taxied over the glistening oily waters of Scapa Flow into the
morning sun. On account of the very light breeze blowing the
heavily laden planes had trouble in taking off. Nelson was the
first to leave the water, and, by taking advantage of the New Or-
leans' propeller wash, Wade was able to get clear a minute or so
later. Smith had the greatest difficulty with the balky Chicago.
Only the skillful jockeying of Nelson and Wade to give him the
greatest benefits of their propeller wash and pontoon wakes as
they skimmed the water enabled Smith to hop off. Finally, at
about 0930, the three planes got into cruising formation, and,
circling the ship with a wave, headed into the northwest. The
Richmond, with a parting salute from her siren, got underway im-
mediately to proceed to Reykjavik, Iceland.
Not long after 1000 a surprise appeared in the form of a des-
patch from Major Davidson, who had remained at Kirkwall,
through Wick Radio, stating that the planes had become separated
in a fog encountered before they were well clear of the Orkneys
and that Smith and Wade were returning to Houton Bay. The
Richmond immediately turned back to Scapa Flow so the Aliers
would have a place to spend the night and to assist in the necessary
refueling. While returning it was a great relief to hear from the


  p. 1421 (#339)                      #

1925]
1421
How the Navy Helped Them Home
first station ship, the Billingsley, lying-to off Sydero Island in the
Faeroes, that Nelson has passed overhead on his way to a success-
ful completion of that hop. Worried about the others, he had
dropped a message asking the destroyer to notify him by whistle
blasts whether or not they had passed. Receiving a negative signal,
he waved them goodbye and speeded on. Later in the afternoon
"anchored as before" to find the Chicago and Boston moored and
the fliers glad to hear that Nelson was safe. It later developed that
Nelson had side slipped into the fog bank which the other two
had avoided by zooming up hurriedly. Not seeing them when he
came clear again, he arrived at the conclusion that they had gone
on and did likewise; they, not seeing him, thought he had crashed
so turned back to get word to Davidson and the Richmond. They
circled over Kirkwall until they attracted Davidson's attention,
and then dropped a message at his feet giving him the information
forwarded to the ship.
The weather conditions on August 3 were much the same as
those of the day before, and again the planes were gotten off the
water only with difficulty and delay. The Raleigh, stationed
twenty-five miles southeast from Hornafjord, and the Reid, mid-
way between there and the Faeroes, had been forwarding reports
throughout the night which indicated a possibility of high winds
along the last part of that leg. The Richmond was well on her
way to Reykjavik again when a priority despatch came through
from the Billingsley announcing that Wade in the Boston had had
to make a forced landing between the Orkneys and the Faeroes,
and was in need of immediate assistance. Smith had circled over-
head to drop a message giving the meager information he liad as
to Wade's position. There followed then some real snappy work ;
within fifteen minutes a despatch was on its way to the States tell-
ing the War Department of the mishap to the Boston, and the other
ships were notified and given their search orders. In a little less
than an hour the Richmond had worked up to 30 knots from 15,
forcing to the limit the cold boilers just cut in; the two scouting
planes on board were being tuned up and got ready to hop off to
assist in the search when Wade's approximate position should be
reached. As the Richmond steamed along to the northward the
weather got worse and worse, the visibility decreasing and the
wind freshening. The Billingsley, racing down from the Faeroes,


  p. 1422 (#340)                      #

1422
[Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
reported similar conditions, and to add to the general situation, the
Reid reported Smith long overdue with vile weather at her station.
Official despatches were flying back and forth like the ball in a
hard fought tennis match, and the press representatives were filing
two hundred words apiece every time some fresh dope came in.
Things were looking serious until the Raleigh reported Smith's
passing and safe arrival. Having been so far off his course as not
even to sight the Reid, he must have done some very excellent
aerial navigation in a bad wind to have picked up the Raleigh dead
ahead. In connection with this leg of the flight, the Raleigh, in
establishing the base at Hornafjord, had mounted her radio field
set ashore through which she was able to maintain good communi-
cation with the camp on the beach while lying twenty-five miles
out.
Shortly after the report of Smith's arrival was received the
Billingsley flashed the word of sighting the Boston in tow of the
British trawler Rugby of Grimsby. The Richmond already had
launched by boom one of her Voughts with Lieutenant Commander
Leighton, aviation aide to Admiral Magruder, pilot. The sea was
so choppy by this time that the plane could not take off, due to the
fact that spray kept getting into its carburetor. This added to the
difficulties, and, while the ship was maneuvering to hoist the plane
aboard again without smashing it, the Billingsley relieved the
trawler of its tow.
With the VS 3/1 hoisted in, the Richmond proceeded to the de-
stroyer's position. She attempted to work close enough alongside
for a heaving line to be passed for the shifting of the tow line, but
the weather conditions made this extremely dangerous. Finally
the flagship floated a line down to leeward which was picked up by
the Billingsley, and the change of tow was effected. The Boston
was then worked up along the lee side until she was abreast the
starboard catapult. With some difficulty, on account of the mo-
tion, Ogden secured lines to the wing tips, and with still greater
difficulty the plane was fended off while Wade came aboard for a
conference as to its disposition. Even with the care exercised the
plane crashed against the ship's side several times with a force
great enough to crush in the frail wing tips. It was first decided
to dismantle her as far as possible and then sink her. The mere
idea of deserting the ship he had piloted and fussed over for almost


  p. 1423 (#341)                      #

1925]
1423
How the Navy Helped Them Home
three quarters of the way around the world caused Wade so much
pain that the decision was changed. Accordingly, an attempt was
made to hoist her in with the boom used for the Richmond's light
planes. All gasoline, oil and water were drained out and all of
the fliers' gear was removed. Even so, the Boston weighed about
3,500 pounds, a heavy load for the aviation boom. With the two
aviators aboard, a feeling of tenseness was in the air as the boat-
swain gave the signal to the winchman to heave around. As a
strain was being taken the ship began the uproll. The combination
of weight and suction effect between the pontoons and the water
was too much for the boom fittings: the pad eye on the mainmast
to which the boom topping lift is secured carried away, dropping
the plane several feet back into the water. All that prevented a
number of cracked heads was a little foresight and the presence
of that guardian angel whose especial charge is the protection of
sailors, for the rail was crowded with sight-seers. As that heavy
steel boom crashed down on the army plane, ripping through a
wing, smashing a propeller tip and punching a bad hole in the port
pontoon, Wade and Ogden winced as though they, rather than
their ship, had been struck. Again it was decided to abandon the
Boston, and again the decision was changed to give two real men
every chance to complete their undertaking. The hole in the pon-
toon was patched with white lead and canvas and the plane was
dropped aft.
At 2045 the Richmond began steaming for a sheltered bay on
the lee of Sydero Island at speeds varying from 4 to 8 knots with
the sea logged as “rough” and the wind south, force 4-5. Our
army shipmates spent an hour or so watching the Boston ride
smoothly enough in the Richmond's wake before going below for
some much needed food and rest. Not knowing how long they
might have to drift until picked up they had not touched their
emergency rations. Strangely enough, the comparatively easy
corkscrew the Richmond was executing gave them a bad touch of
the hated mal de mer, though the violent motion of the plane dur-
ing its ten hours of drifting had not affected them; they had been
too busy keeping her pointed up into the wind and sea and trying
to repair the broken oil pump which had caused their forced land-
ing to think of being sick.


  p. 1424 (#342)                      #


BA
U.S.N. Official Photo
“USS. BILLINGSLEY" WITH PLANE "Boston" IN Tow AFTER "Boston's" FORCED LANDING OFF THE FAEROES


  p. 1425 (#343)                      #

1925)
1425
How the Navy Helped Them Home
An entry in the log for the morning watch, August 4, gives,
briefly and concisely, the end of a dream for two men :
4:46: About five miles off Sumbo Light, Faero Islands, towing bridle
of U. S. Army plane No. 3, Boston, carried away causing plane to go
adrift. Plane which had list to port settled nose first then turned over,
after part of fuselage, tail and pontoons remaining in sight. 5:10:
Abandoned U. S. Army seaplane No. 3.
Only a few were on deck to watch the Boston slowly drift down
onto the rocks of Sydero Island, and the wisest of these was an
electrician's mate, named Day, who rushed for his camera. His
two exclusive pictures of the sinking of the Boston netted him
enough for at least one good liberty in the States when the Uni-
versal News Service and Pathé representatives began bidding for
the negatives. The two fliers were not notified until breakfast
time when their plane was a small speck on the horizon. Being
good sports, they tried to assume a "Well, that's that” expression,
but it was apparent that their hearts were almost broken by this
last jolt Fate had handed them; they were like lost souls for the
next day and a half. Up to the last minute they had hoped to be
able to make repairs with the spare parts in Iceland and to con-
tinue with their leader.
During the hours in which the radio was "for official use only"
the prolific pens of the six newspaper men had piled up a total of a
little over 8,300 words of press, and the next big item was getting
their stories back to the papers. The “flashes,” short dispatches of
about twenty words giving a meager statement of facts, were
cleared first, in rotation, the order having been determined by
drawing lots. Then the separate stories were cut into “leads” and
"adds” of about 200 words each, which were arranged in that
same order. This prevented one paper from "hogging the air"
with a thousand words or so, and gave all six represented a lead
on which to build a story before the more detailed facts were
received. All these despatches were full of peculiar combinations
of words, as "offhopped,” “downcrashed” and “pro Iceland,” which
the English operators at Wick Radio had some difficulty in re-
ceiving. On the night the Boston was in tow, the radio gunner,
C. H. Ripley, in a fit of insomnia, took the key at 2300. At 0700
next morning he turned it over to one of the regular operators
with slightly over 4,000 words of press and official traffic cleared.


  p. 1426 (#344)                      #

1426
[Aug
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
The third start for Reykjavik proved more successful than the
first two, for daylight of August 5 showed ice-capped, mist-
shrouded mountains on the starboard bow and the Billingsley
lying-to off Cape Portland. Later in the morning the Reid was
passed on her station, and at 1300 the Richmond was rolling heav-
ily off the harbor of Reykjavik with Smith and Nelson en route
from Hornafjord in a wind bad enough to carry away the after
fittings of the port main antenna. An hour later the Chicago and
New Orleans were sighted booming along over the mountains to
the southward. Everybody had time to pity Wade and Ogden a
little as they stood on deck taking pictures of the formation, lop-
sided without their plane to complete the V. At 1420 the residents
of the city had one of their biggest thrills when the two planes
circled over the water front and landed in the inner harbor. The
Richmond stood on in and anchored off the breakwater, followed
in a few hours by the Billingsley and Reid, which, indeed, made
August 5 a big day for people who had never seen a plane or a
modern man-of-war before. The Raleigh arrived from the east
coast next day.
Reykjavik is a substantial looking city with its homes and public
buildings of stone. The small number of automobiles have excellent
hard roads and streets on which to run. The cars, together with a
movie theater and modern sporting goods stores, give an old, old
city quite a modern aspect. The inner harbor is always full of
coasting steamers and fishing smacks. Foul bottoms cause no
necessity for a dry dock or a marine railway there on account of
the large rise and fall of tide. A craft with a dirty hull is run on
the beach at high water and careened by tackles with the ebbing
tide as desired. The shops offered plenty in the way of souvenirs,
with sheepskins which had not started to shed, German binoculars
and automatics, and French perfumes, besides “Made in Denmark”
gadgets for the Cook's tourist trade. The one hotel, at which the
fliers made their headquarters, served good meals at reasonable
prices and obeyed implicitly the beer-light wine law of the island,
although the police seemed to be having difficulty with bootleggers
in other parts of the city. No drinks can be ordered in the hotel
dining room after nine P.M., but those with rooms can keep-that
service busy indefinitely. Few of the old native costumes were in
evidence, the girls, really good looking if one likes blondes, wear-


  p. 1427 (#345)                      #

1925)
1427
How the Navy Helped Them Home
ing near-flapper styles. Sprung from a sea-faring race, they must
be taught from infancy never to trust a sailor; in spite of the
highly advertised attraction of a uniform, they were as cool toward
their visitors as blondes are supposed to be. The climate was a
pleasant surprise, the temperature running from 40° to 50° with
plenty of sunshine. In fact, a swimming meet was staged during
the stay of the American ships.
Soon after the squadron assembled in Reykjavik Harbor word
was received from the Gertrude Rask, a Danish steamer char-
tered by the Army to establish a base at Angmagsalik, Greenland,
that she had encountered a thirty-mile-wide band of pack ice off
that port and could proceed at the rate of only about four miles a
day. A later despatch announced that after working fifteen miles
into the pack she was stuck fast and drifting to the southward with
a coal shortage in sight. Four days of those and similar dis-
quieting reports made it an “Out of the trenches by Christmas”
situation. Following numerous conferences three alternatives
were proposed—a direct flight to Angmagsalik dependent upon
the ice conditions in that harbor and the feasibility of transporting
enough gasoline across the pack ice by the cruisers' scouting planes
for refueling ; complete elimination of Angmagsalik as a base and
a flight to the Raleigh to be stationed well clear of the ice south-
east of that place with the attendant dangers of refueling at sea
and lying overnight at the end of a line; or the extremely hazard-
ous direct Alight from Reykjavik to Fredericksdal around Cape
Farewell. Accordingly, the Raleigh was despatched on August 9
with Wade and Lieutenant Commander Leighton on board to pro-
ceed to the vicinity of Angmagsalik and make a reconnoissance of
the coast by plane. Pending her report there was nothing to do in
Reykjavik but further to cement the bonds of friendship at the
Hotel Island.
The Raleigh made a quick run over to Greenland, and the next
day began reporting dense fog and Aoating ice ninety miles south-
east of Angmagsalik. That afternoon, when stopped in a par-
ticularly dense fog bank, she sighted ice close aboard to seaward.
While maneuvering for sea room a large detached hummock
drifted down on her which necessitated backing emergency full
speed, forcing her down onto another hummock on the starboard
quarter and damaging the starboard propellers. This accident


  p. 1428 (#346)                      #


U.S.N. Official Photo
BLUEJACKETS FROM THE “U.S.S. RICHMOND" HAULING Lt. Eric Nelson's PlanE "New ORLEANS" OUT OF WATER AT
REYKJAVIK, ICELAND


  p. 1429 (#347)                      #

1925)
1429
How the Navy Helped Them Home
made her best speed without vibration from 8 to 9 knots. The
Raleigh's radio report of conditions reads, in part:
With great difficulty and several close calls succeeded at nineteen thirty
in passing through long belt of open pack ice without further damage.
Am standing off shore and will approach ice zone tomorrow but if con-
ditions remain at all the same communication by plane with Angmagsalik
will be impossible.
Subsequent reports were every bit as discouraging until 1930,
August 11, when a despatch was received from the Raleigh stat-
ing that her two planes had been able to make a reconnoissance of
the ice pack and of the harbor and containing the further good
news that the Gertrude Rask was at last clear of the ice, heading
north for Angmagsalik again. On the strength of this the small
steamer which had left Reykjavik with coal for the Rask was re-
called, and plans made for the disposition of the station vessels
along the line of flight. Word of the Rask's safe arrival at Ang-
magsalik was received on August 12, together with a report of fine
weather conditions at that place. On that same day one of the
Raleigh's planes landed near the Rask, the first plane to rest on
the icy waters of any of Greenland's harbors. It was immediately
surrounded by curious Eskimos in their frail kayaks.
Although the first general statements as to conditions found by
the Raleigh were encouraging to all those marking time in Iceland,
the later detailed report of what was observed on the aerial sur-
vey was enough to dampen the enthusiasm. That report is quoted
here to illustrate what fortitude Smith and his fellow fliers pos-
sessed, what faith they held in their venture to have decided to
make a six hundred-mile flight across the treacherous northern-
most Atlantic with such bleak inhospitableness and such uncer-
tainty at their destination:
1012: Planes returned from Angmagsalik Leighton and Wade having
inspected harbor and conferred with Schultz. Their report regarding con-
ditions there as follows: "Angmagsalik harbour insufficient size for takeoff
with fuel for Ivigtut. Entrance to harbour close beset with ice, broken
ice in Angmagsalik harbour and all adjacent fjords. Clear spaces amid
ice sufficient for landing with extreme care. Lanes can be freed of ice
by Schultz sufficient to permit planes takeoff with light load. Three lakes
to northward overestimated on chart. Southermost is ice free and large
enough for safe landing any conditions but takeoff possible only with dead
light load. Surroundings of harbour and of lakes rise sharply to approxi-


  p. 1430 (#348)                      #

1430
(Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
mately fifteen hundred feet necessitating immediate turn after takeoff.
Angmagsalik difficult to identify from seaward. Landmark is Sermilik
Fjord with large and prominent glacier extending into fjord at Petersen's
Bugt. Ikerasarsuak Fjord is not prominent as is obscured by high fore
shore altitude average twenty five hundred feet. Except from almost
directly overhead islands and mainland appear to be continuous. Chart of
Tasiusak accurate but Angmagsalik Harbour not easily picked up. Rask
is moored as shown on large scale chart with cables to land above water.
Ice contour off coast is particularly distinctive sweeping in sharply towards
coast forming large bight with outline as follows: From latitude 65-15
longitude 36-00 west ice line tends approximately northwesterly following
approximately arc of circle twenty five miles radius from center in latitude
65-38 longitude 36-05 thence west and southwest along arc of circle radius
twelve miles from center in latitude 65-15 longitude 37-15 thence approxi-
mately south fourteen miles when dips to southward and apparently
parallels coast line. Outside of iceline bight there is clear water except for
four large detached bergs. Pack broken south of Angmagsalik but solid
along shore line to east and west. Schultz is laying moorings in Tasiusak.
He will have landing lane cleared and will move up and down best landing
lane in motor boat. Unknown whether ice conditions will remain stable.
Schultz says for last two weeks sea at edge of pack has been smooth with
little wind. It was noted today that with moderate northeasterly winds
ceiling was one thousand to two thousand feet while weather inshore was
perfectly clear and calm prevailed at Angmagsalik with visibility well over
fifty miles. Indications are that in lee of ice pack at sea fogs or low
clouds may be expected with strong possibility clear weather inshore.”
Weather foggy here now 1530.
With these details at hand a final conference was called on the
Richmond on August 13. Smith and the admiral and the com-
manding officers of the patrol ships spent the forenoon poring over
charts and weather reports, and finally formulated the plans for
the leg of the flight which was to be a real test for the Douglas
planes and Liberty motors. These plans called for a hop to Ang-
maksalik, a take-off the next morning with just enough fuel to
reach the Raleigh at her station, and refueling to capacity at the
end of her one hundred fifty-yard drift lines. The Billingsley,
Reid and Richmond were to be spaced along the line from Reyk-
javik to the Raleigh's position in the order named, and August 15
was chosen for the attempt. The pontoons and other spare parts
which had been shipped to Iceland months before were loaded
aboard the Richmond that afternoon. Next morning the two de-
stroyers came alongside to have their rapidly decreasing fuel


  p. 1431 (#349)                      #

1925)
1431
How the Navy Helped Them Home
supply bolstered up. As a farewell to that out-of-the-way place,
a reception and dance were held on the flagship. Some of the
townspeople came to dance, some for the refreshments, but the
majority were interestedly curious about the ship and glad for the
opportunity to look here over as few visitors had been on board.
Though only a few of the girls spoke English, they had no trouble
with the American style of dancing, so what looked at first to be a
stupid affair turned out a really good party. When the Richmond
sailed at 1900 the Billingsley was already well on her way to a
point about the middle of the line of flight while the Reid was still
in the harbor making hurried repairs to a section of her port main
steam line which had suffered a casualty as she was getting under-
way that forenoon. That eight hour delay necessitated an ex-
change in the positions of the destroyers.
During the forenoon of August 15 the Richmond reached and
lay-to on her station in latitude 64-22 north ; longitude 32-44 west,
about one hundred seventy miles southeast of Angmagsalik.
Shortly after her arrival a despatch was received from Smith stat-
ing that he had decided to delay the flight one day while the ad-
vance agent on the Gertrude Rask inspected a harbor to the
northward reported to be ice free. The wind had been increasing
right along, and by that time was being logged at fifty miles an
hour. To conserve fuel it was not attempted to keep the ship
pointed up into it; she lay broadside to the wind and sea rolling
heavily. That night a squall carried away the after fittings of the
port main antenna again, and a few minutes later the anemometer
disappeared down to leeward, spinning merrily. Though the de-
stroyers were having fair weather, the Raleigh was in the path of
the same storm, which delayed the start another day. After thirty-
six hours of very uncomfortable rolling and when a particularly
bad lurch had cleared one end of the wardroom table, piling half
a dozen of the fourth ward with coffee and dessert into a corner,
one of the newspaper men rushed back to the radio room to send
a despatch to his paper saying that the Navy was suffering the real
hardships of the world flight. He was not seen for the next four
meals.
The new ice-free harbor did not turn out so well, and, the
weather conditions at the important end of the Reykjavik-Ang-
maksalik leg still remaining bad, Smith advised the admiral early


  p. 1432 (#350)                      #

1432
[Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
on August 17 that he had definitely decided to abandon Angmag-
salik as a base. He was going to try the long eight hundred-mile
jump direct to Fredericksdal. Orders were issued stationing the
Reid, Billingsley, Raleigh, Barry and Richmond from east to west
between Reykjavik and Cape Farwell one hundred to one hundred
fifty miles apart. The Islands Falk, a Danish battleship on an in-
spection cruise through Greenland, had volunteered to act as sta-
tion ship at the destination. All the vessels of the patrol got
underway for their new stations immediately upon receipt of the
movement order so the stage would be set for August 18. The
Richmond, proceeding to her position about seventy miles ENE.
of Cape Farewell, soon ran into glorious sunshine and a calm sea
which gave an opporunity to get the main antenna up again. So
clear was it that day and Monday that “Greenland's icy moun-
tains” were plainly visible at distances of from fifty to seventy
miles.
The hourly reports from the different station ships throughout
the night of August 17-18 indicated perfect flying weather to fol-
low. As the morning and forenoon dragged along with no report
of the departure of the planes from Reykjavik, it was amusing to
read the descriptions of the weather conditions forwarded to
Smith; each ship seemed to be trying to urge him on with state-
ments that almost reached the poetic at times. Finally, at 1020,
a despatch was received from Reykjavik radio to the effect that,
while attempting to take off in the rather choppy sea running in
the harbor, the Chicago had carried away her front pontoon
spreader bar and the New Orleans had damaged her propeller.
Spares for these parts were on the Richmond at the far end of the
line, so she had to make a fourth start for Iceland, following back
the route later to be taken by the planes so as to speak the other
patrol vessels.
The Raleigh was ordered to take the position vacated by the
flagship while the Billingsley and Reid were each moved one sta-
tion to the westward, the Barry remaining number four ship. As
the last named was to proceed to Pictou, Nova Scotia, as soon as
the flight had passed, it was decided to transfer Ogden to her at
this stage of the game. Some difficulty was experienced in making
contact that evening so that it was quite dark when her lights
were picked up. The destroyer lowered a boat which pulled up


  p. 1433 (#351)                      #

1925)
1433
How the Navy Helped Them Home
alongside the starboard torpedo casemate in the glare of the Rich-
inond's searchlights. · After saying goodbye to his shipmates of
two weeks Ogden dropped down a Jacob's ladder with his baggage,
and was bobbing along toward the Barry almost before those tak-
ing in the movies on deck realized what was going on. Somewhat
later the Raleigh was intercepted and Lieutenant Commander
Leighton returned. About this time it was considered, to con-
serve fuel, to send the spare parts on from the Richmond's posi-
tion by seaplane. Later weather conditions made this a risky
undertaking, and eventually the plan was discarded. Reykjavik
was reached the second time during the forenoon watch on August
20. The spare parts were sent ashore immediately, not only those
needed to effect the repairs on the planes, but everything which
had been loaded aboard a week before so that there would be no
return in case of further mishaps. As Locatelli, the Italian ace
attempting a flight to South America, had caught up with the
Americans through this last delay by a direct flight from the
Faeroes, he was granted permission to take advantage of the naval
patrol. Accordingly, in exchange for the spare parts sent ashore,
the Richmond received on board an additional passenger in the
person of Lieutenant Silvio Marescalchi, of the Italian Navy, and
the few emergency rations and small spares carried by him as
advance agent for his countryman. Besides being an ardent ad-
mirer of Locatelli and one of his best friends, Lieutenant Ma-
rescalchi is the son of the man who constructed the Italian plane.
The plane was originally designed for Amundsen's contemplated
polar flight which fell through, it is believed, for lack of funds.
Upon the return of the admiral from a final conference with Smith,
the Richmond got underway for her new station about seventy
miles southwest of Reykjavik.
With the repairs to the planes completed, August 21 was def-
initely set for the flight from Iceland to Greenland. Because there
had been some delay in getting the weather reports through for
the previous attempt, no chances were taken the night of August
20-21. Voluntarily, the flag aviation aide, the flag communication
officer, the ship's radio officer and the radio gunner spent the night
in the radio room receiving the reports from the other four Ameri-
can ships and the Islands Falk, recapitulating them and forward-
ing them to Smith. That kept the coffee percolater bubbling con-


  p. 1434 (#352)                      #

1434
[Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
tinuously, but it meant that, if the start should be delayed, it would
not be because the fliers did not know the weather conditions ahead.
All the ships reported ideal flying weather with the exception of
a little uncertainty at the far end. Smith had intended to start at
0300, Iceland time, or 0500 ship's time. 0500, 600, 0630 rolled
around with no word of their departure; visions of another crash
with the attendant delay had begun to take form when a flash came
through from Reykjavik radio stating that planes two and four
and Locatelli had hopped off. Again, as was the case in the Ork-
neys, the report was so much delayed that the fliers were almost
due before the word was received.
Immediately the Richmond put up a mighty pillar of smoke to
guide them, and hoisted one of the largest flags on board at the
fore as a signal indicating unchanged weather ahead. As the
planes had no radio, though commonly supposed to have, a set of
Aag and whistle signals had been prearranged to notify the fliers of
any change in conditions after their departure. “They're off !"
spread around the ship like wildfire and brought all hands on deck
more quickly than an emergency drill ever did. Breakfast was
completely forgotten while everybody stared hard at the horizon
hoping to be the first to sing out that the planes were in sight.
About 0730 a speck was picked up by the lookouts on the bridge
which rapidly assumed the form of Locatelli's queerly shaped
monoplane with its two engines mounted in tandem above the
wing, a propeller at each end of the unit. Right away the Rich-
mond steamed at full speed on the course to the next station vessel
so the planes could check their compasses. All of that started a
low hum of excitement which steadily grew as two more specks
were sighted. It was a much different sensation to watch those
tiny machines miles at sea than to be anchored in some harbor
when they passed overhead. On account of the great weight of
his seaplane, Locatelli had to fly much faster than the Americans
to maintain his altitude, which made the scene resemble a race.
With a nonchalant wave he was gone, his assistant pilot in the
cockpit and his two mechanics standing by the engines. It was a
real thrill when Smith passed so close that his features could be
made out, set and determined, eyes straight ahead, with the merest
wave to the bridge. Arnold, however, stood up grinning happily
and throwing kisses to everybody. Then old Eric Nelson flew so


  p. 1435 (#353)                      #

1925)
1435
How the Navy Helped Them Home
low and close that it looked for a moment as though he were going
to foul the starboard main shrouds. The movie men were crank-
ing away furiously and every camera on the ship was in evidence.
The pilot of the New Orleans saluted the admiral and the captain
and then centered his attention on getting back into formation be-
hind Smith while Harding gave the old highball and his lips could
be seen framing a yell which could not be heard. Only when the
planes were again small specks on the horizon was a cold break-
fast turned to.
Knowing the approximate speed of the planes and the distances
between ships, it was possible to figure out pretty closely when they
were due to be sighted all along the line. For a few minutes be-
fore that time the deck outside the radio room would become
crowded while a feeling of tenseness could be felt in the air. As
the seconds ticked by a restless murmur would spring up until the
word would come out: "Sighted by the Reid; abeam of her now;
passed out of sight.” Then the crowd would drift back to its vari-
ous duties for another hour and a half. Shortly before noon the
Barry reported the two army planes abeam and sixteen minutes
later their passing out of sight. From that time on the weather on
the Raleigh's station and at Fredericksdal began to change for the
worse with fog and light drizzle and poor landing conditions. The
two destroyers of the European squadron were en route to the
British Isles while the Barry and Richmond were steaming on
down along the line of flight. When the schedule called for a flash
from the last American ship in line the deck near the center of
information was jamined. The Raleigh did not see the planes nor
even hear them. It was very apparent that afternoon what feeling
toward the success of the flight had developed among the personnel
of the naval patrol, how fully they considered it as much their
undertaking as the Army's from the interest shown in the safe
arrival of the Chicago and New Orleans at Fredericksdal. Just
about the time the wise-crackers were beginning to frame puns
about Cape Farewell a little despatch from the Islands Falk, via
the Milwaukee at Ivigtut, “1021 Plane number two arrived Fred-
ericksdal Okay 1530," dispelled some of the gloom. Forty-five
minutes later everybody was all smiles at the same news of plane
number four. Smith and Nelson had spine-chilling stories to tell
of dodging around icebergs in the fog, of becoming separated and


  p. 1436 (#354)                      #

1436
(Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
not knowing whether or not they might crash into each other at the
next turn, of finally sighting the smoke from the Danish ship
through a rift in the fog bank with the great sensation of security.
In general, the interest felt toward the army fliers overshadowed
that held for the stranger; it is feared that his well-being was
momentarily forgotten by many during the period anxiety was
felt for the safety of Smith and Nelson and later when their suc-
cess was the topic of the day. Marescalchi wandering about the
decks, pale and nervous, suddenly brought to a realization of the
fact that Locatelli had not been reported for some time. It seemed
that the Richmond was to be an unlucky influence when three
planes were involved in a leg of the flight. The other patrol ves-
sels were ordered to keep a close lookout for the Italian until it
was known that he must have landed somewhere, due to fuel
shortage. For awhile hope was held that, with his greater cruis-
ing radius, Locatelli had proceeded on to Labrador when he found
such poor weather conditions off the southern tip of Greenland.
However, a despatch from the Islands Falk stating that some
natives had heard the sound of a motor when the two American
planes were accounted for indicated that he had at least safely
gotten around Cape Farewell. The report made plausible the
theory that Locatelli had landed in the first suitable fjord encoun-
tered and would continue on to Fredericksdal with the lifting of
the fog.
When the next day, August 22, brought no word of his arrival
and investigation by the Danish authorities cast some doubt on
the credibility of the natives' report, plans were made for a care-
ful search of both coasts of Greenland. The Islands Falk at Fred-
ericksdal and the Milwaukee at Ivigtut organized parties of
Eskimos to work in and out of the numerous fjords in kayaks
while the two cruisers on the east coast instituted a search both
by ship and plane. Fog prevented any activities that first day, but
on August 23 the Richmond and the Raleigh were in good posi-
tions with clear weather conditions. During the morning watch
the flagship's No. 1 plane with Lieutenant Sallada pilot was hoisted
out and searched without success for two hours, covering a twenty-
mile strip on either side of the ship over pack ice and sea. Plane
No. 2, while being warmed up, backfired and burst into flames
which caused plenty of excitement in the early hours of the morn-


  p. 1437 (#355)                      #

1925]
1437
How the Navy Helped Them Home
ing. The fuselage was damaged beyond repair, reducing the
Richmond's searching ability somewhat. The two planes on the
Raleigh spent a little more than two hours each in the air, cover-
ing 2,700 square nautical miles with no sight of Locatelli. During
the day the ships had run in toward the coast, but with dusk they
worked out to sea again in order to keep well clear of the ice.
August 24 was a repetition of the preceding day except that fog
and mist prevented such an extensive search. While the navy
planes were in the air on the east coast the Chicago and New Or-
leans quietly made the two-hour hop from Fredericksdal to Ivig-
tut. That Sunday afternoon brought the Richmond her closest to
Greenland, a most forbidding looking coast line; bleak mountains,
snow-capped and misty ; valleys full of ice, glinting and flickering
in the sun; detached hummocks drifting out to sea; the wind
whistling and cold. In connection with the disparity in names of
these Danish possessions in the North Atlantic, a story was told in
Iceland at one of the gatherings in the Hotel Island. The dis-
coverers of Iceland, with their first impressions, called it such.
This descriptive name so scared prospective settlers that the gov-
ernment found it difficult to get the new land started. Profiting by
this phase of human nature, the same explorers, when they dis-
covered the second large island, decided to fool the public. There
is practically no green in Greenland while the harbor of Reykjavik
is remarkably ice free the year round. Correct or not, chrono-
logically and historically, it is an excellent explanation for the
apparent reversal of names.
That close view of Greenland made the chances of Locatelli and
his comrades seem exceedingly slim. When the Richmond ran
out to sea with nightfall the admiral had a despatch or two for
Operations on file in the radio room stating such. The fuel situa-
tion on the searching vessels was becoming serious while climate
and food supply were against the Italians. There was no thought
of giving up the search until some definite word regarding their
fate was received, and plans even were made for a tanker to come
north if necessary. The radio force was trying to get into com-
munication with one of the commercial stations in Nova Scotia in
order to clear these despatches when young Pinkston, a striker
on the signal bridge who has come in for a great deal of publicity
as a result, at 2320 sighted a fare on the horizon. The despatches


  p. 1438 (#356)                      #

1438
(Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
were killed immediately, and the Richmond went full speed down
the bearing, answering the flare with her Very pistols. The deck
log for the mid watch, August 25, is a complete story in brief :
Commences and until 4:00 A. M. Steaming on various courses at various
speeds, the Captain at the conn, heading toward what were thought might
be distress signals. 12:01 answered distress Very lights with two red
rockets and went ahead full speed, 20 knots, 193 rpm. 12:10 made out
steady white light on horizon dead ahead and fired two rockets which were
answered by Very lights. 12:15 turned on two searchlights. 12:20 made
out Italian monoplane 1-Deor in lat. 59-56 N; long. 39-48 W that had been
missing since Thursday afternoon, August 21. Made preparations for lower-
ing port life boat. Slowed to 10 knots. 12:30 monoplane in plain sight and
observed four passengers. Maneuvered to go alongside plane. 12:39 cast
over line to plane and brought her along side of port bow and allowed
plane to drift aft and around the stern to starboard quarter. 12:50 the
Honourable Antonio Locatelli, Deputy to the Italian Parliament; Lieu-
tenant Tullio Crosio, Royal Italian Air Service, Bruno Fulcinelli, and
Givoni Braccini, mechanics, came on board and were received as passengers
by order of the Commander Light Cruiser Divisions. Following conference
between the Commander Light Cruiser Divisions and the Honourable
Antonio Locatelli, the Commander Light Cruiser Divisions ordered plane
to be set afire, loose j andoned. 1:40 removed all baggage from
plane. 2:04 set fire to I-, id cast loose and went ahead slowly. 2:15
plane burst into bright fenes which suddenly disappeared at 2:31 and
I-Deor apparently sank, bearing 65 T, distance 4 miles.
That rescue was a weird scene, one to stick long in the memory.
There was enough fog and mist in the air to make the rays from
the searchlights ghostly; the four Italians were kneeling in the
bow of their plane, frantic with excitement, and snatches of the
Fascisti battle song were coming across the water. Their country-
man on deck was showing the Latin temperament to the extent
of talking four languages at once and coming dangerously close
to kissing the “brave Americans” on the cheek. With the decision
to dismantle the plane, while the fliers were removing their per-
sonal effects, the sailors were doing their best to get the 1-Deor
aboard in small pieces. Assisted by the incessant pounding against
the ship's side, within a half hour they had one wing almost en-
tirely stripped of its covering for souvenirs; all that kept them
from getting the engines and propellers was the inaccessibility of
those parts. When one of the sailors crawled out on the fuselage
and set fire to the oil-soaked waste train leading to the gasoline


  p. 1439 (#357)                      #

1925]
1439
How the Navy Helped Them Home
tanks and the I-Deor drifted astern, one of the newspaper men
was heard to say, "One more and the Richmond will be an ace.”
It did seem criminal to have to destroy that fine plane, uninjured
except for the rudders and ailerons.
With the lucky sighting of Locatelli's flare by Pinkston, the
Raleigh proceeded to Boston for propeller repairs and the Rich-
mond to Labrador. During the two-day run to Indian Harbor the
Italian fliers told and retold their story and autographed souvenir
pieces of the wing covering of their plane. A few hours before
dawn, on August 27, an iceberg as big as the Woolworth Building
loomed up suddenly on the port bow, fifteen hundred yards dis-
tant, with little of the customary warning of fog banks and a sud-
den drop in the temperature of the main injection. In the beam of
the searchlight fifteen hundred yards seemed fifty, and the officer-
of-the-deck was still jumpy with daylight and the coast in sight.
The Richmond stood in to Ice Tickle Straits the forenoon of
August 27, passing the Charles Ausburne, Lawrence and Mac-
Farland at anchor off Indian Harbor proper. The Lawrence came
to anchor nearer the flagship to simplify communications and make
conferences easier. Labrador, the pauk 't seen. 'n the Navy at
any rate, is a dreary looking country te destroyers that lay
there waiting for the flight deserve some real sympathy. With
their wardrooms crowded by extra passengers and the only amuse-
ments hunting and fishing in a rotten climate, their lot was not a
cheerful one. Toward the end of the flight duty hunting and fish-
ing were necessary amusements to provide variety in the menu.
That there was something to the question of a food shortage was
evidenced next day by the complimentary remarks from some of
the guests at lunch on the flagship. At the bottom of her pro-
visions too, the meal was an atrocious one, but those guests dove
into it as though it were a Hotel McAlpin special. The Richmond
received that day as passengers seven additional newspaper cor-
respondents and three more news reel camera men, representing the
Associated Press, the New York American, the North American
Newspaper Alliance, the United Press, the New York Times, the
New York World and the New York Herald-Tribune, and the
International News Reel, the Pathé Company and Kinograms.
They brought the extra mouths to feed to an even dozen, thirteen
newspaper men, five camera men, five members of the ill-fated


  p. 1440 (#358)                      #


U.S.N. Official Photo
LIEUTENANT Smith's First Touch of Soil on North American CONTINENT, ICE TICKLE,
LABRADOR


  p. 1441 (#359)                      #

1925]
1441
How the Navy Helped Them Home
Italian flight and an army aerologist. Locatelli and Crosio and the
aerologist messed in the wardroom at the regular time while the
news correspondents answered a second “pipe to dinner.” The
warrants messed the camera men and the chief petty officers the
two Italian mechanics so everybody was contented. A great deal
of friendly rivalry and kidding sprang up between the two news-
paper factions, the Icelandic Association and the Farthest North
Club. When the former, who had been on the Richmond through-
out, scoffed at the "farthest north” slogan, the latter published on
the wardroom bulletin board a set of hints for tourists entering
the tropics, illustrated with West Indian and south sea postcards
which made it a draw. The following may be giving away a news-
paper secret, but the Richmond received with the new passengers
about 9,000 words of press, the individual stories of the land-
ing of the U. S. Army Around the World Flight on the North
American continent. During the two days of waiting for the next
hop these stories were forwarded to the different papers and set
up ready for printing, except for the time, date, and weather con-
ditions. Though some of the stories were a little colorful, trained
imaginations very accurately pictured the actual happening, and it
was a relief to the radio personnel to know that there would be no
great traffic jam after the event.
On August 30 the patrol vessels were in position with the Mil-
waukee at Ivigtut and the Richmond anchored off Ice Tickle; the
Coghlan, MacFarland, Charles Ausburne and Lawrence were
equally spaced between the two. Sunday morning, August 31,
dawned bright and clear with similar conditions at all stations, and
at 0730, flagship time, planes two and four hopped off. The re-
ports of passing came from the first three ships on schedule time,
but the flash from the Lawrence almost caught the patrol at the
destination napping. The 112 nautical miles between the Charles
Ausburne and the Lawrence were covered in the record time of
fifty-nine minutes, or about 127 land miles an hour. The ship's
officers who wished to see the historic landing at close hand, the
civilian passengers and the working parties were rushed ashore
right away. With the time for their arrival near at hand every-
body on board was on deck watching for the two specks through
a depression in the low hills to the northward ; number two stack
was belching out black smoke in a five-mile long streamer to lee-


  p. 1442 (#360)                      #

1442
(Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
ward to such an extent that the paint was cracking and falling off,
and the main arc set was hissing telling VAS, Louisburg, Nova
Scotia, to stand by. Suddenly all the pent-up emotions of a month
of delays and discouragements and uncertainty burst out through
the whistle and siren as the Chicago and New Orleans came into
sight. Everywhere were smiles and back-clappings and eyes shin-
ing with gladness that at last they had got through, as though all
were trying to convince themselves that there never had been any
doubt.
The Lawrence stood in later that day and relieved some of the
congestion on the flagship by receiving eleven of the civilians, the
five Italians and the aerologist for transportation to Pictou. With
the Milwaukee in sight standing in to relieve her as station ship,
the Richmond got underway the next afternoon for the Bay of
Islands, Newfoundland. Four huge icebergs glinting in the sun
to seaward were remindful of the close call several nights before
so she steamed quite warily along the coast of Labrador. The
Straits of Belle Isle, where the British cruiser Raleigh was
wrecked, were entered shortly after midnight. Just before morn-
ing colors on September 2, the entrance to the Bay of Islands
was reached with the Brazos, dwarfed by the high surrounding
hills, at anchor inside with fuel and provisions and the first mail
since July 20. The Richmond went right alongside her to begin
fueling. She had brought twenty-four bags of mail from the
States, and had enough extra provisions to transfer some real
delicacies for the few remaining days of the flight duty. Canteen
stores were in the greatest demand, so her stock of cigarettes and
candy must have barely lasted through the day.
While the Richmond was fueling the fliers hopped off for the
short leg to Hawkes Bay, Newfoundland, near the Straits of Belle
Isle. This base was one of the several established by the Mil-
waukee en route to Indian Harbor in July and August. Short
hops were provided for in that area of fog and uncertain weather.
The MacFarland watched the planes pass over once again, and
soon they were due in the small bay where the Charles Ausburne
was waiting. Some time before their expected arrival a thick fog
set in, in which Smith and Nelson lost their bearings. When the
Charles Ausburne reported them long overdue and forwarded
news of motors being heard by people on shore in a place which


  p. 1443 (#361)                      #

1925]
1443
How the Navy Helped Them Home
indicated that they were far off their course, plans were made to
join in the search at once. The experiences with Wade and Loca-
telli made delays of even a few minutes portents to cause worry.
Just after the Richmond completed fueling the welcome report of
arrival was received with which she got underway for her position
for the next stop.
With Evangeline's country smiling in the sunlight and real
trains in sight on the beach, the flagship lay-to off Cape George,
Nova Scotia, September 3, keeping moving the reports of weather
conditions. After some delay the Chicago and New Orleans took
off from Hawkes Bay, and the Brazos near the entrance to the
Bay of Islands and Coghlan midway between Newfoundland and
Cape Breton Island reported their passing with pleasing regularity.
Right on schedule time the two planes were sighted below a low-
lying cloud bank to the northward, and the end of the patrol was
almost within view. As soon as Smith and Nelson passed with
the customary zooms and salutes the Richmond turned for the
Gut of Canso, the narrow passage separating Cape Breton Island
and Nova Scotia, at 25 knots for her station on the next leg, the
last in which she was actively interested.
The Gut of Canso, about fifteen miles long, averages a half a
mile in width. Because of the necessity for being on station near
Nahant Light for the proposed flight next day, the flagship did
not slow one turn of her screws. At that speed, possibly the
greatest ever made through the Gut by a vessel of her size, the
stern wave piled up on the beach on either side like breakers. The
small boats secured for the night made heavy weather of it, while
some canoers out in the stream paddled frantically to keep headed
up into the waves. A tug moored to one of the docks cast off
hurriedly, and it can be imagined what her skipper was saying.
With all that commotion along the shore line, the villagers left
their suppers to hang out of windows, wondering what was up. An
automobile tearing along the shore drive had a hard time keeping
abreast of the ship; the driver may have been trying to get an
idea of the speed she was making by comparison with his speed-
ometer. As the Richmond swung to the south a most magnificent
sunset flared up; to a believer in signs, it could have been Nature's
smile on the eve of the completion of a hard duty well done.


  p. 1444 (#362)                      #

1444
(Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
Shortly after dark word was received from Smith that, on ac-
count of rough water in the harbor at Pictou, some minor repairs
to the planes were uncompleted, and that the flight to Boston would
be delayed. With no especial need of hurry then, the Richmond
slowed to the more conservative speed of 15 knots, arriving in Bos-
ton harbor at daylight on September 5. So as to be on hand for
a demonstration second only to that which greeted the news of the
Armistice in 1918, all the civilian passengers left the ship that
morning as soon as pratique was granted. The Richmond re-
turned to her station off Nahant Light, and the stage was set
with the Barry at the start, the Lawrence off Saint Johns, New
Brunswick, and the MacFarland guarding Portland, Maine. News
of the take-off and the progress of the planes, now three in num-
ber again with the entrance of the Boston II, in the around-the-
world race, were relayed via the Richmond to the navy yard for
further relay to the hundred thousand people waiting at the Boston
airport in a bad rain for their first sight of the fliers. The V-
shaped formation was once again unlucky for the fiers had to
land in Casco Bay, Maine, for the night on account of fog. The
admiral went in to the navy yard, then, to grant some greatly ap-
preciated liberty. Seeing the flight pass overhead next day from
a berth alongside a navy yard dock while an escort of a dozen or
more land planes circled about and every whistle and bell in that
part of Massachusetts sounded out was a sort of anti-climax to
the scene in Labrador. It may have been that at Ice Tickle the
ship represented the government, the people, everything American;
back in the States she was but a small part of a monster ovation.
Statistics usually are boring and merely glanced over; a few of
those connected with the work of the Navy in patrolling the Army
Around the World Flight may prove of interest. Three light
cruisers, six destroyers and one oil tanker which took part in the
Alight duty had a total complement of 189 officers and 2,582 men.
In all, 11,221 hours were spent by these ships in safeguarding the
route to the planes. To steam the 46,820 miles cruised by all,
3,346,199 gallons of fuel oil were necessary, an additional expense
to the fight of $162,887. The Richmond, during the month of
August alone, handled by the direct method 99,453 words of radio
and visual traffic of which 52,645 words went to the various news-
papers represented. Extra watches and irregular hours were ac-


  p. 1445 (#363)                      #

1925)
1445
How the Navy Helped Them Home
cepted cheerfully by all hands, and the finest spirit prevailed
throughout. Sunday always seemed to be a lucky day: the num-
ber of noteworthy Sabbaths in August was remarkable. On
August 3 Wade made his forced landing and was rescued, while
Smith reached Iceland; August 10 was a dud, but on the seven-
teenth the decision to abandon Angmagsalik was reached. On the
twenty-fourth, Smith and Nelson flew from Fredericksdal to Ivig-
tut, and a few hours later Locatelli's flare was sighted, while the
thirty-first saw the flight across the Danish Straits and the historic
landing on the North American continent.
Besides the great satisfaction of knowing just how much was
the success of the army flight dependent upon the manner in which
the Navy carried out this unusual duty, is a certain material re-
ward in the decoration presented by the Independent Order of the
Sons of Italy with the following:
To the Commander, Officers and Sailors of the U. S. S. Richmond
Who with that noble and brethernly spirit and humane solidarity during
the night of the 24th of August, 1924, after untiring search found
and brought to safety the Italian ace "Lieutenant Antonio Locatelli" and
his brave companions, lost in the Arctic waters while on their heroic Alight
from Europe to the American coast.
"That noble and brethernly spirit and humane solidarity.” A
quaint expression perhaps, but one typifying the feeling in the
naval patrol. Look up the word “solidarity” again.


  p. 1446 (#364)                      #

THE SELECTION AND USE OF BINOCULARS
By Ensign Alan R. McCRACKEN, U. S. Navy
HE binocular is one of the most constantly used, and also
I abused, instruments aboard ship. Because it is indispensable
on deck, many naval officers find a real satisfaction in own-
ing it, but more often they pay the price of a scientific instrument
for a commercial toy. While there are reliable optical manufac-
turers whose products can be asked for by name, there are also
hundreds of so-called binoculars turned out in quantity factories
to be sold rather than to give real service. In nearly every for-
eign port an ambitious merchant may bring aboard a suit case
full of various types of instruments, many of which are next to
worthless. The salesman usually has every advantage over his
customer who does not, as a rule, know where or how to locate
defects in the optical system, but simply holds the glass to his
eyes, sees that it brings objects nearer, pronounces it a binocular,
and departs with his purchase. There are, however, those who
are not so easily pleased, and their application of the following
tests will prevent the selection of an inferior, damaged, or im-
properly adjusted instrument.
Naturally, the use which is to be made of a binocular deter-
mines to some extent its characteristics. For our purpose it is
reasonable to assume that a marine glass is desired, one that will
give results both day and night. Light weight glasses are the
most convenient, and as for finish, rubber vulcanized right on
the barrels is much more durable than leather. For use at sea a
binocular should be sealed air and moisture proof to protect the
prisms and lenses.
The desirable optical qualities are: a fairly high power, a large
field, sharp definition of objects, depth perception, and high per-
centage of light transmission. As is usually the case, several of
the requirements conflict.
Offhand, it sounds logical to state that the higher the power,
the better, but as the power increases what happens to the field ?


  p. 1447 (#365)                      #

1925)
1447
Selection and Use of Binoculars
It grows smaller, which is exactly contrary to the second require-
ment. A very high power so reduces the field that it is difficult
to locate and follow a moving object. Another practical limita-
tion is the fact that every motion of the binocular is magnified by
its power. With a very high powered instrument the slight trem-
blings of the hand and the roll of the ship appear so great, when
magnified, that the object viewed seems to jump about. It is
almost impossible to use a binocular of above ten power without
securing it to a rigid mount. The best compromise on power for
ship board use is six, seven, or eight. A higher power is too
difficult to use at sea and has too small a field, while a lower one
is inadequate.
The use of prisms, in addition to making a longer focal length
possible in a compact instrument, enables the objectives to be
separated wider than are the eyes, which adds greatly to depth
perception, that is, makes an object stand out. If one eye be
closed it is very difficult to judge depth, but with both eyes the
object is viewed from two different points simultaneously, and to
a certain extent both sides of it are seen at once. The composite
makes the object stand out clearly. For great distances, however,
the eyes are not far enough apart to make this effect sufficiently
marked. The prisms are so utilized that they are equivalent to
widening the space between the eyes and correspondingly heighten-
ing depth perception. The requirements of an opera glass,
cxactly opposite, further illustrate the same point. The stage
drops and wings are drawn in perspective on plane surfaces, and
have no real depth in themselves. The effect as seen by the naked
eye is not unpleasant, but if viewed through a binocular designed
to bring out depth, which in this case does not exist, the settings
appear baldly flat and totally lifeless. Therefore, instead of
widening the objectives, those of an opera glass are located closer
together than the eyes, using prisms, of course, to deflect the light
rays. The practical effect, then, is as if the stage were seen from
the single viewpoint of the perspective construction, and the flat
surfaces appear to have greater apparent depth than when viewed
by the eyes alone. Such a glass heightens the illusion as agree-
ably as the wide spread objectives make distant objects stand out.
Having decided upon a seven-power prism binocular, inspect
several pairs for the following mechanical characteristics. The


  p. 1448 (#366)                      #

1448
(Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
eye-pieces should be individually adjustable and both marked for
settings from plus five to minus five diopters. An instrument
which has but one eyepiece so marked is inconvenient to use as
it requires further adjusting by a central knob after raising the
binocular to the eyes, always an awkward and time-taking oper-
ation. Try the movement of the hinge. It should be stiff without
binding, and on the end should have a graduated arc which shows
in millimeters the distance between the eyepieces (the inter-
pupillary distance) at any angle of the hinge. This scale is
usually marked from about fifty-five to seventy-five.
The following tests will show up any flaws in the optical system
of a binocular.
1. With the objectives (large end) near a source of light, hold
an ordinary inch scale near one of the eyepieces. The small
circle of light which falls on the scale should be nearly a quarter
of an inch in diameter. This circle of light is called the exit
pupil, and for most efficient results should be the same size as the
pupil of the eye. When this condition exists, the binocular is
transmitting exactly the maximum number of light rays that the
eye can accommodate. An exit pupil larger than the pupil of the
eye is a waste of transmitted light rays, while a smaller exit pupil
allows the eye to overlap and part of its surface is not utilized.
At night any waste of available light or of pupil surface is par-
ticularly objectionable, hence the exit pupil should correspond to
the size of the pupils of the dark-accustomed eye which is just
under a quarter of an inch. To be sure, this size does waste a
narrow ring of light rays in the daytime when the pupils contract,
but it can be spared then with much less loss of efficiency than
at night.
2. Look into the objective ends to examine the condition of the
prisms. Any dirt spots or chipped edges will be plainly visible.
Spotted prisms are nearly always found in cheap binoculars, and
though it may be insisted that the spots make little difference
they do cost light rays in proportion to their size.
3. Examine the objective lenses themselves.
4. Examine the eyepiece lenses.
5. View some object through the binocular. No color should be
seen around the edge of the lens or of the object. An achromatic


  p. 1449 (#367)                      #

1925)
1419
Selection and Use of Binoculars
lens neutralizes the colors that are seen through a prism with the
exception of a faint trace of the yellow which is scarcely visible.
6. The prisms must be exactly at 90° to each other or the
image will be canted. Hold the binocular several inches from
the eyes so that a horizontal line, such as a window sill, can be
observed through it, and at the same time seen directly at each
side of the binocular. The real line and the image should form
a perfect continuation. Should the image be canted at a slighi
angle to the real line the prisms are inaccurately adjusted.
7. Lay the binocular on a support where it can be held solidly.
Sight through one side and bring some line or small object to the
edge of the field. Then, without moving the instrument, sight
through the other side of the binocular. The object should ap-
pear in exactly the same position in the field, regardless of the
hinge angle. Repeat the test with several different positions of
the hinge.
8. Using the binocular normally, bring some small bright object
to the edge of the field. Because of the curved surfaces of the
lenses the object will be slightly distorted, but this unavoidable
effect should not be extreme. Continue the test by moving the
binocular in a circle and bringing the object into every portion of
the outer field.
9. Look at a distant object, a smokestack for instance. The
details, such as mortar between the bricks, should show up clearly
and sharply.
10. Having chosen several pairs in this way, train them in turn
on some distant object at twilight. As it grows darker the image
grows dimmer and dimmer, probably disappearing in some of
the selected glasses before it does in others. Eliminate those
which lose the object until there is but one pair left.
A binocular which stands up under these tests will be worth
the price paid for it. By means of the first nine a number of
instruments suitable for day use are selected, while the tenth test
enables the purchaser to choose from them the one which is, in
addition, the best night glass.
Such an instrument deserves careful handling. Guard par-
ticularly against knocking or dropping the binocular. The strap is
insurance against dropping and should always be used. Few
prisms can withstand a fall as their adjustment is so delicate.


  p. 1450 (#368)                      #

1450
[Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
Should they be knocked out of alignment do not attempt to repair
them yourself, as the collimation, or lining-up, of binoculars is an
art which requires an expert and considerable apparatus.
In order to use a binocular with the best results a few pre-
liminary experiments must be made. The eyepiece settings re-
quired by the individual and also the distance between his eyes
must be determined. While there are special instruments for the
purpose they are not usually at hand and the glass itself will give
adequate results.
The eyepiece graduation is in diopters, a term used to express
the optical characteristics of a lens. If parallel rays of light pass
through a one-diopter lens they will meet at a point one meter
from the lens. A two-diopter lens will cause them to meet at a
point one-half a meter away, while a four-diopter lens focuses
them at a quarter of a meter. Set the eyepieces to plus five diop-
ters. Using one eye at a time slowly revolve its eyepiece, in the
direction which reduces the reading, until a distant object appears
distinct. Stop as soon as the point of distinctness is reached.
Although the eyepiece may be turned considerably farther without
blurring the image, for the eye accommodates itself to several
minus diopters, it is a severe strain if persisted in for any length
of time. This is the reason for beginning at a plus setting and
working toward the minus rather than vice versa. Turn the eye-
piece until the image just appears with perfect distinctness, then
note the reading on the diopter scale. Repeat several times as a
check, and remember the setting finally decided upon as the cor-
rect one for each eye. The diopter reading for a young man
with normal sight is generally not far from minus one. Near-
sighted eyes will require a higher minus reading, while the read-
ing for those of farsight will be in the direction of the plus side
of the scale.
To determine the inter-pupillary distance separate the ob-
jectives by opening the hinge to a wide angle. Look through the
binocular and the field will appear to be bounded by two slightly
overlapping circles. Close the hinge until the two fields merge
together and form a single perfect circle. Reference to the inter-
pupillary scale on the end of the hinge will show the distance be-
tween the eyes, from sixty to seventy millimeters except in ex-
treme cases.


  p. 1451 (#369)                      #

1925]
1451
Selection and Use of Binoculars
The owner of the instrument is now equipped to use it in a
military manner. He will not be confused with the amateur who
holds the glass to his eyes and fusses and turns and adjusts awk-
wardly while trying to locate an object. Instead he remembers
his own optical characteristics; right eye minus one, left eye
minus one and a half. He sets them in a second and as he raises
the binocular swings the hinge to sixty-four. Instantly, with his
first glance, he sees objects at their maximum clearness. Nor is
he limited to a particular pair of glasses. He can use any stan-
dard binocular with the same facility, and with the scientific
efficiency for which the naval officer strives.


  p. 1452 (#370)                      #

THE DACIA DILEMMA
By REAR ADMIRAL RICHARD WAINWRIGHT, U. S. Navy, Ret.
UR ambassador to Great Britain, Walter H. Page, had
many hard nuts to crack during the World War, but the
Dacia incident stands out impressively because of its im-
portance and the means he used to bring about a happy ending.
The Dacia was a German steamer that sought safety from the
allied cruisers at the outbreak of the war, in Port Arthur, Texas.
She was purchased by a man from Marquette, Michigan, whose
name was Breitung. She was duly registered and granted author-
ity to hoist the American flag early in 1915 under a law passed by
Congress to meet the growing need of more shipping. Up to that
time foreign-built vessels were prohibited registry unless after
serious damage at sea and extensive repairs. The new owner
loaded her with cotton and announced through the press his in-
tention of dispatching her to Germany. The shifting of a vessel
from a belligerent to a neutral flag has always been a delicate
question and one that has given rise to much discussion. Was it a
genuine transfer or was it a mere whitewash? At one time
hoisting a neutral flag over a belligerent-owned merchant vessel
was called whitewashing and often the coat of whitewash was
thought too thin to cover the belligerent ownership.
In his Life and Letters our ambassador tells how impressed
his subordinates were by his gravity of demeanor, both before
and after his interview with Sir Edward Grey about the
Dacia.
By looking into the laws of war at sea, we can see some
of the difficulties that confronted him when he protested,
under orders from Washington, against her seizure. Prior
to the World War, the transfer of a belligerent vessel to
a neutral flag was held under suspicion by American and
British courts and was prohibited by continental courts. In
the case of the Jemmy in 1801, Lord Stowell says: “When an
enemy ship has been transferred to a neutral owner but is left
under the same management and in the same trade as before the


  p. 1453 (#371)                      #

1925)
1453
The Dacia Dilemma
transfer, the conclusive presumption is raised that the transfer
is not genuine.” Again, in 1805, he says: “The court has often
had occasion to observe that where a ship asserted to have been
transferred is continued under the former agency and the former
habits of trade not all the swearing in the world will convince
it that it is a genuine transaction."
In the case of the Ernst Merck, in 1854, Dr. Lushington says:
“The law requires, where a vessel has been purchased shortly
before the commencement of the war or during the war, clear
and satisfactory proof of the right and title of the neutral claim-
ant, and of the entire divestment of all right and interest in the
enemy vendor. The onus is upon the claimant to produce this
proof; if he does not do so the court cannot restore.” In the case
of the Benito Estenger, which was captured during our war with
Spain, the Supreme Court says: “A colorable transfer of a ship
from a belligerent to a neutral is in itself ground for condemnation
as a prize. The burden of proving neutral ownership of a vessel
in a prize case is on claimant.” The general trend of the rule held
by the continental powers and by Japan was that enemy vessels
transferred to a neutral flag after knowledge of the outbreak of
hostilities were subject to condemnation.
At the London convention this subject was seriously discussed
and agreement reached after some difficulty. The rule for vessels
transferred prior to hostilities was fairly liberal, but the one for
transfer after the outbreak of hostilities, which is the case of the
Dacia, is quite rigid. Article 56 of the Declaration of London
says: “The transfer of an enemy vessel to a neutral flag, effected
after the opening of hostilities, is void unless it is proved that such
transfer was not made to evade the consequences which the enemy
character of the vessel would involve. ...." The Dacia, by the
American and British rule, was liable to capture and subject to
condemnation unless proof of good faith could be produced. By
the continental rule she was liable to capture and sure of con-
demnation. By Article 56 of the Declaration of London she was
liable to capture and sure of condemnation unless she could prove
that the transfer was not made to evade the consequences of her
former enemy character. By all the rules of international law
the Dacia was liable to capture and to being turned over to a
prize court. The American Government was bound by the rules
of the London Declaration, as it had insisted upon the acceptance


  p. 1454 (#372)                      #

1454
[Aug
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
by the Allies of that body of rules, and Ambassador Page had
been required to see Sir Edward Gray and urge their adoption
on four occasions. The British had refused to ratify the London
Declaration before the war as it too greatly limited the power of
her fleet. She finally reluctantly accepted the Declaration with
some reservations, so the United States was doubly bound to
accept the rules as adopted in London.
Under Article 56 the Dacia could have no hope of release once
she came under the jurisdiction of a British prize court and it is
doubtful if her Michigan owner with a German name hoped or
desired to escape capture. Otherwise, he would hardly have made
public his intention of sending to Germany an ex-German vessel,
acquired since the outbreak of war and with a cargo of cotton.
While cotton had not at that time been declared contraband, it did
touch a very sensitive nerve of the party in power. Did Breitung
desire to embroil the United States with Great Britain ? About
this time the American public was much stirred up about seizures
and detentions and general interruption of commerce, and by
the propaganda of Germans and Irish in the United States.
Great Britain had the right to seize and condemn the Dacia
under the rule forced upon her by our government. If she failed
to seize her and relinquished her right to condemn her, she was
threatened with the entry into commerce with Germany of all the
German merchant fleet that had sought the protection of American
harbors. If she exercised her right and the Dacia was con-
demned, she was threatened with the memories of 1812, and
realized the serious effect of the outcries of interested parties on
the American public.
No wonder our ambassador, who so well understood our duties
and interests in the war, was seriously affected by the situation :
and when inspired by the thought of a way to avoid both horns of
the dilemma carried the idea to Sir Edward Grey. He suggested
to Sir Edward Grey that the English fleet had been sufficiently
advertised and that it was time to give the French a chance. The
Dacia was seized by a French man-of-war and was condemned by
a French prize court. There was no holding ground for the
propagandists against the French people and the Dacia incident
was closed, much to the advantage of the Allies and in accordance
with the interests of the United States and the civilized world.


  p. 1455 (#373)                      #

A BACHELOR LOOKS AT THE NAVY PAY BILLS
By LIEUTENANT Harry A. ROCHESTER, U. S. Navy
FTER six and a half years at sea, living aboard ship does
not present the same novelty and attraction that it did
upon graduation from the Naval Academy. Living con-
ditions afloat are not made any the more pleasant at a navy yard,
where the general discomfort of ship life is aggravated by the
repair work. The Commissioner of Internal Revenue evidently
saw these various aspects in rendering a decision for the income
tax returns, that the stateroom of a naval vessel is considered a
temporary shelter, existing for its own purpose and the benefit
of the naval service.
After all, any personal inconvenience can be dismissed with
mention, as no unbearable hardship is imposed, and the dis-
comfort is transitory, like seasickness, being but a memory after
the moment. However, the provision of the Joint Service Pay
Bill of 1922, whereby, when at sea, officers with dependents are
given extra allowance for quarters ashore, is not to be disposed of
so lightly. On the other hand, unmarried officers or officers
without dependents, when at sea, receive no such allowances.
This discrimination is socially unjust and economically unsound.
Here, at the navy yard, or when anchored in port, the married
men can go ashore to quarters for which they receive allowances
in addition to their pay. Unmarried officers without dependents,
on the other hand, find it beyond their means to set up even a
modest establishment ashore. Sociologists tell us that marriage
is the normal state for the adult male. Yet, the celibate, living
in an unnatural social state, is further penalized by the pay bill,
which allots his brother married officer extra allowances for
quarters to the exclusion of the single men.
For any further comparison, and to obviate any illimitable dis-
cussion, let us consider the relative merit of married and un-
married officers to be equal in all respects, equal in rank and
service, equal in ability, and equal in their individual benefit to


  p. 1456 (#374)                      #

1456
[Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
the naval service. Such factors on the efficiency and morale of
these officers as are introduced by unexpected ship movements,
changes of orders, and similar influences will be considered as
producing the same effect in either case.
On looking back over six years or so, older officers can be seen
urging that the present pay bill be not protested by officers without
dependents, because if the bill were not passed by Congress, all
officers would revert to the 1908 pay bill, losing the war bonus
and commutation of quarters. With either pay bill the officers
without dependents would be paid according to the scale of 1908.
In either case the unmarried officer was to be neglected. With
the increased cost of living caused by the depreciation of the dollar
in the World War, a new pay bill was imperative. Accordingly,
a new pay bill was drafted, presented, and passed, wherein base
pay for rank, plus sea service, plus longevity was replaced by a
base pay effected primarily by longevity, then by rank, plus an
added subsistence and rental allowance for officers with dependents
when ashore and at sea.
There is no doubt that a drastic revision of the 1908 pay bill
was needed. The method of computing pay and allowances which
was adopted was, to a certain extent, compatible with the inter-
national social and political unrest, and with a partial readjust-
ment from the sky high inflation of war prices. But why did
officers without dependents not also receive increased remunera-
tion? With a lieutenant six and a half years out of the Naval
Academy, he actually had his pay decreased not only in the
actual number of dollars but also in the depreciation of the pur-
chasing value of dollars.
In 1908, at sea, a lieutenant with six years of commissioned
service received $2,880 a year. Today, a lieutenant of the same
length of service receives $2,616. However, the $264 decrease is
but a small loss in comparison with the difference in the purchas-
ing power of the dollar in 1908 and 1924. Dun's index number
of commodity prices for 1908 averages 115, and about 183 for
1924. In other words, the average commodity has advanced in
price in that period in the proportion of 115 to 183. Today,
$2,616 is equivalent in purchasing power to $2,616 times 115/183,
or to $1,644 in 1908. In the latter year, $2,880 was equivalent in
purchasing power to $2,880 times 183/115, or to $4,583 today.


  p. 1457 (#375)                      #

1925]
1457
A Bachelor Looks at Navy Bills
Has the celibate naval officer's corresponding worth depreciated
$4,583 minus $1,644, or $2,939 per year, equal to 112 per cent
of his present pay, during the last sixteen years ?
To the casual observer the sophistry of the present pay bill is
not obvious. But, some one says, the expenses for the necessities
of life of the married man are much more than those of an un-
married man. Of course, there is no contention to the contrary.
During the war, about the same time as the "ten per cent plus
cost” government contracts were made, the subsistence allowance
was born as an emergency measure, whereas, when the exigencies
of drastic war measures were over, and the "ten per cent plus
cost" contract policy was abandoned, the subsistence allowance
was carefully nurtured and used in connection with the Joint
Service Pay Bill of 1922.
The Navy Department in its appropriations sets aside a certain
amount for the pay of officers. Taking the case of the two
officers at seå, one with the dependents and the other without
dependents, we have the combined pay of these two officers
divided into three parts. One part goes to the officer without
dependents, an equal part to the officer with dependants, and the
third part for the dependents of the second officer. Here we have
a communistic economic organization. I am at a loss to find an
analogous system of compensation in other than the military arm
of the United States Government, or an analogous system of any
size or responsibility in the industrial world.
This viewpoint, doubtless, will seem indelicate and distasteful
to some married officers. Some may state that patriotism and not
desire of wealth should be the actuating motive for the ideal
officer. This view is heartily agreed with, but it may be added
that anyone who believes a bachelor will become wealthy if he
be given the quarters allowance had better spend his time study-
ing arithmetic. No matter, though, how lofty the ideals of the
individual officer may be, the fact is not precluded that the present
pay bill is communistic, wherein the monetary remuneration for
the personal services of two officers is shared by the dependents
of one of these officers.
The point is made that all bachelors should be taxed. The
United States has a bachelor's tax. The income tax allows an
exemption for dependents, of which a bachelor without depend-


  p. 1458 (#376)                      #

1458
[Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
ents cannot avail himself. It is a matter of phraseology to call
this an exemption for dependents, a tax for no dependents, or a
bachelor's tax.
In the same manner, an officer with dependents receives a
remuneration that exceeds the remuneration of an officer without
dependents by the dependents' allowance. An officer without
dependents is, in fact, taxed for his celibacy, the amount of the
dependents' allowance. Thus the naval officer bachelor, in addi-
tion, to the federal income bachelor tax, is taxed again by the
federal government for $936 extra. In the former case, the tax
is levied upon all classes covering the entire country. In the
second case, one particular class, a very small portion of the
United States citizens, is singled out for double taxation with a
pernicious discrimination.
A lesson ought to be learned from the recent reduction of
federal income taxes. Secretary Mellon, after an exhaustive
research and statistical study of all federal income taxes for 1922,
concluded that high rates for the larger incomes, by tending to
reduce disproportionately the yields from these incomes, made
further commercial or industrial expansion unprofitable, and so
stifled business. Of course an officer, in keeping with the best
traditions of the service, would not think of lessening his per-
sonal output, and he has no recourse, other than an article such
as this, with which to have any modifications made of any tax
concerning himself.
In retrospect, it seems that the Navy Pay Bill was drafted when
the United States was in a period of violent reaction and drastic
readjustment from the hardships and financial inflation of the
World War. Now, with financial affairs beginning to seek their
normal healthy level, the income tax was modified to be com-
patible with existing conditions. Why not equalize the remunera-
tion of officers with and without dependents by changing the
phraseology of the pay bill, and, in effect, give all officers the
present rental and subsistence allowance for dependents ?


  p. 1459 (#377)                      #

HONI HEKE'S WAR OF 1845 IN NEW ZEALAND
BY MAJOR EDWIN N. MCCLELLAN, U. S. MARINE CORPS
DEW, if any, of the thousands of American officers, blue-
jackets, and marines, of the fleet which visited New Zealand
this year, were aware that their forebears, serving on the sloop
of war St. Louis, had participated in stirring events under fire of
the Maoris in that vicinity eighty years before.
Chivalrous and magnanimous, there never were warriors who
possessed a higher degree of intelligent fighting spirit or played
the game of war with more sportsmanship than the Maoris. On
the body of one Maori general, killed in battle, was found the
order of the day, which began with a prayer and ended with the
biblical text: “If thine enemy hunger, feed him; if he thirst, give
him drink.” There are many incidents which show that the
Maoris practiced what they preached.
When the Waikato tribe heard that the army of General Cam-
eron was in a starving condition, they loaded a number of canoes
with potatoes, goats, and milk, and sent them up the river to feed
their enemies.
And of what fighting material they were made! In 1863, some
300 Maoris were shut up in intrenchments at a place called
Orakau. Without water, pounded at by the English artillery,
and under a hail of rifle bullets and hand grenades—unsuccess-
fully assaulted no less than five times—they held out for three
days, though completely surrounded. The English general sent
a flag of truce, inviting them to surrender honorably. To this
they made the ever famous reply, “Enough! We fight on, for-
ever, forever, forever!” Then the general offered to let the
women come out, and the answer was: “The women will fight as
well as we.” At length, on the afternoon of the third day, the
Maori garrison, assembling in a body, charged right through the
English lines, fairly jumping over the heads of their enemies, as
* The Story of New Zealand, Parsons, pp. 64-66.


  p. 1460 (#378)                      #

1460
[Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
they lay behind a bank. So unexpected and amazing was their
charge that they would have gotten away with but slight loss had
they not, when outside the lines, been headed off and confronted
by a force of colonial rangers and cavalry. Half of them fell ;
the remainder, including the celebrated war chief Rewi, got
clear away.1
After their conversion to Christianity the Maoris would not
fight on Sunday and were more than surprised to find that the
English, though professing to be Christians, paid no respect to
the Sabbath."
About the year 1375, the Maoris, a savage people from the
Polynesian or Hawaiian Islands, arrived in New Zealand in their
double canoes.
New Zealand was first seen by a European in 1642, when
Tasman, a Dutch navigator, anchored in a northern bay of Middle
Island, appropriately named by him Massacre Bay, because of
the murdering of some of his crew. Captain James Cook took
possession in the name of George III, in 1769, finding the Maoris
still in the Stone Age. The law of "indiscriminate retaliation"
prevailed among the Maoris and they cared little from which
foreigners, or when, they exacted revenge for any ill treatment.
The first European residents in New Zealand were Protestant
missionaries led by Samuel Marsden, who, in November, 1814,
settled at the Bay of Islands, on the northeast coast of North
Island. A Roman Catholic mission, under Bishop Pompallier,
was established in the same vicinity in 1838. It was not, however,
until 1839 that colonizing on a systematic basis began. King
William IV addressed the New Zealanders as an independent
people in 1833 and recognized their national flag the following
year. This was all forgotten in February, 1840, when the
Maoris relinquished their independence by the Treaty of Waitangi
and became subjects of Great Britain. The submission of the
Maoris was due largely to the influence of Chief Tamati Waka
Nene, who explained to his countrymen that the shadow of the
land would go to Queen Victoria but that the substance would
remain with them. British sovereignty was proclaimed on May
21, 1840.


  p. 1461 (#379)                      #

1925]
1461
Honi Heke's War of 1845
The seat of government was first at Kororareka (or Russell)
on the Bay of Islands, but in September, 1840, it was moved to
Auckland. On May 3, 1841, New Zealand was proclaimed inde-
pendent of New South Wales.
Hongi Hika, a scion of the illustrious Ngapuhui nation, and
Waikako—two great New Zealand Maori chiefs—visited England
in 1820 and learned how to use firearms. Upon the return of
Hongi to the Bay of Islands his first act was to arm his followers
and levy war upon the natives in the central part of North Island.
The fruits of his campaign were 2,000 dead natives. Hongi had
read a great deal about Napoleon and imitated that famous leader.
His luckless enemies, armed only with spears, tomahawks, and
clubs, were killed, enslaved, and eaten by battalion. Tupai Cupa
(or Te Pehi), being defeated by Hongi, went to England about
1826 to secure firearms in order that he might meet his enemy
with better chance of success. The English authorities refused
him the munitions of war and sent him back to New Zealand at
state expense with agricultural implements and domestic animals.
Between 1824 and 1840 the Maoris went mad over “preparation
for war," as attested by the acquisition of firearms and ammu-
nition. The result was inevitable—approximately 20,000 Maoris
were bumped off in the tribal wars. In this period about one
quarter of the population perished. When Hongi passed on to
his fathers, his son-in-law, Honi Heke, as we shall see, carried
on with the same martial zest.
Ill feeling between the natives and foreigners continued to in-
crease until, in June, 1843, the Wairau massacre precipitated the
Honi Heke War. Honi Heke had been educated at a mission
school. He was a brilliant leader of men and, judged from a
Maori viewpoint, an ardent patriot. The tribes loyal to Eng-
land were led by Tamati Waka Nene. A bickering in July, 1844,
on account of a woman in Heke’s tribe who had married an Euro-
pean named Lord, precipitated this war, but the actual cause was
the desire of Heke to wage war on the British, brought about by
the inefficient administration of affairs by the then governor and
the “Land Sharks.” In July, 1844, Honi Heke cut down the flag-
staff at Kororareka and repeated the act on January 10, 1845.
After deciding to attack Kororareka in March, 1845, Honi Heke's
first act was to cut down and burn the Kororareka flagstaff for the


  p. 1462 (#380)                      #

1462
[Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
third time. He was soon joined by Kawati, another renowned
chieftain.
The Bay of Islands was, at this time, a great port for Ameri-
can whalers, “there being not less than seventy or eighty of our
whalers touching and refitting annually." ? Probably "no other
port or harbor in the world competed, in its importance to the
American whaling interests, with the Bay of Islands.” 2
While this pot of hell broth was stewing, the U.S.S. St. Louis,
Captain Isaac McKeever, anchored off the town on March 3,
after an eight-day cruise from Sydney. The St. Louis had
sailed from Hampton Roads on May 23, 1843, and had visited
many countries, including China, where, in 1844, her bluejackets
and marines had landed at Canton to protect American property
and lives. Then, after visiting Chusan and Ningpo, she sailed
for Australia and New Zealand. Her guard of twenty-one
marines was in charge of Orderly Sergeant Thomas Hurst.
Upon his arrival at the Bay of Islands, Captain McKeever, as
he reported to Secretary of the Navy John Y. Mason, on March
13, 1845, “found the Island in a state of great commotion from a
threatened attack upon the British authorities by the Natives,”
and that the arrival of the St. Louis was very opportune, “the
force of the European population being entirely inadequate to
the protection of their wives, children and property." The ab-
sence of an American consul at the Bay of Islands had brought
about awkward results for “a few days before his arrival the
English Governor had required the acting Consul to haul down
the American flag."
"Pursuing a course of non-interference, excepting where hu-
manity should dictate” him to act, he “nevertheless, by obtaining
interviews with the Native chiefs,” exacted “from-them a pledge
of safety to the innocent women and children of the Europeans." o
? Captain McKeever's Report to Secretary Mason, March 13, 1845.
'Captain McKeever, although born in Pennsylvania and a citizen of that
state, was appointed a midshipman in the Navy from Louisiana, on Febru-
ary 1, 1809; promoted lieutenant, December 9, 1814; commander, May 27,
1830; captain on December 8, 1838, and died on April 1, 1856.
* Naval Institute, December, 1910, p. 1096.
• Relieved as Secretary by George Bancroft on March 11, 1845.
¢ "Captain's Letters” filed in Navy Library, Washington, D. C.


  p. 1463 (#381)                      #

1925)
1463
Honi Heke's War of 1845
By March 7, foreign refugees and their property started to
come on the St. Louis, and Captain McKeever's ship acted as a
general asylum from that date until he sailed for the United
States in April.
Early in March it was known that Honi Heke's troops were
in the neighborhood of Kororareka, and on the ninth of that
month the followers and allies of Honi Heke and Kawati were
estimated to be from six hundred to seven hundred. On this
date they gave the first indication of hostilities by firing on an
armed boat of the British that was pursuing plunderers. On the
same day, while reconnoitering, Lieutenant Philpot (command-
ing H.B.M.S. Hazard) and Midshipman Parrott were surprised
by a large band of Maoris who detained them for about ten
ininutes, but, by order of Honi Heke, liberated them on finding
that they had no followers. 8
Lieutenant Philpot, on the ninth, reported to Governor Fitz Roy
"the noble conduct of the natives in sending, under protection of
a white flag, from the First Block House, the wife and child of
John Tapper, signalman at the Flagstaff, who was wounded whilst
bravely working one of the guns.” 8 These two incidents illustrate
the altruistic tendencies of the Maoris and the ideal ethical code
that governed them in battle.
One Sunday about this time a missionary preached in the native
camp from the text in James, "Whence come wars and fighting.”
At the conclusion of the service, Honi Heke recommended the
priest to go and deliver the same sermon in the English camp,
as it was more applicable there than in his camp; and as a proof
of his wishes for peace, he informed the missionary that he had
released Lieutenant Philpot uninjured.
Then came March 11, the day on which Honi Heke secured
his "place in the sun." Before daylight several bands of about
two hundred Maoris each, made a general attack upon Korora-
reka. The key of the town was the Flagstaff Block House, situ-
ated on an eminence overlooking that village. Honi Heke's
strategy was perfect. Waiting until the attack on the town drew
'Log of St. Louis.
* Rusden's History of New Zealand.
Thomson's New Zealand, Vol. II, pp. 102-103; Rusden's History of
New Zealand.


  p. 1464 (#382)                      #

1464
(Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
off a considerable number of the Flagstaff Block House garrison
to reinforce the defenders of the town, he dashed forward with a
chosen band and, while most of the Block House guard were
away, secured possession of that position before its officer knew
of his presence.
The attack on Kororareka was repulsed, but the loss of the
Flagstaff Block House and the blowing up of their ammunition
magazine eventually caused the British to retreat aboard their
vessels about noon on the eleventh.10
Captain McKeever maintained strict neutrality during this battle.
However, he and his officers, bluejackets and marines voluntarily
placed themselves in as great danger as the combatants them-
selves when they went ashore in unarmed boats and, under the
musketry of the Maoris, extricated the European women and
children from the battle ground and carried them back to their
vessel. Captain McKeever sent his surgeons to the assistance oi
the Hazard's wounded. They remained on that vessel until the
twelfth.11
In a letter dated March 17, Lieutenant George Philpot, in
command of “Her Majesty's Ship Hazard,” thanked Captain
McKeever for the assistance he had rendered the English "in
taking off the sick and wounded from the beach at Russell (or
Kororareka) on the eleventh instant, whilst exposed to a heavy
fire from the Mawries (sic), and also for the general attention"
he had evinced toward them.12 The letter continued :
At the time I applied to you for aid, I was under the impression that you
had promised to land 150 men, should we be hard pressed. That impression
was formed merely from what I had casually heard in the stockade and on
the beach. Had I time to weigh the matter maturely I should have per-
ceived the impossibility of your acceding to my solicitation, as it was clearly
contrary to the principles of international law."
Governor Fitz Roy reported that Captain McKeever "could
not interfere hostilely, but he sent his unarmed boats and went
himself under frequent fire to succor the women and children and
convey them safely to his frigate."
Parsons, in his Story of New Zealand, wrote that “Anglo
Saxon brotherhood counted for something, even in 1845," for an
10 Log of St. Louis.
11 Log of St. Louis.
» Published in the National Intelligencer, July 30, 1845.


  p. 1465 (#383)                      #

1925)
1465
Honi Heke's War of 1845
“American ship in the Bay sent boats through the fire to save the
women and children from the Maoris."
J. B. Pompallier, “Bishop, etc. of the Western Ocean” (Catho-
lic Bishop of New Zealand), on March 13, wrote a letter to Cap-
tain McKeever in which he stated that the St. Louis had arrived
"at the very moment when the hostilities, which had been for
some time brewing among the natives and the English, arising out
of their political differences, were about to burst forth.” The
Bishop found "cause to bless Divine Providence" that his estab-
lishment had been spared; "that the natives, in their victory,"
had “not followed their ancient custom of massacring every
enemy that fell into their hands,” and that the "property of
Americans in the country” had been respected. He praised Cap-
tain McKeever for the "pacific counsels" which he had given to
the natives and stated that “the presence of the St. Louis here at
this distressing moment—your prudence in discerning the duties
of Humanity, abstracted from all feelings of nationality--the
prudent, firm, and benevolent counsels which have emanated from
you, have no doubt contributed not a little” in “causing the
Natives to practice a moderation foreign to their ancient cus-
toms.” 13
During this battle fifteen British were killed in action or died
from wounds and twenty were wounded, while about seventy
Maoris were killed and wounded.
In his report of the thirteenth, Captain McKeever expressed
the fear that one of the results of the rebellion would be “the
extermination of the New Zealanders by the English.” 14
On March 13 "the natives attacked and burned a portion of the
town of Kororareka."15 This brought about a panic among the
Europeans ashore and many were received on board the St. Louis.
The log of that vessel for the forenoon watch stated there had
been “received a number of distressed persons on board—inliabi-
tants of Kororareka, as passengers to Auckland,” that the "Na-
tives are employed in burning the remains of the town of Korora-
reka,” and that the English whaler Matilda and H.B.M.S. Hazard
got under way and commenced beating out of the harbor.” Gis-
borne, in his New Zealand, writes that all the Europeans fled and
* Published in National Intelligencer, July 30, 1845.
14 "Captains' Letters” filed in Navy Library.
15 Log of St. Louis.


  p. 1466 (#384)                      #

1466
[Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
that even the soldiers boarded the Hazard and sailed for Auck-
land “to the intense astonishment of the Natives.” The town
was ransacked and burnt, with the exception of the Roman Catho-
lic Mission and some American warehouses. What “rubbing
noses”—the Maori kiss—there must have been in Honi Heke's
army.
The St. Louis sailed from the Bay of Islands on March 14 with
“27 Cabin and 15 Ward Room passengers” and ninety-one other
passengers—a total of 133 children, women and men.15 She ar-
rived at Auckland in company with the Hazard on the sixteenth.
At 11:00 A.M. the following day, Governor Fitz Roy, with his
suite, visited the St. Louis and was saluted with fifteen guns on
his departure.15
On March 17, Governor Robert Fitz Roy addressed a letter16 to
Captain McKeever
Expressing the grateful thanks of the settlers in this Colony, and of the
local Government, for the humane, efficient, and ample assistance so promptly
given by the United States frigate St. Louis, under your command, and by
yourself personally, to the women and children at Russell, (or Kororareka,)
in the Bay of Islands, who were embarked by your unarmed boats on the
11th of this month. These and other distressed settlers, to the number of
about one hundred and fifty, found shelter and the kindest treatment on
board your ship, and were immediately brought, at much inconvenience, to
Auckland. I understand that it is your intention to return immediately to
the Bay of Islands; and it is very satisfactory to me to reflect that, while
your ship is there, the missionaries and their families, who have remained
at their stations, will have friends and, if it need be, a refuge within their
reach, until adequate protection can be given.
The St. Louis sailed from Auckland on March 19 with several
passengers including “two New Zealand Chiefs” and arrived at
Paihia (across the Bay of Islands from Kororareka) on the fol-
lowing day.17 Captain McKeever reported that he had returned
"to afford protection to American property at the Wahapo, as
well as to the remaining inhabitants of the Bay, until they should
procure some means of leaving it.”16 He also obtained "another
interview with hostile chiefs, and induced them to renew their
16 Published in National Intelligencer, July 30, 1845.
17 Log of St. Louis.


  p. 1467 (#385)                      #

1925)
1467
Honi Heke's War of 1845
promise of protection to the American property.” 18 They had
religiously kept their original promise but Captain McKeever
felt that since the “New Zealanders” had tasted the “sweets of
booty,” all property was in jeopardy and a renewal of their
pledge would do no harm.18 H.B.M.S. North Star assisted in
this work. Pleasant relations existed between the officers and
crews of the American and British warships. On March 31 the
North Star “shifted her berth nearer to the St. Louis.” 19
On April 3, the officers and crew of the St. Louis "cheered
H.B.M.S. North Star with three cheers which were returned. At
8:30 A.M. the North Star fired a salute of nine guns with the
American flag at the fore, which was returned by this ship with
the same number.” 19 By this time the American interests were
safe and on April 4 the St. Louis hoisted the "homeward bound
pennant,” and sailed for America. Captain McKeever had in-
tended to join the Brandywine at the Society Islands and return
to the United States in her company but the second trip to the
Bay of Islands interfered with his plans and he sailed direct for
Valparaiso.20 The St. Louis arrived at Valparaiso on May 17,
where she fell in with the Brandywine. Arriving at Rio Janeiro
she sailed from that port on August 9, 1845, and in thirty days
anchored at Hampton Roads.
Up to the end of Governor Fitz Roy's administration in Octo-
ber, 1845, the campaign against the Maoris was conducted with
loss and disaster to the British forces. The natives were unable
to contend with disciplined troops in the open, but within their
fortified pahs (villages) in the fastnesses of the forest they were
able to resist assaults with much loss to besiegers. Captain
George Grey relieved Fitz Roy, and he soon brought order out of
chaos. He not only conquered the Maoris but won their ad-
miration and love. 21
Honi Heke died, a Christian, from consumption, aged forty-
two, on August 6, 1850, kindly attended by his wife, daughter of
Hongi.
18 Published in National Intelligencer, July 30, 1845.
19 Log of St. Louis.
29 Report of Captain McKeever to Secretary, March 13, 1845, filed in
Navy Library.
* Gisborne's New Zealand.


  p. 1468 (#386)                      #

1468
(Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
Fourteen years after the courageous work of Captain McKee-
ver and his officers, bluejackets, and marines, Captain Josiah
Tattnall, in China, sprang to the assistance of the English with
the exclamation "Blood is thicker than water !" 22 Brave Tatt-
nall, a hero of the American Navy and also of the Confederate
Navy,23 in whose memory a U. S. destroyer has been named, 24
is known to us all because of his words as well as his deeds; but
McKeever, acting neutrally excepting where "humanity should
dictate,” yet “carrying on," in "unarmed boats” under fire in
saving innocent women and children, is an “Unknown" in naval
history
*2 Foster, in his American Diplomacy in the Orient. p. 248.
* Hamersly's General Register, p. 699.
** General Order No. 382, March 28, 1918.


  p. 1469 (#387)                      #

THE ARMY INDUSTRIAL COLLEGE
By Captain Elliot Snow (CC), U. S. Navy
TNDER a modified caption' the U. S. Department of Com-
merce, in 1924, issued an interesting and valuable pamph-
let which summarizes the activities of the Division of Sim-
plified Practice and describes the services offered by that division
to American industries. Briefly, the foreword to this publication
states that “our Industrial Machine is far from perfect” and then
indicates what can be saved "through the elimination of those
wastes arising out of too high a degree of diversification in certain
basic products.” The name affixed to this is that of one of the
greatest administrators and economists that the United States
has had for many years.
The foreword closes with these words: “The rate of our ad-
vance (saving in national effort through cooperation) must be
and will be in proportion to the extent in which we all cooperate
for the elimination of waste."
The control of industry during war, by cooperation, made the
subject of this article, does not deal with any individual indus-
try—but of the industry as a whole—toward which, the War
Department is slowly but surely and steadily pushing forward
through the leadership of the Assistant Secretary of War. Too
few of the people engaged in business and industry in the United
States of America, and far too few of the officers of the United
States Navy, have any adequate conception of the great task
of industrial mobilization placed upon the War Department by
post-war legislation. The wording, in part, of the amended act,
which brings about this situation and with it the need for hearty
and intelligent cooperation on the part of all, is very brief and
directly to the point.
Simplified Practice: What it is and what it offers—Bureau of Stand-
ards—United States Department of Commerce-U. S. Government Print-
ing Office, 1924.
* Herbert Hoover. Secretary of the United States Department of Commerce.
* The National Defense Act of June 3, 1916, as amended by various
acts the last of which was approved on June 7, 1924.


  p. 1470 (#388)                      #

1470
[Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
gs
Sec. 5a. Hereafter the Assistant Secretary of War .... shall be
charged with .... the assurance of adequate provision for the mobiliza-
tion of materiel and industrial organization essential to wartime needs.
"Where does the Navy come in?" will be a query made by
laymen interested in that service and by members of the naval
service itself. The question can, perhaps, be answered best and
briefly by saying, that the organization evolved, and the procedure
adopted, by the Assistant Secretary of War to bring about this
"assurance of adequate provision” does not overlook the Navy,
· but invites and provides for its close cooperation. For the pur-
pose of instructing army officers of the various supply branches
in the control of industry, there is conducted under the Assistant
Secretary of War what is known as the “Army Industrial Col-
lege.” Officers of all corps of the Navy, as well as of the Army,
have the privilege of attending this college. At the time this
article was written, this college was nearing the end of the second
year of its existence with a class of twenty-six officer-students.
Four of these were naval officer-students; two captains, one of
the line and one of the construction corps, and two commanders,
one of the supply corps, the other in the medical corps.
The World War, if it emphasized no other fact, showed that
the old time idea of war is gone forever—the notion that the
Army and Navy are the sole war-making agencies of a nation.
War is now made by a whole nation in arms and it involves in
its prosecution and outcome, the future of every man, woman,
and child; all are affected in one way or another and cooperative
effort assumes the highest order of importance. As far as industry
is concerned, we now know, too, that to defend one's self at war
"every drop of blood shed on the battle fields has to be mingled
with six drops of sweat of the brow by those at home in the
shops.”
It ought not to be necessary to bespeak for the Army Industrial
College the cooperation of the Army, Navy, and public at large,
because the simplified industrial practices it advocates and teaches
are no different from, nor less than those referred to in the open-
ing paragraph of this article. These all point the way toward and
hold out the hope of reducing, in the next war, “the sweat of the
brow to perhaps but four drops and the blood spilled to less prob-
ably than half a drop.”


  p. 1471 (#389)                      #

1925]
1471
The Army Industrial College
As it develops more and more the Army Industrial College will
rank higher and higher in its order of importance to the nation.
Even now, to mention it in conjunction with the Army War Col-
lege is but one way of indicating the position the former is fairly
earning for itself. The subjects of budgetary control, the con-
servation of our resources, and the study of the world's com-
modities are taught. Problems are given involving a study of
the principles of priority and the allocation of industrial facilities.
The value and effect of standardization and simplification are
brought out; the great war question involving transportation,
labor, and power control is looked into and investigated from all
angles. Lectures are given by experts on World War experiences
and by officers actually engaged in planning for the procurement of
various special types of equipment. A part of the instruction is
given by conference, dealing with the solution of a problem by a
group of officer-students. The closing problem of each session is
a war game in which all officers participate.
The regular full time course for officer-students is five inonths.
There are two sessions a year, the first commencing in September
and the second during the following February. To accommodate
officers of the Reserve Corps, special fifteen-day sessions are
arranged. These offer a splendid opportunity for reserve officers
(of the Navy as well as the Army) to become acquainted, in a
practical and interesting way, with the plans for war control of
industry by the government, An excellent description of the ap-
plication of this to the textile industry has been recently published
and is well worth a very careful reading by everyone. *
The younger, yet already well experienced officers of both ser-
vices, and their coequals in civil life throughout the land, who
chance to read these words, should remember that "by the time the
next eruption comes it may be they who are responsible for check-
ing the searing overflow with their sons in the lava.” Is it the part
of wisdom to let things slide this year—now-instead of courage-
ously insisting upon whole-hearted support of this movement for
war control of industry by government cooperation during peace ?5
4 "The Textile Industry in National Defense"-Dwight Davis, Asst.
Secretary of War. Annual Review and forecast number of the Textile
World. Vol. LXVII. February 7, 1925.
* Paraphrased from J. M. Barrie's rectorial address on "Courage” de-
livered at St. Andrews University (Scotland) May 3, 1922.


  p. 1472 (#390)                      #


POWELL'S "Perry's Victory On Lake Erie"
(On the staircase of the Senate Wing of Capitol at Washington.).


  p. 1473 (#391)                      #

POWELL'S “PERRY'S VICTORY ON LAKE ERIE”
By CHARLES LEE Lewis, Assistant PROFESSOR, U. S. N. A.
THERE has probably been more controversy over incidents
connected with the Battle of Lake Erie than about any other
engagement in American naval history. Indeed, in the war
of words which was fought by the adherents of Perry and Elliott,
after the actual battle, the amount of ink expended almost
equalled all the blood that was spilled by the American seamen in
the fight itself. It is not, however, the purpose of this paper to go
into that old controversy as to whether Elliott was at fault in not
bringing the Niagara soon enough to the support of Perry in his
flagship, the Lawrence, at a critical time in the battle. But there
is a difference of opinion as to other incidents during this crisis,
which invites investigation and yields some interesting results.
The popularly accepted opinion as to the details of Perry's
passage in the small boat from the Lawrence to the Niagara is
expressed in the painting by William Henry Powell, entitled
"Perry's Victory on Lake Erie.” This painting was authorized
by the Ohio General Assembly in 1857, and the original now
hangs in the rotunda of the State Capitol & Columbus. Sub-
sequently, Powell reproduced the picture on a larger scale for
the national government, and this copy was placed on the stair-
case of the Senate wing of the National Capitol. Photographic
copies of this painting have been used as illustrations in many
different histories, and a large number of people have been natur-
ally led to believe that its main features were based on the facts
of history, but an investigation into the available sources raises
a number of questions as to the historical accuracy of the paint-
ing. In the first place, where is Perry's famous motto-flag, bear-
ing the words of the dying Lawrence, “Don't give up the ship!”?
The flag which he bears over his shoulder, in the picture, is cer-
tainly not that flag, for it had no stars on it at all. Furthermore,
are Perry and the other persons in the boat correctly uniformed?
And, more important still, are the correct number of people with
Perry; particularly, was he accompanied by his small brother?


  p. 1474 (#392)                      #

1474
[Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
Now, as to the motto-flag, there have been written some very
wild statements about its appearance. In a paper by Commander
J. G. Eaton, written for the Military Historical Society of Massa-
chusetts, the flag is described as being “some fifty-seven feet
long.” Even as authoritative a writer as Soleyl describes it as
"a square red flag," while Niles? quotes from a letter of an eye-
witness of the battle the following: "On the flag was painted, in
characters legible to the whole fleet, the dying words of the im-
mortal Lawrence.” As a matter of fact, the old flag, made of
homespun, has the letters of the motto stitched in white on a blue
ground; it is about eight feet by ten feet in size, and the letters
vary from twelve to fourteen inches in height. As to whether
Perry took the flag with him in the small boat, the most extreme
statement to the contrary is found in the Life of Elliott which was
published anonymously in 1835. Here it is stated that Magratis
(one of the American officers in Perry's feet), when returning to
the Niagara from the Lawrence with a boat load of shot, picked
up the motto-flag which he found floating in the lake; that he car-
ried it on board the Niagara; that Perry afterwards saw it there,
inquired how it was brought on board, and proposed to hoist it;
but that Elliott suggested the contrary, saying, “He was not very
desirous of having a flag hoisted on his ship, which had been
hauled down from a ship that had been given up.” Probably, only
a heated controversy could have produced such distorted facts, and
even Cooper, who was one of Elliott's staunchest supporters, re-
peats none of these contentions in either his History of the Naz'y.
1839, or his Naval Biographies, 1846, both of which, it will be
noted, were published after the anonymous Life of Elliott.
Mackenziestates that the flag was left Aying on board the Law-
rence, and that it was hauled down with her other colors after
Perry had reached the Niagara; and that Magrath claimed that,
when he was sent to the Lawrence for shot, he unbent the flag and
took it on board the Niagara, which had by that time become
Perry's flagship. On the other hand, there is very good evidence
that Perry took the flag with him in the small boat. In the first
* History of the Naval Academy, p. 219.
? Life of Perry, 1821.
* Life of Elliott, p. 194.
* Life of Perry, 1840, Vol II, p. 45.


  p. 1475 (#393)                      #

1925]
1475
Perry's Victory on Lake Erie
place, there is a sketch of the life of Perry, written by Washington
Irving, in which the following statement is made: "Giving the
ship, therefore, in charge to Lieutenant Yarnall, who had already
distinguished himself by his bravery, he hauled down his union,
bearing the motto of Lawrence, and taking it under his arm, or-
dered to be put on board the Niagara.” This sketch was written
not very long after the battle. Furthermore, Lossinge has addi-
tional evidence, as follows: "He had already ordered his boat to
be lowered, his broad pennant and the banner with the glorious
words to be taken down. .... This (the motto-flag) was rolled
up and cast to him, after he entered his barge, by Hosea Sargent,
now (1867) living at Cambridge, Massachusetts.” Mahan? also
has a statement of the first importance that is pertinent to this
question. He says: “The following extract from the diary of Dr.
Usher Parsons, surgeon of the Lawrence, possesses value, the
more so as it is believed to have been copied from the log of the
vessel, which afterwards disappeared. The phraseology is that of
a log and a seaman, not of a physician.” Mahan then quotes as
follows from Parson's Diarys : "At 1:30, so entirely disabled we
could work the brig no longer. At 2:00 P.M., most of the guns
were dismounted, breechings gone, or carriages knocked to pieces.
At half-past two, when not another gun could be worked or fired,
Captain Perry hauled down the fighting flag, which bore this
motto 'Don't give up the ship, and repaired on board the Niagara,
where he raised it again. In ten minutes after we struck.” It
seems conclusive, therefore, that Perry took the famous motto-flag
with him in the small boat, and Powell should have shown this flag
in his painting instead of the strange banner which he has placed
over Perry's shoulder.
Now, as to the uniforms, there seem to be no navy regulations
to which one can turn for details as to the dress of either the
sailors or the officers of that period, but an examination of the
illustrations in histories and naval biographies written soon after
the War of 1812, as well as of old prints of the same time, will
reveal that Powell has dressed his people in the fashion of the Civil
In Analectic Magazine of December, 1813.
• Fieldbook of the War of 1812, p. 526.
* Sea Power in Its Relation to the War of 1812, Vol. II, p. 90, footnote.
• Publications of the Rhode Island Historical Society, Vol. VII, p. 244.


  p. 1476 (#394)                      #

1476
[Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
War rather than that of the War of 1812. Moreover, there seems
to be a question as to whether Perry wore his undress uniform,
as pictured by Powell. Cooper,' wishing to call attention to the
fact that the danger to which Perry exposed himself had been ex-
aggerated, says: “It is scarcely probable a single gun was trained
on the boat, more especially as Captain Perry was dressed in a
round-about, and could not be recognized.” This is substantiated
by Captain W. W. Dobbins.10 The father of Dobbins was a sail-
ing master, who assisted Perry in the building of the ships of his
squadron, and served actively on the lakes during the war. The
younger Dobbins, in writing his account, had unusual facilities in
the way of reference to his father's letters, papers, and memoranda
and notes made at the time of the battle; and, in fact, the manu-
script was submitted to the father, who approved of it in every
way.11 Among those letters were many from Dr. Parsons, to
whom there are frequent references throughout Dobbins' history
of the battle. After closing his account of the fighting, Dobbins
describes the return of Perry to his shattered flagship to receive
the surrender of the British officers, and in that connection?' he
writes, “During the day Perry had worn a round-jacket; he now
resumed his undress uniform to receive the officers of the captured
vessels in tendering their swords, as a formal submission.”
Mackenziel? also agrees with Dobbins' statement; but Lossing13
says that when Perry was on the point of setting out for the
Niagara "he laid aside his blue nankeen sailor's jacket which he
had worn all day, and put on the uniform of his rank.” The state-
ment is made on the authority of a letter from the Reverend
Francis Vinton, D.D., a son-in-law of Commodore Perry, to
Lossing. It is more likely, however, under the circumstances, that
Perry did not take the time, at that hazardous point in the battle,
to change his uniform, but rather that he wore the inconspicuous
round-jacket that he had put on at the beginning of the battle, and
did not change to the uniform of his rank until after his return
to the Lawrence when the victory was won.
* Battle of Erie, 1843, p. 46.
10 History of the Battle of Lake Erie, 1876, p. 58.
11 Letter from Librarian, Erie Public Library, Oct. 24, 1923.
12 Life of Perry, Vo. I, p. 264.
» Fieldbook of the War of 1812, p. 526.


  p. 1477 (#395)                      #

1925)
1477
Perry's Victory on Lake Erie
The third question, which has to do with the number of per-
sons in the boat, can be answered more conclusively. According to
naval historians, the number of those who accompanied Perry has
varied from four to eight persons. The earlier authorities, how-
ever, seem to be in agreement, if their statements are carefully
compared. The Naval Monument, 1816, quotes on page 91 a letter
from a naval officer, written from Erie and dated October 7, 1813,
in which it is stated that there were four sailors who rowed Perry's
small boat. Other early authorities, like Niles,14 Clark,15 and
Washington Irving, 16 do not give the number of the rowers nor the
total number in the boat. Irving, however, does mention in his
sketch the following very significant fact: "In leaving the Law-
rence he (Perry) gave his pilot choice either to remain on board,
or to accompany him; the faithful fellow told him, 'He'd stick by
him to the last,' and jumped into the boat. He (Perry) went off
from his ship in his usual gallant manner, standing up in the stern
of the boat, until the crew absolutely pulled him down among
them."'17 This would make, then, in addition to the four rowers
already mentioned a total of five persons in the boat besides Perry
himself. A very striking confirmation of this number is found in
a pamphlet entitled Battle of Lake Erie, a speech which was de-
livered by Dr. Usher Parsons, the surgeon of the Lawrence, before
the Rhode Island Historical Society on February 16, 1852. In
this address, Dr. Parsons says: “Perry at this moment, having
fought his own ship to the last, entered a boat with five men and
rowed to the Niagara." These facts, then, would appear to indi-
cate that Powell is in error in placing six oarsmen in Perry's boat.
But this is a matter of small consequence compared to the ques- .
tion as to whether the little lad, Alexander Perry, accompanied
his brother in the passage between the two ships. None of the
early authorities that I have already mentioned, such as Irving,
Clark, Niles, and the Naval Monument, say one word about the
little brother making this perilous passage. Nor do later writers,
like Cooper18 and Mackenzie,19 give Alexander Perry a place in
"Life of Perry, 1821.
* Naval History of the United States, 1814.
* Sketch of Perry in Analectic Magazine of December, 1813.
17 Ibid., Vol. II, p. 497.
* History of the Navy of the United States, 1839.


  p. 1478 (#396)                      #

1478
[Aug
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
the incident. Mackenzie,20 however, in speaking of certain things
which took place immediately after the return of Perry to his
flagship, the Lawrence, to receive the surrender of the British
officers, does refer to the little brother as "dozing in his ham-
mock.” Light is thrown on the meaning of this phrase by another
authority, who states positively that the lad remained on board the
Lawrence, while his brother was away on the hazardous under-
taking during the last phase of the battle. Sandford21 is the
authority for the statement, which is as follows: “In Dr. Parson's
address at Cleveland, on the tenth of September, 1860, is the fol-
lowing interesting item: 'Perry walked aft. . ... Then, casting
his eyes about, he inquired, “Where is my brother?” This brother
was a young midshipman of thirteen years. He had during the
battle acted as aid in running with orders to different parts of the
ship-for you must know that in the din and uproar of battle
orders can hardly be heard at three feet distance. We made a
general stir to look him up, not without fears that he had been
knocked overboard, but he was soon found in his berth, asleep,
exhausted by the exercise and excitement of the day.' ” 22 This
same statement is also repeated by Dobbins,23 who quotes it on the
authority of the same Dr. Parsons. It is, therefore, rather re-
markable that later writers, like Lossing, Bancroft, Roosevelt,
Maclay, and others, should have stated that Perry took his small
brother with him, when there seems to be no early authority for
such a statement, but first ratè evidence that he did not have his
brother with him. Perhaps the blame will have to be laid to
Cooper,24 who seems to have been the first to make the statement.
Powell should not, therefore, be censured too critically for the
historical shortcomings in his painting, for it appears that the
naval historians themselves have shown a tendency to pass state-
ments along without taking the trouble of verifying them. But
the painting does serve as 'a center for the discussion of the details
10 Life of Perry, 1840.
20 Ibid., Vol. II, p. 265.
*1 History of Erie County, Pennsylvania, 1894, p. 243, footnote.
22 Mr. Frank H. Severance, Secretary-Treasurer of the Buffalo Historical
Association, called my attention to this.
* History of the Battle of Lake Erie, p. 80.
Naval Biographies, Vol. II, p. 187.


  p. 1479 (#397)                      #

1925]
1479
Perry's Victory on Lake Erie
of this incident which took place during the crisis of the Battle
of Lake Erie, and it is hoped that artistic license will not seem to
have been handled too severely by historic accuracy in this attempt
to show that, in the painting, Perry's famous motto-flag should
have been in evidence, that neither Perry nor his boat crew are
properly uniformed, and finally, that there are too many persons
in the boat, as there were only four oarsmen, and young Alexander
Perry was left on the Lawrence.


  p. 1480 (#398)                      #

THE PACIFIC ZONE
BRITISH VIEW OF UNITED STATES NAVAL POLICY
A GENERAL COMMUNITY OF INTERESTS
The Coming Australian Visit by American Fleet
By Sir HERBERT RUSSELL
Editor's Note.-Attention is invited, in connection with this article, to
“The Situation in the Pacific,” by Major K. B. Ferguson, R.G.A., Ret., in
the Professional Notes, this issue.
\HE visit of the entire United States Pacific fleet to Aus-
I tralia in July next, on the conclusion of the grand ma-
næuvres in Hawaiian waters, is an event which will bring
home to the British nation a realisation of the meaning of Ameri-
can sea power as nothing else could. There is some bewilderment
of thought upon the subject in the British mind. The colossal
programme of naval construction which the United States sud-
denly announced to a war-weary world in 1919 was the starting
point of this bewilderment. With the Washington Agreement
the shipbuilding programme of the United States was entirely
revised. This epoch-making achievement, the first materialisation
in history of the doctrine of international limitation of armaments
by compact, was hailed with profound satisfaction in Great Britain.
She willingly waived her centuries' long tradition of naval su-
premacy in favour of a standard of perfect equality with the
United States. The vanishing of the threat of an unreasoning
rivalry was greeted with a sigh of genuine relief.
But presently there appeared signs of dissatisfaction with the
Washington Agreement on the part of the United States. Alle-
gations were openly made that Great Britain was not keeping
faith. Mr. Secretary Daniels went so far as to state that the
British were increasing the gun elevation of their older battle-
ships—an act in violation of the Washington pact. It is true
that he handsomely withdrew the suggestion on a disclaimer
from the British Ambassador. But the "filibuster" school had


  p. 1481 (#399)                      #

1925)
1481
The Pacific Zone
got going, and were not to be denied. Mr. William Shearer ap-
peared as their arch disciple. He preached the creed that the
British Navy was greatly superior to the United States Navy,
always with the covert suggestion that this was entirely the result
of bad faith on the part of the British Admiralty.
Once again there arose mental confusion in Great Britain as
to the meaning of all this pother. Possibly there was a tinge of
resentment at the frequent innuendoes which were so palpably
without justification. But since a perfectly frank understanding
existed between the Governments of the two powers, this slight
stirring of popular sentiment did not greatly matter. The British
Press generally took it as a form of propaganda, designed to
stimulate American opinion into demanding an increase of naval
strength. But where the British Press, in its turn, also became
a little puzzled was in its attempts to discover the real necessity
for this increase in naval strength. Was not the 5-5-3 ratio, as
between the United States, Great Britain, and Japan, a sufficient
standard of security? Great Britain has never dreamed of enter-
ing into naval rivalry with America, during the past half-century,
at any rate; she does not seriously believe that responsible
American opinion has ever dreamed of entering into naval rivalry
with her. Despite the warnings of the filibusters, common-sense
refuses to contemplate a contingency for which there are absolutely
no grounds in the respective aims, policies, and interests of the
two countries.
It is unquestionably the fact that British public opinion is very
vague upon the whole subject of United States sea power. Its
views upon its own Navy are perfectly definite and intelligible.
The necessity for a powerful sea defence is self-evident. Star-
vation is never more than a few weeks ahead, and only kept there
by the freedom of the seas. Only a few leagues of water sepa-
rate England from potential enemies. But the United States is
in no such case. She is a self-contained country, so far as the
necessities of life go. The nearest possible potential enemy, which
in any sense could be called a sea power, is 3,000 miles from her
shores. Her world commitments, in the way of dependencies,
are very small, and on the whole not very important to her gen-
eral prosperity. Why, then, all this filibustering?


  p. 1482 (#400)                      #

1482
[Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
The intelligent American (and I do not suggest that there is
such a thing as an unintelligent one) will have little difficulty in
realizing the British angle. But in realizing it, he will likewise
come to the conclusion that I am speaking the literal truth when
I say that British public opinion is very vague upon the whole
subject of United States sea power. It does not understand that
the sea has played a larger part in the history of the United States
than in that of any other nation, its own perhaps excepted.
Speaking as one whose vocation lies largely in the study of
naval strategical problems, I do not hesitate to say that were I
an American I should belong to the Big Navy party. I do not
think I should be a filibuster, although I might easily be con-
verted to the view that the end justified the means. A nation
can only take and maintain her place in the world by her power
to assert it. Germany is a case in point. Germany today is
probably stronger in population, and quite as strong in industrial
capacity as she was before the war. But who will pretend that
her word carries much weight? When she had the biggest army
and the second biggest Navy in the world she had only to speak
to be listened to and understood.
American strategical policy has never been formulated in
definite authoritative terms, so far as I am aware. The United
States has never, for example, openly proclaimed the doctrine of
the hegemony of the Pacific. Yet it is quite clear that she means
no other power shall have the hegemony of the Pacific. There
are only two nations which could compete with her for it. One
is Great Britain, which does not aspire to it; the other is Japan,
which very possibly does.
British naval opinion clearly recognizes that American pre-
eminence in the Pacific simply amounts to lightening its own
burthen, and therefore tacitly acquiesces in it. Personally I have
a very friendly feeling for the Japanese-most Englishmen have.
But it would be faithless to deny that a day may come when they
will prove a serious menace to the peace of the world, not neces-
sarily because they will seek war, but because they will not be
able to help themselves. Their population is rapidly approaching
the bursting point of territorial limitations, and it is with refer-
ence to their coming necessity for wider elbow room in the world
that their position as a great naval power must be considered.


  p. 1483 (#401)                      #

1925)
1483
The Pacific Zone
Australia has a keen perception of this aspect of the future, and
the visit of the Pacific Fleet to its shores therefore has a signifi-
cance for the people of that country which goes far deeper than
mere cordiality.
Naval policy is always shaped by the guiding idea of some
objective, hypothetical or real. When there is no real objective
to which to respond, such as the German Navy furnished to
Great Britain before the war, the natural course is to look
around, see where the next strongest sea power is concentrating
his forces, presume certain strategical schemes from his disposi-
tions, and proceed upon the idea of checkmating any disadvan-
tageous development of these. In pre-war days, when there
were seven first-class naval powers, this was called maintaining
the balance of power. Now that there are only three first-class
tiaval powers we can no longer employ such a subtle definition of
purpose. Besides, the Washington ratio determines the balance
although it is true that this has nothing to say about the distri-
bution of naval strength; the United States can send the whole
of her feet to cruise permanently in the Irish Sea if she wants
to without violating anything more than elementary sanity.
Japan is the great naval power of the Far East. From her
geographical position she possesses an obvious initial advantage
in any rivalry for the dominance of the Pacific as represented by
the opportunities for advantageously posting her forces so as to
command zones of paramount importance to international trade.
The British Navy has taken up the “interior line" of European
sea-communications, and the great preponderance of its striking
force is permanently in the Mediterranean. The United States
looks east and sees the Atlantic deserted as a naval zone. She
looks west, and across a very wide range it is true, beholds the
Japanese Fleet spreading on the Pacific. There, then, lies her
objective, call it hypothetical or real as you please.
It is never a safe doctrine to take it for granted that a country
does not want war so long as it is fully armed and strategically
emplaced for war. Statesmen are great opportunists, and Oliver
Cromwell spoke the true precept for preserving peace when he
said, "Put your trust in Providence—but keep your powder dry!"
The United States gave away a great deal at the Washington
Conference when she agreed not further to fortify Manila or


  p. 1484 (#402)                      #

1484
(Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
Guam as naval bases. Great Britain gave away very much less
when she correspondingly agreed with regard to Hong Kong,
because she had made up her mind to develop the strategical hub
of Singapore into a dreadnought dockyard.
The British Empire has never questioned that the naval policy
of the United States is dictated by the desire to maintain peace.
Dominance of the Pacific with her stands as a safe-guarding
measure, designed to uphold the principle of freedom of the seas;
not to menace it. Whatever other motives may lie behind the
visit of the Pacific Fleet to Australia, it is a grand demonstration.
For the interesting point, from the purely naval view, is that the
Pacific Fleet will be far beyond the scope of its own bases. If
a state of war existed it would be in practically the same position
as Admiral Rodman's battleship division when it went into the
North Sea.
Maybe it is rather straining a point to read strategical interpre-
tations into an amicable visit. But any movement outside of
purely normal routine on the part of a great war feet is bound
to challenge reflection. It is impossible to dissociate this Aus.
tralian visit from the idea of a common purpose in naval policy
between Great Britain and the United States, in the Pacific at
any rate. In 1919, Earl Jellicoe, fresh home from a world tour
of strategical observation, recommended the formation of a
British Pacific Battle Fleet. He pointed out that the Great War
had destroyed all pre-existent orientation of sea power, probably
for many years to come, and that the future zone of activity lay
in the Pacific. No sane man will believe that he had any refer-
ence to United States naval policy in making this proposal. Had
there been any question of rivalry the British response would
obviously have lain in North American or West Indian waters.
The British Admiralty realized that a war-weary nation would
never sanction Jellicoe's scheme, savouring as it did of prepara-
tions for another possible conflict, so they merely pigeon-holed
the project. But it was out of this that the decision with regard
to Singapore crystallised. Great Britain came to Washington
resolved upon Singapore; she would have withdrawn sooner than
sacrifice it. The United States, with characteristic breadth of
vision, offered no opposition. Possibly she rather approved the


  p. 1485 (#403)                      #

1925)
1485
The Pacific Zone
scheme. Japan was placated by the promise to leave the re-
sources of Hong Kong untouched.
The temporary abandonment of the Singapore project by the
British Labour Government resulted in a revelation of Australia's
view as to the possibilities of the naval situation in the Far East.
But for the timely visit of the Special Service Squadron, which
brought a practical assurance of the protection of the British
Fleet, the outcry which followed the decision not to proceed with
the Malaya base would have taken a much more pronounced
form. As it was, certain leading Australian newspapers openly
accused the British Government of betrayal, and spoke of looking
to the United States for security. Sometimes it is necessary to be
ruthlessly frank in order to be quite clear. Australia realizes
that American hegemony of the Pacific involves no sort of threat
to her. Japanese hegemony very well might. Great Britain, at
the other end of the earth, understands the same thing, although
with very much less vivid perception. Ethnological conditions
form the real background to a proper perspective of sea power in
the Pacific. American commercial enterprise has all the scope
it wants in Australia under existing circumstances; the question
of any change in the constitution of Australia does not therefore
present itself. Japan is faced with limitations which it is easy to
understand she would like to see removed.
The recent conference of British admirals at Singapore dis-
cussed the strategical situation which would arise in the event of
war in the Pacific, the Commander-in-Chief of the Royal Aus-
tralian Navy taking part. There can be war in the Pacific only
if the one strictly Pacific naval power is a combatant. British
policy is concerned with maintaining trade, keeping open the
ocean highways, and defending the territories which come within
the Commonwealth of British Nations. But Great Britain is
not prepared to transfer the bulk of her sea power from Euro-
pean waters into a zone which holds no active menace. Such a
step would be provocative, even were it feasible. It cannot be
feasible for some years to come. It is out of the question to
despatch a battle fleet into a zone which has no base to receive it.
Therefore it is quite in accord with British policy that the
United States should make the naval dominance of the Pacific her


  p. 1486 (#404)                      #

1486
(Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
particular business. I am not suggesting that the United States
is merely acting from a desire to conciliate British policy. For
America the Pacific has a more intimate significance than it holds
for Great Britain. It washes her western frontier and in ever
increasing degree it calls her trade. The economic effect of the
Panama Canal is to be strikingly seen in the development of the
western states since it was finished. Not only the coastwise
trade, but trade with the Far East and Australia, has increased
amazingly since August, 1914, when the waterway was first opened
to traffic. The coastal trade might well become of vital im-
portance to the United States in wartime. Homer Lea foresaw
this when, in his book, The Valour of Ignorance, he wrote, “With
the exception of the Monroe Doctrine, no undertaking calls for
greater naval and military expansion than the building of the
Panama Canal.”
As Great Britain understands American naval policy in the
Pacific it aims at (1) Maintaining the Monroe Doctrine, (2) De-
fence of American Pacific possessions and (3) Influence in the
big problems, especially those concerned with trade, in the Far
East. In all this there is nothing that can be said to come into
conflict with British Empire policy. On the other hand there is
a good deal that is quite in common with it. Naval strategy
tends to long views. It is not the situation as it exists today
which calls for any concern. Great Britain is quite prepared to
wait ten years for the completion of the Singapore base which
might be finished in two years were there any real necessity.
But the future holds shadows of disquieting possibilities. The
position into which China is drifting may become such as im-
peratively to demand intervention, and this may lead to anything.
The coming overflow of Japan's teeming millions might well pre-
cipitate a clash if any determined effort is made either to arrest
it or to determine its flow into certain channels only.
If the United States were drawn into a Pacific war the interest
of the British Empire in the struggle would be direct and pro-
found. If the British Empire were launched into a Pacific war,
America could not remain a disinterested spectator of the con-
flict. Here, I take it, we have the unwritten, unspoken meaning
of the visit of the Pacific Fleet to Australia. But neither the


  p. 1487 (#405)                      #

1925]
1487
The Pacific Zone
United States nor the British Empire want to be drawn into a
struggle in the Pacific. Their respective policies are directed to
making it not worth while on the part of any power to force a
war.
I think it is only fair to add that neither does Japan want
war. But will she be able to realize her ultimate needs without
coming into conflict with other nations? In this event she would
not shirk war. She would enter upon a conflict with an immense
initial strategic advantage inasmuch as she would be on the de-
fensive, in her own environment. It is not my present purpose
to discuss the possible causes and character of such a war. I
merely refer to it as a contingency which is in the far back of
our heads when we focus Pacific sea power.
The British Navy League, in its regular St. George's Day
"message,” considers it a "pregnant fact” that a United States
battle fleet is visiting Australia, which has never seen a British
battle fleet. I confess I am not quite clear as to what this means,
even in the sense of propaganda. Does it imply that the British
Admiralty ought to send the Mediterranean Fleet to Sydney?
Such an unprecedented step would have a directly provocative sug-
gestion. Australia must take the British battle fleet for granted
without seeing it. The United States Pacific Fleet may be going
somewhat outside of its normal cruising zone in visiting Aus-
tralia, but not to the degree of challenging any political comment.
The British battle fleets are based in European waters, and for
one of them to be ordered to the other side of the world would
amount to a gesture which would undoubtedly react unfavourably
upon the opinion of nations who would not unnaturally regard
such a demonstration as a mailed fist show.
The Pacific Fleet is assured of a warm welcome in Australia-
a welcome which will be endorsed throughout the British Empire.
No such formidable gathering of warships has ever visited another
country upon a flag-showing mission. The British Channel Fleet
which visited Cherbourg to lay the seeds of the entente cordiale
consisted of eight battleships. The French Northern Fleet which
returned the visit the following year was numerically stronger
but of a lower fighting value. With the exception of the battle-
cruiser Renown, which brought the Prince of Wales to New


  p. 1488 (#406)                      #

1488
[Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
York, and called at Honolulu, I cannot recall that any British
capital ship has ever visited either the United States nor any
of the United States dependencies, although cruiser visits are
fairly frequent. But this is the result of geographical conditions.
It quite fits in with the natural order of things for the Pacific
Fleet to visit Australia. It would set a good many chancellories
wondering and talking if the British Atlantic Fleet went on a
voyage to Manila Bay.


  p. 1489 (#407)                      #

DISCUSSION
Proposed Administrative Changes in Navy Department
(See page 357, March, 1925, PROCEEDINGS)
COMMANDER H. C. DINGER, U. S. Navy.—Commander Fisher deserves
great credit for bringing up a subject which is now of great concern. With
the reduced appropriation, it is incumbent on the Navy to obtain maximum
results from every dollar spent and any suggestion that has in view the
securing of more real worth for every navy dollar spent merits careful
consideration. It is quite generally admitted that many things are wrong
here and there. There is lost motion, wasted effort, and, in some cases,
inefficient expenditure of funds. How are these conditions to be improved ?
Is the fault in the present split-up of the Navy Department and bureau
organization? Are the administrative methods wrong or is the existing
system ineffective or inefficiently operated ?
As to the practicability of the suggested changes, I am personally in-
clined to agree more with the opinions expressed by Captain DuBose in his
discussion.
The desire to have an organization that will give a direct unbroken
chain of authority is well founded. It is, however, very doubtful whether
this can be accomplished for the material of the Navy without very revo-
lutionary changes.
It can be done by building up a special organization in the Navy respon-
sible for the production of material and for its repair. The personnel of
such an organization would have to be especially trained in various tech-
nical branches and would have to be more or less permanently attached to
such an organization. To do this, however, many cherished ideals of having
those who operate the vessels, build and repair them might have to be
sacrificed. This would be something like a combination of the Bureaus of
Yards and Docks, Construction and Repair and Engineering into some
amalgamated unit for the control of industrial yards and the material of
ships. This would be a rather large unit and there may be some question
as to whether it would be a workable one and whether it would maintain
that touch with the sea-going fleet, which in our Navy is considered so
important.
The proposal of a separate Bureau of Design does not seem advisable and
if this thing is to be done at all, the Bureau of Design should be combined
with “Maintenance.” However, there still remains the difficulty of adjust-
ing the activities of the supply corps with the proposed Bureau of Main-
tenance. The supply corps is the corps best fitted for storekeeping and


  p. 1490 (#408)                      #

1490
(Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
accounting duties and there is no reason why any defects in either of these
fields should not be remedied by the members of the supply corps as well
as by anyone else. Furthermore, the Bureau of Ordnance and Bureau of
Aeronautics will also have work on ships and this would have to be handled
substantially as at present.
The coordinating and directing authority would have to be one especially
familiar with the technical side of naval material. Some such organiza-
tion which would then operate the industrial yards might secure better
economy than we now obtain. This thing has been worked out at navy
yards but it would be more difficult to work it out at the Navy Department.
As long as we have corps of specialist officers, each of these groups must
have some head to maintain properly their efficiency, individually and as an
organization. This has been supplied by the various staff and material
bureaus. If this is done away with, it is feared that much of good will be
lost.
It therefore appears to be a more practicable proposition to arrange mat-
ters so that the staff corps and material specialists will each have a bureau
to look to for direction and to maintain each material bureau in as efficient
shape as possible. Then provide an efficient coordinating authority to cause
these bureaus to work together in the best possible way; also, develop a
better budgeting of the naval appropriations and with this a simplification of
the accounting system. By these means and by allowing local commandants
more authority in details, a great many of the troubles cited by Commander
Fisher can be done away with. At present, the Bureau of S. & A. and the
Navy Yard Division are responsible for our accounting system. It can be
made just as simple as these authorities permit it to be.
We have various planning and coordinating activities in the Navy De-
partment. However, these have been engaged largely in working up theo-
retical plans for future possibilities. For actually taking up any immediate
projects and deciding on what is to be done, there are usually no definite
agencies except the bureaus or the appointment of special boards.
The ideal of securing greatest economy and efficiency in the production
of our naval material can be approached in various ways and most of what
is desired can be accomplished without any change in bureaus. Most of
the possible improvements can be secured by the bureaus themselves. If
storekeeping and accounting are at fault, it is a matter for the Bureau of
Supplies and Accounts to adjust. If repairs or alterations are improperly
authorized, the bureau concerned is responsible. There are, however, many
things that should be handled in a uniform manner by the several bureaus
and there are other matters where several bureaus are involved that must
be coordinated. This situation requires a proper coordinating authority in
the Department for control and supervision over the material work of the
bureaus. It must be clothed with ample authority and be staffed with
expert personnel adequate for the exercise of such control. Such co-
ordinating office or authority should have the power to direct action with-
out necessarily obtaining the consent of all the individual bureaus, but


  p. 1491 (#409)                      #

1925]
1491
Discussion
.
matters belonging exclusively to bureau jurisdiction should not be inter-
fered with.
Can the Navy Yard Division and the Material Section of Operations
be developed into the desired coordinating and material planning authority ?
If this can be done, no special changes in the burcaus are necessary. The
Navy Yard Division and the Material Section certainly do function very
well in many directions and there appears to be no particular reason why
this functioning should not become more efficient and more effective as
more experience is gained. By this method the changes would be less revo-
lutionary and any mistakes made could be more easily corrected.
At present it looks as if the coordinating authority for material mat-
ters in the Navy Department is split up too much and that policy and doc-
rine in regard to material matters are wavering and not sufficiently definite.
The suggested Bureau of Maintenance might solve some of the troubles,
but it is rather doubtful whether it would accomplish as much as Com-
mander Fisher suggests.
What is needed is an expert and intelligent coordinating control of the
bureaus and a recognition by the bureau personnel that there must be a band
leader somewhere, otherwise there will be no harmonious music.
The ideals expressed and desired by Commander Fisher are very desirable
and if they could be carried out would make for greater economy and effi-
ciency. The process of unscrambling, however, is not so simple. A
beginning can be made by drawing up a more simple budget of appropria-
tions and then devising a central allotment office to distribute the allotments.
The large working appropriations might be made for general services instead
of under any particular bureau. We could have one appropriation, "Main-
tenance of the Navy," which would provide for all material expenses on
ships and at navy yards that would not be charged to any bureau appro-
priation. Each bureau would still have to have at least one appropriation,
but instead of about sixty we might get along with about twenty appro-
priations.
The appropriation “maintenance" could take over the naval working fund,
the naval supply account and all general stores accounts, it could pay for
all repairs and general upkeep of ships and navy yards and should be
allowed to be continuous, all balances being available for the next year as
is now the practice for "increases of navy." This appropriation also could
serve as a profit and loss and working account and other appropriations
could be charged out of it at rate costs, not absolute actual costs. In other
words, practically all of the advantages claimed for one appropriation
under a new Bureau of Maintenance can be secured by setting up a large
and flexible "maintenance” appropriation in which any and all bureaus
might participate. It should pay for all the classified force of the Navy
Department except special employees directly under any particular bureau.
Limits could be set for different services in the budget as might be thought
proper.


  p. 1492 (#410)                      #

1492
(Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
The Navy Yard Division would be the logical custodian of the appro-
priation "maintenance” for the Secretary of the Navy. Such a working
appropriation would remove some of the difficulties now laid to our depart-
ment organization and it would save some money. It might reduce navy
overhead expenses by as much as five per cent because it would simplify
accounting, storekeeping and purchasing and would enable maintenance
work on our ships to be done according to actual needs instead of the
availability of funds under particular bureaus.
The naval supply account has proven itself a very useful instrument.
The proposed "maintenance" appropriation would very greatly broaden its
scope and do for repair work what the naval supply account was able to do
for stores.
Local requisitions for purchase of articles against "maintenance" should
be approved by local commandants, subject to general instructions issued
by the Navy Yard Division or the bureau having cognizance of the material.
If the commandant is held responsible for costs of repairs he should
also be allowed to approve local purchases.
While the "maintenance" appropriation would take away a little from
the individual bureaus, it would also relieve them of some irksome details.
It would make it easier for the yards and give the commandant a little
more chance to have work done more nearly to suit conditions. The yard
allotments would have to be made by the Department and priority of work
would have to be indicated. This may create some concern, but with a
proper force to make these allotments it could be done about as well as by
the several bureaus.
Authority to do work against "maintenance" would rest with the com-
mandant in accordance with general instructions received from the Navy
Department. Miscellaneous purchases would be approved by local author-
ities, or by the several bureaus who could be given allotments out of it as
needed. Anyway, a large fund would be provided that could be used by
the Navy Department for maintenance work as needed or required. The
responsibility for making intelligent use of such a fund would rest upon the
Navy Department.
Under such a general appropriation a navy yard would have, first, a
regular allotment under "maintenance” which would cover the bulk of its
work; then, for any special work under any other appropriation, other
allotments would be made, such as increase of navy, naval reserve, ordnance,
other government departments, and so forth.
It may be objected that this appropriation would be somewhat loosely
controlled. That is so, but on the other hand details are not and cannot
be controlled except by the responsible local authority. If the management
at the yard does not exercise proper control, no one at the Department can
rectify this. All that can be done is to limit the expenditure to certain
sums. The business of the Department is to create an effective incentive
to get proper action from the local forces. If this is done, the best possible
result will be secured. Waste in authorizing work may be laid to the


  p. 1493 (#411)                      #

1925)
1493
Discussion
Navy Department, but waste in doing work is controlled by the local yards.
The Department can secure economy by better scheduling of work, the
maintenance of uniform work loads, by concentrating similar work at cer-
tain yards and by arranging to operate yard facilities on a scale commen-
surate with the work load. This can be done either by a Bureau of
Maintenance or by some office established by the Navy Department. The
Navy Yard Division certainly has been the cause of a considerable improve-
ment. While we may not be getting full returns from money spent at
navy yards, it is believed that within the past two years we have been nearer
to the goal than ever before. I fear that some of Commander Fisher's
comments paint our accounting system blacker than necessary. I venture
the opinion that our accounting system is too complicated and is trying to
do many things not really necessary. However, it does work in an effi-
cient manner and gives cost information when wanted. While our over-
head expenses are higher than desirable, they have been brought down to
what may be considered fairly within reason. They are not excessive
except at yards where the volume of work is very small.
However, at present, fully as much money is wasted by inexpert action
and decisions as can be saved by any possible reduction in overhead
expenses.
Most of our serious troubles arise from defective administrative actions
or requirements which are not essentially dependent on the subdivision of
the Navy Department. It is possible to remove from our administrative
systems the unnecessary or unjustified expenses without altering the bureaus.
Some trouble may, however, be found in deciding of just what the un-
desirable procedure consists. It is very likely that some reason can be given
for nearly everything that exists. The pruning knife must be applied by
some expert authority that really knows what it is about and which has
definite authority to carry the job to its logical conclusion.
A temporary board is not likely to do this, but a permanent office, ade-
quately staffed and clothed with proper authority, can, after a suitable time,
accomplish a great deal. Our gunnery and engineering competition sys-
tems are examples of what can be done.
Real economy in the production and repair of our naval material will
not be secured till there is some definite, competent, expert authority pro-
vided to whom the duty of securing economy is assigned. Many of those
in authoritative positions do not give consideration to the question of cost
in making decisions. Such action may often be justified but it does not
make for economy. It has been found at navy yards that when a real
campaign for reduction in costs is started, results usually follow. Now the
same thing can be done at the Navy Department if there is a real will to
have it. We have practically no graft in the Navy because there is a
strong will to do away with it. We can secure better economy whenever
we stimulate a widespread and determined effort to secure it. Establish
some incentive to secure economy and it will appear. As long as there is
no real incentive for individuals to secure the greatest possible value out


  p. 1494 (#412)                      #

1494
[Aug
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
of our naval money, bed rock economy will not result, no matter how the
bureau cognizance is divided.
The Navy Yard Division has helped to secure economy. It should be
able to obtain greater results by being allowed to devise better administra-
tive procedure and having this carried into effect. The budget system also
has helped to secure economy. The main line of attack is to cut out un-
necessary and unjustified work. Some of this is paper work, but reduction
in paper work will not work the wonders in economy that some of us may
think it will. Now, to get real results, some real pressure must be applied.
It cannot be done merely by pleasant invitation. This pressure must be
applied to bureaus as well as to navy yards.
Continuous, consistent effort, intelligently and effectively applied, will
gradually but surely effect such improvement. Such consistent effort
applied from within the Navy Department is likely to be more effective than
any particular rearrangement of the bureaus.
Proposed Administration Changes in Navy Department
(See page 357, March, 1925, PROCEEDINGS)
COMMANDER C. S. McDowELL, U. S. Navy.—Commander Fisher pre-
sumably undertook his presentation of a proposed new organization of the
Navy Department with the desire to create discussion of the subject. Com-
mander Fisher's paper is worthy of serious study by every officer in the
naval service; it contains many suggestions of real merit, but its adoption
in toto would not be possible without seriously disrupting our administrative
offices. Commander Fisher states that in his proposed scheme "no dis-
astrous upheaval is required" but this does not seem possible. For instance,
he proposes a Bureau of Maintenance, which is to have charge of the run-
ning of navy yards and the repairs and alterations of vessels; the question
might immediately be raised as to who would be the head of this bureau.
Then, again, there is to be a Bureau of Design which is to have charge of
the design and procurement of new ships, and the same question will arise
as to who is to be the head of this bureau.
Suppose, for the sake of argument, we assume that the heads of both
of these bureaus are to be high ranking sea-going officers; then what will
be the function of the senior and most experienced naval constructors? If
the title and responsibilities of chief constructor are done away with what
incentive will the construction corps present as the final goal for the per-
severing and efficient officer? Probably, though, if this proposed organiza-
tion were adopted the chief of one of these two bureaus (Maintenance
and Design) would be a naval constructor, possibly the assignment might
vary so that it wouldn't be a regular custom to have a naval constructor
as chief, say, of the Bureau of Design. Let us assume, though, at some
particular time that the chief of the Bureau of Design is a naval con-
structor and that the chief of the Bureau of Maintenance is a line officer.


  p. 1495 (#413)                      #

1925]
1495
Discussion
The personal title of the chief of the Bureau of Design would presumably
be Chief Engineer of the Navy, as his duties would be commensurate with
the generally accepted definition of such a designation. He would pass final
judgment on all technical questions of design in mechanical and electrical
engineering as well as naval architecture and while holding his position of
chief of the Bureau of Design would cease to be, strictly speaking, a naval
constructor. The requirements for the head of this bureau are for an
executive general engineer possessed of broad experience and coordinating
ability of the highest order and there is no question but that a considerable
number of our naval constructors could ably fill the position. There would
be untold jealousies stirred up, though, in the actual functioning of the
office. Some outstanding turbine engineer or electrical engineer might well
resent engineering decisions being made in his particular field by a chief of
bureau unfamiliar with the art and science of the particular field.
It is noted that Commander Fisher proposes to put ship alterations under
the cognizance of the Bureau of Maintenance. It would seem that the
same developments and improvements that are utilized in new design would
form the guide for alterations to existing ships and it would not seem to be
wise to divorce the two. Assuming that the best naval engineering talent,
including naval architecture, would be gathered in the Bureau of Design,
the natural procedure would appear to be to have them also pass on ques-
tions of alterations. Most designs of different types of vessels are an evo-
lution based, to a considerable extent, on the service experience with previous
ships of the type. A considerable amount of the designers' experience must
be gained from the alterations which are required on a particular class in
order to make them serviceable.
If we look at the organization of some of the large commercial organiza-
tions of the country, in fields somewhat analogous to the Navy, it is seen
that they have a chief engineer and an engineering department to cover
each of the various phases of engineering work covered by the particular
company. The chief engineer renders decisions on all important technical
matters in his particular field. It is usual where the company covers a num-
ber of different fields of engineering to have a vice president in charge of
engineering and thus coordinate all the engineering departments. It would
seem feasible in a reorganization of the Navy Department to have an
assistant secretary in charge of all engineering and naval architecture with
heads of departments under him including the following: chief naval con-
structor, chief mechanical engineer, chief electrical engineer, chief civil
engineer, chief aeronautical engineer, chief of ordnance and chief research
engineer. This list of engineering departments may not be inclusive, but
serves to indicate the idea.
It will be noted that this scrambles a few more eggs even than Com-
mander Fisher proposed, but if there is to be a reorganization it would seem
to be the proper time to start with fundamentals and build from the ground
up, and the suggestion as made above is in keeping with the organization
being worked out at the navy yards. The demarcation between the func-


  p. 1496 (#414)                      #

1496
(Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
tions of the various engineering departments would be quite plain from their
mere designation and all questions of design, improvement or alteration in
their particular field would be under their control.
We might conceive that the main principle for a proper organization of
our Navy Department would cover the following:
a) The operation of the feet and the development of general naval
policies.
b) The technical details of design and improvement of different types
of vessels and equipment.
c) The maintenance of the feet in readiness for service including the
providing of supplies.
d) The providing and training of personnel for the Navy and the main-
tenance of their welfare.
e) The financing of the Navy's activities.
Commander Fisher draws attention to the very true fact that it is the
principle of organization that is involved and that if the correct principle
is adopted the details will take care of themselves and it is not my purpose
in this comment to go into details. It would seem that considerable diffi-
culty would be experienced in a proposed reorganization if most of the
bureaus retained their name, but were curtailed as to functions and pre-
rogatives. This might be called a case of putting bureau loyalty ahead of
navy loyalty, but it is one of the well recognized attributes of human nature
that any group or division will jealously guard what they have and endeavor
to get more. In a reorganization the present bureaus should be eliminated
entirely and in the new organization the term “bureau" should not occur.
Commander Fisher's clear exposition of our present antiquated and nearly
hopeless appropriation and accounting system is most timely. If the only
result of his efforts should be the creation of a single appropriation, with
the consequent simplification of accounting and carrying on of work, Com-
mander Fisher would have a right to feel that he had contributed to the
most progressive step taken by the Navy Department in this generation.
Diesel Engines for Capital Ships—A Military Necessity
(See page 1217, July, 1925, PROCEEDINGS)
COMMANDER H. S. HOWARD (CC), U. S. N.—The paper by Captain
Proctor in the PROCEEDINGS of July is a very interesting discussion on the
possibility of applying Diesel engine propulsion to capital ships. As far as
the subject itself is concerned, I do not feel competent to pass upon the
technical questions of the engine which he proposes, but there are various
resulting questions of ship design to which no reference is made in the
article which are of the greatest interest to naval ship designers.
Captain Proctor stresses in his paper as the great advantage to be
gained by the use of Diesel engines on capital ships the increased radius of
action which would result thereby, but it is believed that the improvements


  p. 1497 (#415)                      #

1925]
1497
Discussion
in the protection of the ship which would result are almost, if not quite, as
important.
In the first place, there would be considerably less volume of exhaust
gases, and openings for air necessary for combustion could be considerably
reduced. Although possibly approximately the same amount of air would
be needed for combustion for the same powers as before, the velocity of
air in the intakes could be greatly incrcased, which would reduce the size.
With the openings for exhaust and air intakes reduced, the protective decks
could be made more complete and armored gratings reduced considerably
in size. On the top side the size of the funnel could be reduced, and
in later ships the number of funnels reduced from two to one. This
reduction and the reduction in ventilating openings would result in more
clear space for anti-aircraft guns and boats, and this in a space which
is now very congested. Similarly, improvements would result in protec-
tion against the possible introduction of poison gases into the vessel in
an engagement, as the air intakes instead of supplying air to firerooms could
be led direct to the engines themselves.
A second great improvement in the protection of the vessel would be in
the improvement of the protection of the vessel against underwater damage.
The number of large compartments below the water line would be reduced
by the elimination of the boiler rooms. In the figure given in the paper,
each engine is in a separate compartment, which in itself decreases the
liability to loss of propulsive power due to underwater damage.
All in all, the substitution of Diesel propulsion for steam power on a
capital ship would result not only in increasing the radius of action, as
brought out so strongly in the paper, but in improving greatly her powers
of resistance against attack either above or below water.


  p. 1498 (#416)                      #


THE Italian Scout CRUISER (2165 TONS) "TIGRE"


  p. 1499 (#417)                      #

PROFESSIONAL NOTES
1514
PREPARED BY
LIEUTENANT COMMANDER H. W. UNDERWOOD, U. S. Navy
FROM JUNE 7 TO JULY 7
GENERAL ARRANGEMENT
GREAT BRITAIN
Comment on New Type French Cruiser....
1499
The Position of the Shipbuilding Industry. ..................... 1500
FRANCE
French Navy Notes..........
......................
1502
GERMANY
The Development of German Merchant Shipbuilding.... 1504
ITALY
The New Italian Scout Cruisers..........
..... 1508
JAPAN
Japanese Naval Aims......
.......
1511
The Shadow of the Rising Sun.....
.............
UNITED STATES
Economics of the Next Naval Conference.
American Fleet Outranges British ........
.......... 1517
AVIATION
General Patrick on an Independent Air Force...
..........
.........
1518
The Performance of Future Airplanes......
1522
Airships for Military Purposes. ...
1527
MERCHANT MARINE
The Truth from Admiral Palmer....
A Plan for the Protection of American Shipbuilding............. 1532
President Coolidge Requests that Fleet Corporation Conduct Ship
Sales............
1534
Problems Confronting American Ships in Foreign Trade........ 1537
Defense of Merchant Ships in a Future War....
1541
ENGINEERING
Rival Methods of Ship Propulsion...
1543
MISCELLANEOUS
Limitations of Modern Sea War....
Will the Capital Ship Pass?..
............. 1548
The Situation in the Pacific........
....... 1551
CURRENT NAVAL AND PROFESSIONAL PAPERS...... ................ 1561
1516
.....
1531
1546
GREAT BRITAIN
The Future Type
Natal and Military Record, 3 June, 1925.-It is interesting to learn that
the French Ministry of Marine has under consideration the design of a new
type of croiseur de combat of 17,500 tons, to have a speed of 35 knots and
carry eight 12-inch guns in two quadruple turrets. Under the Washington
Agreement cruisers of this size and armament are inadmissible, but France
is at liberty to lay down one capital ship up to the limit of 35,000 tons


  p. 1500 (#418)                      #

1500
[Aug
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
to replace the lost La France, and there is nothing to prevent her from
halving this tonnage allowance in two hulls if she chooses. Such a step
might exercise an influence upon international naval design of which it is
impossible to foresee the ultimate consequences. The suggested vessels
would be very similar to our original battle cruisers of the Invincible class,
save that they would be 10 knots faster. No capital ship in the world could
be matched against them for speed, and therefore they would have the
capacity of denying action to the only type of warship which could hope
successfully to engage them by gunfire.
On the other hand, vessels of such a character would entirely and hope-
lessly outclass the 10,000-ton ocean cruisers which the great naval powers
are now building with a rather remarkable unanimity of tactical ideas.
One has only to recall the Battle of Falklands in order to realize what the
difference between the two types would easily be. France has so often
proved the pioneer in naval design that it would be only in keeping with
history were she to set a new fashion in big ships. To say that such a re-
action in displacement would be a violation of first principles is sheer rub-
bish. Big ship is a relative term, and the smaller ship will still remain the
big ship if all the sea powers revert to smaller ships. Growth of size
has been the simple result of competition to possess the most formidable
weapon. The Washington Agreement has succeeded in establishing the
principle of equality in this respect, and in the long pause which is follow-
ing upon this stabilizing of rapid development considerations are coming
into play which were apt to be obscured while the rivalry was in progress.
How far these considerations may carry us before the time arrives for a
general resumption of capital ship construction none will yet venture to
say. But these projected French croiseurs de combat may be regarded as
silhouettes on the wall.
The Position of the Shipbuilding Industry in England
The Shipbuilder, June, 1925.—Shipbuilding and coal mining share the
unenviable position of being the most depressed British industries. Every
week sees more shipyards closed for lack of new orders, and the tale of
closed collieries is added to almost daily. The success of foreign competi-
tion in shipbuilding for what contracts there are in the market has led to
the formation of a joint committee, composed of shipbuilding employers
and representatives of the shipyard trade unions, to inquire into the causes
of the severe depression in shipbuilding. This committee has begun its
work in an atmosphere of goodwill. Any recommendations which such an
authoritative body may make will carry more weight than the views of any
individual, however well informed he may be; but it will not be sufficient for
the committee merely to indicate the causes of the depression or the reasons
for the success of foreign competition. These are well known and beyond
doubt. Unless the committee evolves some really constructive proposals for
reducing the cost of production, its labors will not be of much avail.
Trade depression in this country is due to two causes. The first-the
reduced consumption of commodities resulting from impoverishment due to
the war and to the decimation of populations—can be expected to right
itself in time. The second cause—the success of foreign competitors in
securing our markets—cannot be transitory while the conditions here and
abroad show such a wide disparity. Mr. Lawrence D. Holt, the Liverpool
shipowner, in a recent communication to the press following a visit to the
German shipyards, gave seven reasons why certain yards in Germany are
able to build ships vastly cheaper than British yards without any help from
the state. Mr. Holt's seven points put the case clearly and concisely.


  p. 1501 (#419)                      #

1925]
1501
Professional Notes
They are: (1) A greatly less rate of salary and wage; (2) the universality
of piece work; (3) longer hours of work; (4) no restriction on the use of
labor-saving machines; (5) no demarcation obstacles between trades; (6)
no redundant labor in the yards; and (7) keener work by management and
labor. To make Mr. Holt's list complete, the excessive burden of taxation
on British industry should be added. Mr. Walter Runciman, M.P., gave
figures in the House of Commons recently in connection with a Tees ship-
yard, which showed that the rate burden per ship built has increased
to £5,300. Neither Germany nor Holland, he stated, was foolish enough to
tax and burden its shipyards in the way we do.
What is to be done to alleviate the position? Sir Alfred Mond's scheme
of subsidies to industry should assist in preventing British shipbuilding
contracts going abroad, and might regain for this country a share of the
foreign contracts which are now being secured by Germany, Holland, and
France. It is attractive at first thought to consider giving employers the
benefit of the unemployment insurance payments which would be saved if
they were able to provide employment for men at present idle. It would
help to prevent the youth of the nation developing slothful habits
and growing up to manhood with no trade or occupation. It would
ensure that some work would be done for the huge amounts paid out weekly,
and for which at present the state receives no return. But would it be a
healthy state of affairs for an international industry like shipbuilding to be
kept alive by subsidies ?
It has been suggested that foreign-built ships constructed for British
owners should be taxed, but how would this help the industry? It would not
assist us to regain the foreign market, and it would not prevent British
owners building ships abroad if sufficient inducement were offered. The
result would be to swell the volume of shipping under foreign flags at the
expense of the British.
The fallacious idea held by many at the termination of the war that,
in order to make the country fit for heroes to live in, shorter hours of
work and higher pay were necessary, might have been all right as a matter
of sentiment and an ideal to be aimed at, but the endeavor to put it into
effect has been disastrous for the nation. It is ludicrous to imagine that
less work, and not more, is required after four-and-a-half years of destruc-
tion and of production for destruction. In the shipbuilding industry the
gulf between Continental and British costs will have to be bridged if the
industry in this country is to survive as anything more than a shadow of
its former self. The cost of production in Great Britain and Ireland will
have to be reduced, but the remedy cannot be found in the shipbuilding
industry alone. Shipbuilding in itself is a constructional industry; and its
raw materials are the finished products of other staple industries. The short
hours and high wages of the coal miners, railway workers, dockers and
other transport workers, have added enormously to the cost of ships. The
conditions of work in the so-called sheltered trades are inequitable as com-
pared with those in the competitive trades, and are not only maintaining
the cost of living at a high standard, but are making it impossible for the
competitive trades to continue to pay the rates of wages ruling at present.
The issue is a broad and national one, and until the trade unions recognize
that this country is dependent on its export trade for existence, that trade
goes to the country which sells at the lowest prices, and that a country de-
pendent on its export trade must produce goods of at least equal value
at equal prices to those of its competitors, there seems little hope of a per-
manent trade revival. How can this country hope to compete successfully
in the international markets when the output of our coal mines is 20 per cent
less per man than it was in 1913, when our railways employed 100,000 more


  p. 1502 (#420)                      #

1502
[Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
men than in pre-war days and handle about 25,000,000 tons less traffic in the
year, and when it takes three dockers to do the work two men did before
the war?
The position will have to be faced. It is not too much to say, as Sir
Alfred Yarrow is reported to have stated recently that trade-union re-
strictions are paralyzing industry. If, therefore, the joint committee of
employers and trade unions in the shipbuilding industry can, by the example
of its own industry, indicate to the miners, the railwaymen and the dockers
in which direction the true interests of the workers lie, it will have justified
its existence.
FRANCE
French Navy Notes
The Naval and Military Record, 3 June, 1925.—The Dumesnil squadron,
comprising five 24,000-ton battleships, two cruisers, and two dozen torpedo
craft, will next week leave Toulon for a two months' cruise in the Mediter-
ranean, Atlantic, and Channel, in the course of which coast defense and
attack tactics under new conditions will be engaged in (camouflage, arti-
ficial clouds, and comprehensive utilization of aerial factors). This cruise
is to serve the purposes of naval propaganda, an art yet in its infancy in
France, compared with the way this important side of the sea power question
is managed in England. In Brittany yards the three 8,000-ton cruisers are
shipping their turrets of new design, that are their point of fighting vantage
over the British Effinghams. The 10,000-ton Tourville and Duquesne are
being built at a rapid rate.
The small cruisers Strasbourg and Metz, under Rear Admiral Hallier,
have paid an agreeable visit to Malta, which was an Anglo-French base
during the war (and where the torpedoed battleship Jean Bart was promptly
repaired), previous to their proceeding to Bizerta, that was for so many
years a Franco-British point d'appui against a common enemy. Those times
have come anew as the result of unexpected international happenings that
call for a closer Franco-British entente and mutual assistance against com-
mon perils; and the projected exchange of Anglo-French naval courtesies
in the Mediterranean is a matter of congratulation. Under new interna-
tional conditions, in the light of colonial developments, France and England
stand or fall together, as proclaimed by clear sighted statesmen in our two
countries. This Franco-British interdependence is especially in evidence in
the Mediterranean. It is the same Bocho-Bolshevist influence that is
undermining both British and French influence and safety, with unpre-
cedented and hypocritical means of underhand action.
The trouble the French are facing in Morocco is the very same that is
confronting British rule in Egypt and in India, and the battle may be
considered as being engaged in on the whole Moslem front from Tangiers
to Singapore. On one side, France and Britain, and to a smaller extent
Italy; on the other, the whole force of the barbarous Soviets, backing
and pushing forward the deluded or fanatical Arabs and Mussulmans gen-
erally. Partial disaster (and France is paying for Spanish disasters) will
mean ultimately and surely disaster for the whole line, viz., the collapse
of European colonial empires.
The Riffan problem is a naval problem. Abd el Krim, reduced to his sole
forces and resources, cannot resist long the superior genius, troops, and
armament of Marshall Lyautey, despite the exceptional fighting qualities of
his Moorish partisans. Prospects will be different if that ambitious and
clever African leader continues to receive the moral help that treacherous
Frenchmen are showering upon him, together with financial subsidies from
Russia and reinforcements in men and in material from Bocheland and


  p. 1503 (#421)                      #

1925]
1503
Professional Notes
Bolshevia. Hostilities on the African front could not go on long without
weakening France at a critical moment when Bocheland, longing for more
land in the sun, and set on her feet again by the stupidity of the Allies,
is displaying a voracious appetite for both Poland and Austria.
To stop at all cost the importation of arms into (nominally) Spanish
Morocco has, therefore, indirectly, become a life-and-death question for
France. An agreement has been reached with Spain that would, of course,
welcome French help with a view to regaining the peaceful possession of
her lawful share of North Africa. A close blockade is to be established
of the Riff coast. Motor gunboats have left Brittany for Morocco and
Oran. The thirty-odd French avisos as Canonnières, rapides (20 knots) of
the Meuse and Arras classes of 700 to 850 tons, that carry either four 4-inch
or two 5.6-inch weapons, besides smaller quickfirers, are suited for block-
ading duties, especially acting in cooperation with patrolling farseeing
aerial scouts and handy motor vedettes.
The victory of France over an enemy that defeated the whole might
of Spain will be due to naval and aerial power mostly, this notwithstanding
the tried valor of French and colonial troops. But for the number (over
two hundred), efficiency, and daring of French aviators, the cost in blood
would have been enormous of dislodging the cute and elusive Riffens from
the steep and craggy mountains in which they had taken a footing and so
cleverly fortified themselves on up-to-date lines. Abd el Krim infantry is
being used as an experimental target to the best aviation in the world, and
chemical warfare will further contribute to shorten the duration of hos-
tilities and to reduce bloodshed. Afghan warfare, which cost England so
much, is the nearest approach to Riff warfare.
Superior speed, under new conditions of warfare, is the key to victory,
since to a great extent all encounters in the last war proved to be contests
of speed, and it is easy to imagine that events would have fared otherwise
had the German fleet possessed an all-round advantage in speed. Speed is
a question not so much of size and finances as of superior technical, scienti-
fic efficiency. Every technical advance realized by a power is tantamount
to an increase in the fighting strength of that power. Dupuy de Lome's
creation of the first steam battleship conferred upon France a crushing
superiority over sailing battle fleets, as showed the Franco-British Crimean
Expedition. Water tube boilers and turbines gave alternately to France
and to England similar advantages to a smaller degree, and it is acknowl-
edged that, quite up to recent years, British and also German systems of
ship propulsion were superior to the French. A better utilization of motor
space, weight, and nominal power has been noted in British battleships,
cruisers, and destroyers than in French units of similar classes.
To catch up all rivals, and even to excel them in that momentous re-
spect, is the policy of the Paris Admiralty. Boiler, geared turbines, and
Diesel studies and experiments are proceeding apace and simultaneously. The
Indret boiler factory (between Nantes and St. Nazaire) has, by degrees, ar-
rived at an incredible ultilization standard of boiler space, passing from
500 square meters of heated surface in the Waldeck-Rousseau type of
boiler (1906) to 980 square meters in the 1920 type, 1,125 in the 1922, and
over 1,300 in the latest types of marine boilers. Experiements on boilers
intended for the 8,000-ton cruisers (Duguay-Trouins) and for the 2,500-ton
contretor pilleurs, have shown their evaporating power to be 25 to 30 per
cent greater than had been expected. The Duguay-Trouins, at first designed
for 100,000 h.p. (eight boilers at 12,500 h.p. each), will develop over 120,000
h.p. with ease, and their speed (34 knots on paper) ought to exceed 36
knots. Similarly, destroyers originally designed for 50,000 h.p. (five
boilers) will reach 60,000 h.p. Relatively to size, the new French ships


  p. 1504 (#422)                      #

1504
[Aug
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
will be the most powerful in existence, and the “blue ribbon" of the ocean
(naval) ought to come back to the Tri-color.
In truth, in the past also France excelled by the nominal power of her
ships, but not so much by her speed. For a given paper speed French
ships required greater boiler power. Thus, regarding 10,000-ton croiseurs
cuirassés of twenty-five years ago, 22,000 h.p. caused the British Kent
(Bellevilles) to spurt at 24 knots (and she did so at the Falklands), the
Italian Pisas to exceed 23 knots, and the German Roons to splash on at 21.5
knots, whereas the French Gloires and Montcalms felt panting and uneasy
when hurled forward at over 18 knots in a seaway. It is now acknowledged
that the late chief constructor, Mons. Bertin (though great were his
merits in other respects) designed for over a decade cruisers pleasing to look
at, but suffering from internal complaints unfitting them for exposure in
rough weather at high speed.
The whole of the units of the new program even submarines, have been
built on new lines, that embody experimental data collected since the war,
and are calculated to combine fast running with nautical qualities, which
shows that in their bid for speed supremacy French ingenicurs intend
to neglect no asset.
GERMANY
The Development of German Merchant Shipbuilding
The Shipbuilder, June, 1925.—The Board of Statistics of the German
Government has just published the official figures concerning merchant
shipbuilding in Germany during 1924, which have been compiled for the
Board by the Germanischer Lloyd. These statistics naturally differ some-
what from those issued by Lloyd's Register of Shipping, as they are pre-
pared on a different basis. They are specially interesting because a distinc-
tion is made between the activities on German and on foreign account,
and because they also include particulars of the river craft constructed.
Tables I and II give particulars of the ships, both for sea-going and
river purposes, under construction during the years 1923 to 1924 inclusive.
On the whole, however, the statistics concerning vessels under con-
struction do not give a very clear idea of the development of German
TABLE I
SEA-GOING SHIPS UNDER CONSTRUCTION IN GERMAN YARDS
For German
Account
For Foreign
Account
Total
Year
No.
Gross
Tons
No.
Gross
Tons
No.
Gross
Tons
205
1,216
1,018
650
637
1913
1914
1915
1916
1917
1918
1919
1920
1921
597
1,011
913
619
614
570
499
480
797
1,086
407
1,296,800
1,184,400
967,000
1,075,300
1,069,000
1,080,300
763, 100
1,563,800
1,667, 027
1,171,576
597, 404
405, 700
49,100
16,800
27,900
19,600
16,800
13,600
40,600
141,600
59,372
86,450
119, 187
231,600
523
508
856
1,148
435
316
270
1,345,900
1,201,200
994,900
1,094,900
1,085,800
1,093,900
803, 700
1,705, 400
1,726,399
1,258,026
716,591
637,300
1922
278
1923
1924
189


  p. 1505 (#423)                      #

1925)
1505
Professional Notes
shipbuilding during the past twelve years, because of the abnormal con-
ditions ruling during and since the war. During the war years work was
delayed on nearly all mercantile vessels, while during 1924 the completion
of tonnage in hand was hastened by the fact that the shipbuilding yards
had not sufficient contracts to keep them fully employed. A more reliable
guide is furnished by Tables III and IV, which show the new tonnage
completed during the years 1912 to 1924 inclusive.
TABLE II.
RIVER CRAFT UNDER CONSTRUCTION IN GERMAN YARDS
For German
Account
For Foreign
Account
Total
Year
Gross
Tons
Gross
Tons
Gross
Tons
No.
No.
135
168
120
1913
1914
1915
1916
1917
1918
1919
1920
1921
1922
1923
1924
17,810
17,320
9,320
12,360
12,370
7,830
8,720
8,910
14,416
221, 649
130,456
Iwonnen
4,500
3,100
770
3,130
670
350
250
22,310
20,420
10,090
15,490
13,040
8,180
8,970
8,910
14,688
237,669
141, 529
272
16,020
11,073
OIX
748
805
TABLE III.
SEA-GOING SHIPS COMPLETED IN GERMAN YARDS.
For German
Account
For Foreign
Account
Total
Year
Gross
No.
Gross
Tons
Gross
Tons
Tons
No.
No.
656
550
310
826
631
322
265
277
188
1913
1914
1915
1916
1917
1918
1919
1920
1921
1922
1923
1924
191
423,900
433,500
243,000
183,300
59,900
35,600
150.800
241,200
404,733
598,320
380, 774
197,500
185
180
151
284
326
225
147
93
34,800
12,000
4,100
7,800
2,100
1,200
1.000
84,700
40,667
26,536
37,024
52,300
152
458,700
445,500
247, 100
191, 100
62,000
36,800
151,800
325,900
445,400
624,856
417,798
249,800
324
376
234
162


  p. 1506 (#424)                      #

1506
[Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
TABLE IV.
RIVER CRAFT COMPLETED IN GERMAN YARDS

For German
Account
For Foreign
Account
Total
Year
Gross
No.
Gross
Tons
Gross
Tons
Tons
No.
19
1913
1914
1915
1916
1917
1918
1919
1920
1921
1922
1923
1924
8,000
11,580
3,240
4,400
2,760
710
2,910
1,810
5,184
111, 762
92,284
1,160
2,540
320
440
340
340
250
9,160
14,120
3,560
4,840
3,100
1,050
3,160
1,810
5,456
117,199
99,307
15
6
423
272
5,437
7,023
451
516
553
Tables I to IV indicate the great reduction in activity during the years
1923 and 1924, both in connection with ships under construction and ships
completed. Before the war, the capacity of the German yards for the
building of mercantile shipping was estimated at 500,000 tons gross per
annum. Since that time most of these establishments have been extended,
and the yards formerly engaged in warship construction have also turned
their attention to merchant tonnage. In this way, the capacity of the Ger-
man yards has been increased to about 700,000 to 800,000 tons annually, ex-
cluding the yards engaged on the production of river craft. The full
shipbuilding capacity of this country has thus not been utilized up to the
present, and during 1925 the actual output amounted to only about one-
third of the maximum possible. Since the completion of the reconstruction
program of the German shipping companies, no shipbuilding contracts of
any magnitude have been entered into.
Tonnage Built on FOREIGN ACCOUNT
The activities of the German yards on foreign account have been
much greater since than before the war. This is due to the fact that ship-
builders in this country have had to search diligently for work, whereas
before the war they were generally well employed on vessels for home
owners. The sea-going tonnage completed for foreign owners in the
years 1913-24 inclusive is given as a percentage of the total tonnage built
as follows:
Year Per cent
Year Per cent
1913 7.6
1919 0.65
1914
1920
26.0
1915 1.7
1921
9.1
4.1
1922
1917
1923
1918
3.2
1924 20.9
2.6
1916
4.3
3.4
8.9


  p. 1507 (#425)                      #

1925]
1507
Professional Notes
The large tonnage completed in 1920 for foreign owners was due to
deliveries in accordance with the Versailles Treaty. Since 1923, however,
there has again been increased activity in German shipbuilding yards for
foreign account, and this is still more clearly shown in the relationship
between ships under construction for foreign owners and the total tonnage
being built. The following is the percentage of foreign-owned vessels
under construction in the years 1921, 1922, 1923 and 1924:
Year Per cent
Year Per cent
1921 3.4
1923 16.7
1922 6.9
1924 36.4
Thus, in the year 1924, the enormous slump in the German shipbuilding
industry was due solely to the decrease in contracts for German owners.
THE SPEED OF CONSTRUCTION
It is also interesting to investigate the speed of construction, that is,
the relationship between the tonnage completed in each year and the
tonnage on the stocks at the beginning of that year. Before the war it
was a general rule that about 33 per cent of the ships under construction
were completed in the same year. This percentage, indeed, increased in
1914 to 40, and in the following years the percentages were as under:
Year Per cent
Year Per cent
1915
1920 15
1916
1921 25
1917
1922
50
1918
1923
1919 20
1924 45
The foregoing figures show the slowing up in the rate of construction
due to the war, and they also prove that the capacity of the German yards
has been greatly increased since the war. The lower percentage for 1924
was caused by the reduction in the number of men employed.
North SEA vs. Baltic Yards
The part played by the yards in the North Sea and Baltic areas re-
spectively has fluctuated considerably. In 1913 about 50 per cent of the
completed tonnage came from each of these two centers. In 1914 the North
Sea area completed 66 per cent of the total tonnage produced. During
the war the production in the two centers was nearly equal, and this was
also the case in 1924, but in 1923 the North Sea area produced about 60
per cent of the total tonnage built in Germany.
Motorship CONSTRUCTION
The development to motorship construction in Germany is shown by the
following statistics, which give the percentage of tonnage equipped with
internal-combustion engines :
Year Per cent
Year Per cent
1913 4
1922 5
1920
1923
9
1921
32
The size of the motorships built has increased rapidly during the last
few years. In 1913 the average gross tonnage of motor vessels was 3,567,
while in 1923 it had risen to 5,137. On the other hand, the average size of
steamships has decreased considerably.
1924


  p. 1508 (#426)                      #

1508
[Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
ITALY
New Italian Scout Cruisers
The Engineer, 29 May, 1925.—Although not very dissimilar in general
pattern from the flotilla leaders of the British Navy, that designation is not
altogether applicable to the Italian vessels, which appear to have been
built for functions other than the leadership of destroyer flotillas. In
considering their design it is essential to pay heed to local strategic condi-
tions. Though the staunchness of their construction is beyond criticism,
it is clear that they were built mainly with a view to operations in waters
more sheltered than those of the North Sea or the English Channel. Their
true field of action is the Mediterranean, and it is there that their for-
midable powers of offense could be employed to the greatest advantage.
Naval opinion in France, and to some extent in Italy, also, inclines to
the belief that heavy armored ships will be of negligible value in any future
struggle for the mastery of the Mediterranean. This belief is reflected in
the current shipbuilding policies of the two powers, neither of which proposes
to lay down new capital ships. Since the war they have largely devoted
their attention to the building of small, high-speed ships of the destroyer
type, and submarines. More recently, each has laid down several cruisers
of the 10,000 class, though the utility of such ships is still a matter of
dispute among their experts. In this country, seaworthiness is held to be
no less important than speed in the design of a destroyer, and in order
to achieve it there is a readiness to make some sacrifice of armament.
The result is that the average British destroyer, while it may compare un-
favorably in respect of armament with a French or an Italian boat of
approximate tonnage, is probably the better sea boat. For instance, the
original plan of the French Jaguar class, of 2,359 tons, provided for an
armament of six 5.1-in. guns, two 3-in. A.A. guns, and six 21.7-in. torpedo
tubes; while our 1,800-ton leaders of the Admiralty class carry five 4.7-in.,
one 3-in. A.A., and six 2-in. tubes. One of the 5.1-in. guns was subsequently
deleted from the French vessel, but even after the reduction in weight, she
is expected to prove rather lively in a seaway. The Italian ships of the
Leone group, though only 365 tons heavier than our Admiralty boats, mount
eight 4.7-in. guns, two 3-in, A.A., and six tubes. In proportion to displace-
ment, they are the most heavily armed ships now afloat. Since it is patent
that vessels with this formidable battery are not intended to serve primarily
as torpedo craft, they must be regarded as small scouting cruisers, in
which the torpedo is subordinate to the gun.
Building programs now in hands indicate that the naval forces to be as-
sembled in the Mediterranean a few years hence will include a large quota
of such ships, possessing the velocity of destroyers, reasonable sea-keeping
properties, and a powerful gun armament. Much talk is heard in continental
naval circles of the decisive results to be expected from tactical cooperation
by swift cruisers, light scouts of the type referred to, submarines and air-
craft. It is argued that a composite force of this character could absolutely
close the Mediterranean against an orthodox battle-fleet of greater ag-
gregate strength.
The design of the Leone class was prepared in 1916-17, probably as a
retort to the heavy destroyers then being built for the Austro-Hungarian
Navy, but the exigencies of war postponed the actual laying down of the
ships to 1921, by which date two of the five units originally projected
had been cancelled. The Leone, with her sister vessels Tigre and Pantera,
were built, engined, armed and equipped by the famous Ansaldo firm at
Sestri Potente, the building period averaging rather more than three years.


  p. 1509 (#427)                      #

1925]
1509
Professional Notes
The excellent workmanship put into structure and machinery is at once
apparent to the critical eye. Despite the great importance attached to speed,
the scantling is moderately heavy and the hull is well subdivided. The
length between perpendiculars is 359.6 ft., the extreme breadth 33.8 ft.,
the draught 11.5 ft., and the displacement 2,165 tons. The freeboard at all
points is considerably higher than that of our largest flotilla leaders.
The general lines of the hull appear to be modeled on those of the
Mirabello class of destroyers, which are said to be capital sea boats. There
are no anti-rolling tanks, nor has the German device of employing the
oil bunkers for that purpose been resorted to; yet the ships, though carrying
so heavy a deck load, are remarkably steady. The long cruise of several
thousand miles in which they are at present engaged has afforded fre-
quent opportunities of testing them under varying conditions of weather,
and their officers profess complete satisfaction with the behavior of all three
ships. Absence of vibration even at high speed, and the narrow are through

WE
Twin Gun MOUNTING AND SHIELDS
which they roll and pitch, make them - eady gun platforms, a quality of
high importance having regard to their ctical functions.
The propelling machinery comprises oi two high-pressure and two low-
pressure turbiries of Parsons type, the former running at 3,400 and the
latter at 1,800 revolutions per minute, transmitting power to the twin
shafts through gearing which reduces the speed of rotation to 420 revolu-
tions. On her full-power trials, the Leone developed more than 50,000
shaft horsepower, maintaining an average speed of 34.5 knots. Steam is
taken from four Yarrow oil-burning boilers. Engine and boiler spaces are
bulkheaded in accordance with the latest practice, and the principle of
duplication has been followed so far as space and weight permit. Here
and there among the auxiliary machinery one notices well-known British
types, but the whole of the material itself is of Italian manufacture.
Excepting the two 3-in. A.A. guns, which are placed one each side at
the break of the forecastle, the entire armament is disposed along the
center line. The eight 4.7-in. 45-cal. guns are on twin mountings. The
first pair, being stationed well away from the eyes of the ship, can be


  p. 1510 (#428)                      #

1510
(Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
fought even when she is running into head seas and taking water over the
bows, the sighting and laying of the guns under such conditions being
facilitated by an armored shield for each of the two gun layers. These
shields are placed respectively at the right and left hand of the mounting
leaving a clear space between for the loading parties, who, however, are
quite unprotected. The general arrangement is eminently practical, and
much superior to the conventional type of destroyer gun mounting. While
the two guns may be worked independently as regards elevation-maximum
angle, 30°—they are, in fact operated and fired as a unit, the practice
being to discharge salvos of four guns at a time. The normal rate of fire
for each gun is four rounds per minute, or eight for each twin mounting.
This rate could easily be accelerated for brief periods if the supply of
ammunition were well maintained, but as there are only two hoists for the
four pairs of guns, it would probably be difficult to keep up a continuous
rapid fire. The guns, it should be added, are non-automatic, and are worked
entirely by hand. They are of the Armstrong model, with a total length
of 18.38 ft., the rifled bore extending for 174.6 in. The weight of the gun
is 4.035 tons. Propelled by a powder charge of 9.6 lbs., the high-explosive
shell, weighing 48.74 lbs, attains an initial velocity of 2,460 foot-seconds.
Shrapnel shell of 55.33 lbs. are also used. The powder charge is enclosed
in a brass case. At the time of our inspection, the guns had not been
equipped for director control, but they are eventually to be fitted with
"follow the pointer" gear, operated from the foretop. Each ship carries
two 12-ft. base Zeiss range finders. With a well trained crew, it is stated,
there is little or no mutual interference by the loading numbers, in spite
of the limited space between the two guns, which are clearly shown in the
illustration. The position of the second and third mountings is such as
necessarily to restrict their field of fire before and aba ft the beam, but that
is a defect common to all small ships with an armament disposed along the
keel line.
The two anti-aircraft pieces, of 3-in. caliber discharge a high-explosive
shell of 14 lbs. and shrapnel of 15 lbs. Italian naval officers are inclined
to question the utility of these guns for the purpose in view, and would
prefer a more numerous armament of i-pdr. or 2-pdr. pompoms for use
against aircraft. The six torpedo tubes, mounted on triple carriages,
discharge the 18-in. Whitehead torpedo, Italy having for some reason de-
· layed the adoption of the larger torpedoes which are now used by other
navies. In the Leone and her sisters the tubes have an unusually long
"spoon,” the object apparently being to carry the torpedo well clear of
the ship before it is released, and also to increase the arc of fire before and
abaft the beam. The offensive properties of the class are further augmented
by a supply of sixty blockade mines per ship, with portable laying gear.
Taken for all in all, these ships are exceptionally powerful for their
size, and appear to represent an admirable combination of the tactical
qualities dictated by Italian requirements. The naval constructors of that
country are second to none in skill. They have produced a succession of in-
genious designs, some of which have visibly influenced man-of-war develop-
ment elsewhere. They might claim to have invented the battle cruiser,
as typified by the Italia and the Lepanto, which were laid down nearly
fifty years ago. In modern times they have repeatedly shown it to be
possible to endow vessels of quite moderate tonnage with a large meas-
ure of fighting power without detriment to seaworthiness. It is because
the units of the Leone class are characteristic specimens of Italian con-
struction that we have dealt with them at some length. In the subjoined
table their leading features are compared with those of recent British and
French flotilla leaders:


  p. 1511 (#429)                      #

1925]
1511
Professional Notes
Italian
Leone
class
1923
359.6
320
3134
33.8
... 1,800
... 40,000
British
Admiralty
class
Year of launch ......
1918
Length (p:p.), feet .............
Breadth, feet .......
Draught, feet ........
1294
Displacement, tons ...
Shaít horsepower ................
Designed speed, knots ......
36.5
Oil fuel capacity, maximum, tons. ... 504
Armament
5-4.7-in.
1-3-in.
A.A.
7—2 pr.
6--21-in.
tubes
Weight of broadside fire, Ib. (main
guns only) .........
... 225
French
Jaguar
class
1923
39234
36
1434
2,359
50,000
35.5
540
5–5.1-in.
2—2.9-in.
A.A.
6 21.7-in
tubes
11.5
2,165
50,000
35
400
8
4.7-in.
2—3-in
A.A.
1-18-in.
tubes
300
390
JAPAN
Japanese Naval Aims
Engineering, 19 June, 1925.-Although there have been frequent refer-
ences to Japanese naval strength, both in the British and American press,
it is rather curious that no naval writer has, as yet, attempted to analyze
the composition of the Japanese fleet, in order to get some idea of the
strategical purposes for which it is probably intended. At first sight the
problem would appear insoluable without reference to secret archives; but,
in point of fact, it is by no means very difficult, for the Japanese Navy can
only be required for ensuring the flow of vital commodities to the islands in
case of war, or for overseas operations. It will be interesting to take each
of these points in turn, and examine them as closely as statistics and known
facts allow.
Any country which is dependent upon overseas supplies must first ensure
itself an adequate food supply and, after that, secure sufficient quantities
of raw materials for its war industries and munition factories. What are
the naval commitments which attach themselves to each other of these
desiderata?
The principal articles of the Japanese national diet are rice, beans, wheat,
fish, meat, sugar, and salt; and of these rice is the most important. Ex-
cept in the case of fish, the country imports a proportion of its total con-
sumption of all these items; but the sources of supply are fairly concen-
trated. All the rice, meat, and salt required for keeping the population in
health can be obtained from China, Korea, and Formosa. The sugar is,
it is true, largely obtained from the Dutch East Indies, but, in an emergency,
sugar imports could certainly be cut down, and enough sweetening matter
obtained from the very large supplies of home-produced honey. The wheat
imports undoubtedly contain the germ of a serious strategical problem. At
the present moment about half come from the American continent and half
from China ; but the import total grows year by year, and there is a
tendency to depend more and more upon the American market.
British import statistics during the war have proved that the country can
supply large armies on decreased imports of iron, coal, and ores, but that
a large increase in imported oils and chemicals is inevitable. (See Fayle,
History of Sea-Borne Trade, vol. iii, Appendix CIX, page 478.) The exact


  p. 1512 (#430)                      #

1512
(Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
quantities of each which is essential depend upon a country's military com-
mitments. A glance at the Japanese trade returns shows that the country
would be able to secure itself all the iron, coal, and copper it needed
from Chinese sources of supply; but that petroleum and rubber can only
be obtained from America and the Dutch East Indies. A great effort has,
however, been made to use the Dutch supplies as much as possible, for only
about a quarter of the total imports of oil fuel come from the American
Continent. Chemicals are, undoubtedly, obtained largely from Europe ; but,
as a total supply of 2,500,000 tons would probably suffice for a three-years
war, large reserves can always be obtained in peace. For rubber and
cotton the country is mainly dependent upon the Dutch East Indies and
British India, although a certain percentage of cotton comes from America.
These facts leave no doubt as to the exact nature of the Japanese naval
problem. The area enclosed by Korea, the Japanese islands, the Liu Kiu
group and Formosa, on the east and north, and by the Chinese mainland
on the west, must be secured against any adversary. From inside that
area Japan can supply herself with the bulk of what she requires in war.
If it is lost—that is, if Japan's communications with China are cut by an
adversary which establishes a naval force in the China seas-her capacity
for resistance will cease automatically. That, however, is only part of the
problem. The country's dependence upon the Dutch East Indies would in-
crease enormously in war; and as her home production would probably fall
off as men were taken from agriculture and industries, it would be essential
that she should keep open one overseas line of supplies. If she were at
war with a European Power, great efforts would doubtless be made to make
American route secure; and if with the United States, to keep comunications
open with British India and Europe.
An analysis of the present state of the Japanese Navy shows, without
doubt, that those responsible for the country's naval policy have concen-
trated all their thought upon the purely defensive aspects of the naval
problem. The Japanese Navy is admirably designed to keep opponents out
of the vital area between Japan and the Chinese mainland; but it is far
less well equipped to support overseas operations, or even to protect long
lines of communication. The latest units of the cruiser fleet-that is, the
sixteen ships of the Yubari, Kinu and Tatsuta class—are all of the fleet-
cruiser type ; thirteen of them are of the 5,000-ton class, the remaining
three are smaller. The implication is obvious: all the newest cruisers are
to be used for fleet-scouting duties inside the Japanese narrow seas. The
remaining cruisers are, it is true, much heavier, and might certainly be
used for escort or patrol work along an ocean route; but there are only
eleven of them, and of these, six are twenty-five years old.
The existing building program shows the same purely defensive tenden-
cies. The three vessels of the Kinu type are 5,000-ton fleet cruisers; the
remaining six (four Furutakas and two Myokos) are of heavier tonnage;
but when put into service they will only replace the old cruisers which were
completed in 1899. No system of calculation can give the Japanese more
than ten oceanic cruisers, capable of defending or disturbing distant com-
munications, when their present program is completed. Seeing how im-
portant it may be to keep open at least one of the transoceanic routes, one
has to admit that they propose to do it with a very minimum of force. A
quantitative test of the Japanese petroleum requirements in war accentuates
her dependence upon overseas sources of supply, and, indeed, her difficulty in
obtaining what she would need if she were ever engaged with a powerful
naval adversary. Her total yearly imports are, at present about 1,450,000
tons (petroleum and benzine): she would require about two and a half


  p. 1513 (#431)                      #

1925)
1513
Professional Notes
times as much if a comparison between the British figures for 1913 and 1918
is any guide at all. This means either that the country must accumulate a
reserve of some seven million gallons for a three years war, or else that
some three and a half million additional gallons must be brought into the
country over long oceanic communications during every year she is at war.
This, it must be admitted, is a tremendous commitment, and one the Japa-
nese naval staff could hardly undertake with the purely defensive force at
present at its disposal.
The composition of the Japanese destroyer and submarine fleets leads
irresistibly to the same conclusion. There are only twenty-nine first-class
boats, that is, destroyers of more than 1,000 tons in service, and when their
new units are completed they will hardly have fifty in all. These are small
figures, and it should be remembered that no destroyer of any tonnage is
really fitted for oceanic work.
The Japanese submarine fleet can be dealt with even more briefly.
Their submarines are all adapted for work in the China seas, and they only
possess two boats which could operate as far south as the Dutch East Indies.
The Japanese have, indeed, two peculiar reasons for concentrating upon
that smaller, coastal, type of submarine which French naval experts call
a sous-marin de blocus. First, Japanese foreign trade is contentrated at
Yokohama and Kobe, so that any dislocation of these two places would
automatically upset the distribution of supplies over the whole country;
secondly, the carrying capacity of Japanese railways is low, with the con-
sequence that the coasting trade is a very important factor in the general
machinery of distribution. Strong coastal patrols and powerful mobile de-
ſense at the great commercial harbors are the naval corollaries to this
dependence upon two centers of distribution, Yokohama and Kobe, and the
economic importance of the coastal routes. The Japanese submarine fleet
seems to have been specially designed for these purposes; but, it has to be
admitted that it is numerically weak. A very large number of submarines
would be required for operations in the sea of Japan, and the surplus
available for work round the Japanese coasts would not be great. All
facts therefore combine to prove that the Japanese Navy is designed to de-
fend the vital economic interests of the country, and is not adapted to
disturbing an adversary's communications. It may even be asked, how, in
its present composition, it could successfully defend the European route
from Singapore northwards, against a determined attempt to cut it. The
goods which the Japanese would need most would probably be food stuffs
from British India, and oil and rubber from the East Indies. There would
be ample precedent for treating all as contraband, in which case the neutral
flag would not cover them. The ten or eleven heavy cruisers available for
protecting the traffic would hardly suffice to put it under escort; and if an
enemy succeeded in operating from Manila against the route, no other
measure would suffice to ensure the safe arrival of the essential cargoes.
On these facts it seems safe to sum up the present Japanese program
by saying that it hardly provides adequate defense for the country's growing
dependence upon overseas supplies. If, during the next few years, the
Japanese Government make provision for more cruisers and submarines
of the oceanic type, it will certainly be unjust to accuse them, on that ac-
count, of departing from the cautious defensive policy which at present
animates their whole system of naval defense. Any Japanese government
could undoubtedly make out an unanswerable case for having at least twenty
heavy cruisers, capable of oceanic work along distant communications, and
a large force of submarine cruisers. At present they are contented with a
far lower figure, and show no desire to increase it.


  p. 1514 (#432)                      #

1514
[Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
The Shadow of the Rising Sun
By Sir Herbert Russell, Naval and Military Record, 17 June, 1925.-
Within the past few weeks several events of very considerable naval
significance have been recorded. The Japanese have completed their first
submarine cruiser, a craft of 1,700 tons, capable of crossing the Pacific and
back upon her own fuel endurance. The official report upon the recent
United States naval maneuvers has been published, and the result of this is
an urgent demand for the fortifying of Honolulu, and the effective garrison-
ing of the Hawaiian Islands. The Australian cruiser Brisbane has visited
Yokohama, and the Japanese press has made it quite clear that this friendly
act is regarded as a kind of “gesture of counterblast" to the Australian visit
of the United States Pacific fleet. Admiralty appointments have been made
to Singapore which indicate that the work of developing that base is now
being entered upon in earnest.
There is nothing out of the normal in any of these events, but, taken
collectively, they certainly serve to accentuate the fact that strategical con-
sideration is now centered in the Pacific. The degree of international
comment caused by the prolonged cruise of the United States Pacific fleet
impelled the Navy Department to issue a manifesto upon the subject,
pointing out, in effect, that there was really nothing for any other power
to worry about in this unusual parade of armed force. We are told that the
recent annual maneuvers of the British and French Aeets in the Mediter-
ranean, and of the Japanese feet in its own waters, caused no "alarm”:
why, then, should the American naval maneuvers cause any "aların"? There
have been no recent British naval maneuvers, only combined fleet exercises.
The French maneuvers were confined to the idea of guarding the route be-
tween Toulon and the North African possessions in the event of war. The
scheme of the Japanese operations I know nothing about, but from the
fact that these were carried out in local waters, it seems reasonable to
assume that they were of a defensive character.
The United States naval maneuvers were a grand strategical demon-
stration of the ability of the Pacific fleet to maintain command of the
central Pacific. Honolulu was the base, and it was a part of the scheme
that Honolulu should be attacked, and should succumb. The result furnishes
an adequate justification for the plea to render Honolulu invulnerable to
such an attack, but strategical maneuvers are apt to be regarded as a re-
hearsal for realities: they postulate conditions which would be very likely
to arise in the event of hostilities. The suggestion of an attack upon
Honolulu, and the emphasizing of the necessity to effectively fortify Hono-
lulu, naturally gives rise to the question what power is likely to attack
Honolulu ? Incidentally, certain Japanese newspapers have put forward this
hypothetical point-and answered it.
I admit that we must concede an equal right to ask the same question in
connection with Singapore. The opponents to the scheme of development
in the House of Commons have asked pointblank who is threatening us in
the Pacific, and to the answer that nobody is threatening us, they add the
question as to whether it is not really a provocative act to proceed with de-
fensive measures against a non-existent menace? This is very plausible
reasoning, but it is pure sophistry, since, followed to its logical conclusion, it
negatives both the prudence and the necessity for naval defense in peace
time at all,
Since the United States undertook not to further fortify Manila nor
Guam at the Washington Conference, she is left without any adequate
fleet base in the Pacific. Honolulu, strategically, is of very inferior value
to either of the other two places, but it is far better than no base at all.


  p. 1515 (#433)                      #

1925]
1515
Professional Notes
To the question as to why the United States needs naval bases in the
Pacific, the obvious answer is because she maintains a Pacific fleet. Rightly
or wrongly, she assumes that any conceivable menace to her shores will
come by way of the Pacific. The simplest and surest way of ensuring
that it shall not come is by being prepared to meet it. In this country we
may regard the United States as rather unnecessarily demonstrative in her
method of proclaiming this preparation. It somehow scarcely fits in with
her plea for peace and disarmament, but as to the wisdom of her policy
there can be no question. Facing her across the Pacific is a first-class power
with a first-class navy. There is only one sane response to such a confront-
ment. It is the response which England (and I write England deliberately,
for any Scotsman or Welshman to strike out if he pleases) has steadily
made for the past four centuries.
Despite the incessant, and not uniformly genial references to the British
Navy in the United States, I think we may definitely take it that the real
objective of American sea power is Japanese sea power. I would go
further, and say that a study of Japanese naval policy (as far as it is
revealed to the world) and of the character of Japanese naval shipbuilding
leads us to the view that the real objective of Japanese sea power is
American sea power. I do not suggest the necessary existence of any
hostile attitude in this posture of affairs. The knowledge that the per-
fectly friendly man across the street carries a revolver in his hip-pocket
need not cause you to conclude that he is only awaiting a favorable oppor-
tunity for a shot at you, but it might very possibly give you the idea of
carrying a revolver, too.
Today the United States and Japan are rivals in the Pacific-friendly
rivals, if you will, but still rivals. Japan has risen to great naval strength
since her war with Russia, and the United States views this strength with
concern. This is the explanation of the rivalry. At one time the pos-
sibility of a Japanese descent upon the shores of California was openly
talked about, and at one time it was undoubtedly a perfectly feasible thing
to attempt. The United States decided that it should no longer remain in
the category of comparatively easy practicability. The completion of the
Panama Canal gave her the first great opportunity of effective defensive
measures. Today she is in a position in which Japan cannot threaten her.
But the vital question is as to whether the time may not come when she
will threaten Japan?
It is not within my present purpose to attempt a review of the circum-
stances under which such a situation might arise. They are sufficiently re-
vealed to any student of the trend of events in the Far East. Not one of all
these possible causes of war but is quite capable of peaceful settlement.
The fact that they remain possible causes of war in the meantime is, how-
ever, a sufficient reason for the maintenance of armaments upon a scale
adequate to the waging of war. I do not believe there is any serious pros-
pect of war for as far ahead as it is humanly possible to look; but at the
present day there remain only three great navies in the world, and when
we think of the possibility of naval warfare we instinctively think of these
three navies. Our own policy is to keep the peace at any price to which honor
and common sense could consent. There remain only the fleets of the
United States and Japan to consider, and it is only natural to assume that
if they ever come to fighting at all they will fight one another. I am not
ignoring the existence of the other great sea powers, but these have now
accepted a policy of purely defensive measures. Harboring no aggressive de-
signs, they are no longer maintaining forces equal to undertaking aggressive
warfare.


  p. 1516 (#434)                      #

1516
(Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
Thus it has come about that what the modern strategist terms, the
"focal zone" has become centered in the Pacific. Such an unprecedented
widening of strategical outlook is likely to exercise a marked effect upon
change. The only justification for big dimensions in a submarine is the
naval design. The gigantic submarine is undoubtedly one product of the
necessity of long-distance cruising; her great asset of concealment is re-
duced as her displacement is increased and her tactical mobility is lessoned.
When the Admiralty despatched K-26 on a voyage to Singapore and back
last year they incidentally gave us a pretty good clue to the tactical idea
embodied in the X-1, and in the still bigger submarine which is to follow
her. The question of the value of the capital ship in relation to wide
ocean distances is bound to come under serious review, but I do not want
a revert here to a topic which I have been discussing a good deal of late.
A conflict between the United States and Japan would be a great war.
Our own attitude toward such a struggle is almost impossible to conceive.
Much, of course, would depend upon the casus belli, and the development
of the war. On the face of it, the odds appear overwhelmingly against Japan,
since there is no comparison between her capacity of endurance and that of
the United States. Strategical conditions probably would be heavily in
favor of Japan, since America would have to carry the war into the region
of Japanese choice. If one seeks the possible cause of such a war we na-
turally think of China, and of the situation which may arise when Japan,
bound to find expansion for her teeming population, is driven into a policy
which conflicts with the interests of the United States, for the interest of
the United States in China is very much greater than is generally realized
in this country. It is not an altruistic interest; not an unselfish interest;
and I am not sure that the Japanese are wholly wrong when they say that
there is a distinct savor of the Monroe Doctrine about it. Not this year,
nor next year, are we likely to see anything in the way of an ominous situa-
tion over this question, but the cloud is hovering over the horizon of the
future and casting a shadow of ominous import over the Pacific zone.
UNITED STATES
Economics of the Next Naval Conference
Scientific American, July, 1925.—The naval bill which went through last
winter requests the President to call another conference "by which arma-
ments shall be effectually reduced and limited in the interests of the peace
of the world, and the relief of all nations from inordinate and unnecessary
expenditures for armaments and preparation for war." Our Appropriation
Bill for the fiscal year 1926 carries the following items :
Personnel
.........$174,000,000
Operation and upkeep of ships .....
Aviation ...............
15,000,000
Public Works and repairs of Yards and Docks ........ 9,000,000
Increase of Navy (new ships construction) .......... 7,000,000
All other items (administration, War College, etc.) ... 8,000,000
.
74,0
0,000
Total Budget ..........
u Duaget ..................................$287,000,000
It is evident that if any considerable reduction in expenditures is to be
made, it must be in the first two items of "Personnel” and “Operation
and Upkeep of Ships.” The present ratio of strength of the United States,
Great Britain and Japan is 5-5-3. It has been suggested that if the per-
sonnel, or pay expenses, and those for keeping our ships in full commission
were cut in half in each navy, and the ratio were renamed 272-272-212 it


  p. 1517 (#435)                      #

1925]
1517
Professional Notes
would be possible to save at a stroke $87,000,000 in the pay bill and
$37,000,000 in the operation and upkeep of ships; for, with the personnel
cut in half, eventually only half as many ships as at present would be
maintained in full commission, the rest being held in reserve; and we would
realize a saving of $124,000,000 without in any degree impairing the relative
treaty strength of the three countries concerned.
Whether such a drastic cut is desirable or no, it is for the nations con-
cerned to say. The mere suggestion of such a thing would, of course,
arouse a perfect tornado of opposition, not only in our own Navy, but in
those of Great Britain and Japan. Nevertheless, the thing is logical.
If we want to prevent “inordinate and unnecessary expenditures," here is
the only way to do it; since appropriations for aviation, public works, new
ships and administration are already cut to the bone.
The Scientific American does not say that this halving of the personnel
of the three navies should be done. We merely offer the suggestion for
the serious consideration of our readers. Think it over!
American Fleet Outranges British, Asserts Bywater
By Hector C. Bywater, The Baltimore Sun, 22 June, 1925.—London,
June 10.-A new turn has been given to the debate on naval ratios in
general, and the gun elevation problem in particular, by publication of the
testimony heard by the subcommittee of the House Committee on Appro-
priations, which recently inquired into the question of United States naval
strength.
Some of the data brought out by this hearing are of a very remarkable
character, but the whole report is highly instructive.
Here for the first time really accurate figures of American and British
gun ranges are presented. They show the gun power of the United States
battle fleet to be greater, and that of the British fleet less, than was sug-
gested by unofficial figures previously circulated in the American press.
More than this, they indicate clearly that in a duel at the extreme range
at which, according to certain American naval critics, the first decisive hits
will be scored, the United States fleet would possess an overwhelming ad-
vantage, being able to bring a 5-1 concentration of heavy guns to bear.
So far from the United States fleet being outranged, the shoe is on the
other foot, judging from these figures. Uncle Sam now has five battleships
armed with 14-in. and 16-in. guns, which range from 34,500 to 35,500 yards.
The five ships mount between them forty-eight of these weapons.
In the British fleet of today there is not a single gun of corresponding
range. The Hood has eight 15-in. guns able to fire up to 30,300 yds., but all
other British ships are limited to a range of 24,300 yds. or less.
A British admiral approaching to engage the United States battle squad-
rons would find himself in an unenviable position. If visibility was high
and the American aircraft spotting efficient, his ships would first come under
heavy fire at a range of twenty miles. Not until he had reduced the dis-
stance by three miles could he send a single shot in return, and then he
would have only eight guns in action against forty-eight.
It is, however, improbable that he would be allowed to reduce the dis-
tance, for the collective speed of his fleet would be no higher than that
of the Americans, and the latter would take good care to maintain their
overwhelming tactical advantage by turning away every time their opponent
tried to close the range.
With forty-eight guns firing at them, hits on the British ships would
be likely to be numerous, even at this great distance, and since the shells
would fall at a steep angle, plunging through the decks and exploding in


  p. 1518 (#436)                      #

1518
[Aug
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
the bowels of the ship, they would be far more destructive than ordinary
flat trajectory fire. Given reasonably accurate shooting, the best of the
British battleships might be knocked out long before their own guns could
reach the target.
The British position will undergo improvement two years hence when
the new ships Nelson and Rodney are commissioned, for their 16-in. bat-
teries are certain to have a very long reach, but even then the American
ficet will have five long-range ships against three.
The whole American case for enlarging turret-gun elevation pivots on
the theory that with modern methods of fire control the only limit of
effective shooting is that imposed by (1) visibility and (2) the ballistic
qualities of the gun. The decisive range—that is, the range at which
sufficient hits are registered to determine the issue of the combat-has been
fixed somewhat arbitrarily at 23,000 to 24,000 yds., because this happens to
be the distance at which eight American battleships would be unable to
use their guns.
If the American postulate is sound, decisive results may be looked for
with equal confidence at ranges above 25,000 yds., in which case the United
States fleet already has a tactical preponderance that is overwhelming.
These figures certainly weaken the case for gun-elevation, which has
hitherto rested on premises now exposed as fallacious. It would be per-
missible for the British to argue that the range inferiority of America's
eight oldest ships no more than offsets the immense superiority of her five
newest ships—that, in fact, the existing position strikes a neat balance be-
tween the collective batteries of the two fleets.
Compared with the Japanese battleship force, the United States fleet has
a big lead in gun power. It possesses five ships ranging up to 34,500-35,500
yds., and five that can shoot up to 24,000 yds. Japan has only two ships with
a range of 30,000 yds., and over. Her other eight ships are restricted to
24,000 yds.
The House subcommittee investigation has done good service by showing
up the exaggerated statements made last year by certain naval agitators
whose zeal ran away with their discretion. They did their best to prove
that, while the British and Japanese Navies were maintained at the topnotch
of perfection, the American Navy was rotten to the core.
The plain truth is that every naval service has become more or less
deficient since the war, owing to the imperative need for economy, but
there is nothing to show that the American fleet has suffered more than
others frorn this enforced parsimony. It is only that its shortcomings are
advertised a little more freely, perhaps.
There is, of course, a real and very serious shortage of cruisers and
large submarines, which the building program now in hand will do some-
thing to make good. But, in other aspects of material fighting power, the
American Navy will stand comparison with the sea forces of any nation.
AVIATION
General Patrick on Independent Air Force
Aviation, 15 June, 1925.—December 19, 1924. Subject: Reorganization
of air forces for national defense. To: The Adjutant General.
It has been evident to me for some time that the existing organization
and method of administration of the Army Air Service present many com-
plex problems, not a few of which are peculiar to this branch alone. In
the general consideration of the major problems of the Army there are
repeatedly found exceptions pertaining to the Air Service which place ad-
ditional burdens upon the War Department as a whole, when possibly the


  p. 1519 (#437)                      #

1925)
1519
Professional Notes
Air Service alone should be held responsible for their solution. Several
methods have been suggested to rectify the present difficulties; none has
yet met with general approval.
The Air Service is a growing factor in national defense; from day to
day its rôles become increasingly important; many phases of our war plans
must be constantly altered to keep pace. In any future emergency involving
our military forces, particularly in the early phases thereof, the air force
must be considered one of the vital factors.
The proper development of the Air Service and the determination of
the rôle it shall play in national defense are matters which deserve, and
should receive, the most careful consideration. The Air Service must be so
organized and maintained that it may be able to meet effectively the
responsibilities placed upon it.
I am convinced that the ultimate solution of the air defense problem of
this country is a united air force; that is, the placing of all the component
air units, and possibly all aeronautical development under one responsible and
directing head. Until the time when such a radical reorganization can be
effected certain preliminary steps may well be taken, all with the ultimate
end in view.
The transition to the ultimate solution will require time and study and
the passage of careful prepared legislation. This step should not be
taken hastily. However, there is an immediate need for certain remedial
measures. Legislation to place into effect the provisions of the Lassiter
Board, approved in principle by the Secretary of War over a year and a
half ago, should be enacted at once and so broadened as to incorporate
features for the development of the Air Service along the lines indicated
herein. To place upon the Chief of Air Service additional functions which
would relieve the War Department of certain of its responsibilities toward
the Air Service is not without precedent, as evidenced by the Marine Corps,
which is not a part of the Navy Department but is under the Secretary of
the Navy. In fact, some such organization as this might be a very appro-
priate step to take at this time. As in the case of the Marine Corps,
such a reorganization need not contemplate duplication of any activity which
could be efficiently carried on by existing War Department agencies.
There are many details, in addition to those appearing in the succeeding
paragraphs, relating to the present status of the Air Service and its ad-
ministration under the War Department, which should receive consideration.
The purpose of this paper is to show that an unsatisfactory condition
exists and that, in order for the Air Service to develop and assume its
proper place in national defense a departure from present methods must
be inaugurated.
The commissioned personnel problem is most serious and perplexing.
This service suffers nearly half of all the deaths annually in the Army-in
1921, 42 per cent; in 1922, 43 per cent; in 1923, 47 per cent; in 1924, 41
per cent_and yet the replacement of this personnel peculiarly adapted to
Air Service requirements, must in general follow the same system as pro-
vided for the other branches of the Army. The principle of placing reserve
officers on active duty in the Air Service for long periods of time has been
recognized by the Lassiter Board and approved April 24, 1923, by the
Secretary of War; yet the number so carried is negligible under War De-
partment appropriations. The position of the great bulk of the junior
officers of the Air Service on the promotion list is deplorable. Early in
1922 the Shanks Board appointed by the War Department reported in part:
“The board is of the opinion that this situation will affect adversely the
efficiency of the Air Service. .... The Air Service is the only branch or
arm of the service which is adversely affected as a corps by the promotion


  p. 1520 (#438)                      #

1520
(Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
situation.” Several methods have been suggested by me to rectify these
difficulties under which the Air Service is at present laboring, and yet the
status of my officers remains unchanged.
The flying personnel of the Air Service requires training very different
from that of others. Training policies of the War Department must carry
exceptions or special regulations be provided for the Air Service.
The nonflying part of the enlisted personnel for the Air Service should
be primarily mechanicians and technicians. They must be trained specialists.
These enlisted men form practically no part of the actual fighting personnel
of the Air Service, their work is principally the maintenance of the fighting
machine. They are armed only with the pistol. Manifestly, the disciplinary
instruction, drills, and combat maneuvers are not so essential to the prepara-
tion for their mission as in the other combatant branches. Many of the
conditions surrounding their work are not found in the other combat arms.
Accordingly, exceptions are made to many of the general policies of the
War Department for the recruitment, training and employment of the en-
listed man.
The great mobility of the Air Service and the missions it is capable
of performing have created a problem in command, the solution of which is
still far from satisfactory. It is comparatively easy to place limitations-
actual boundaries on the ground-between a theater of operations, a zone of
communications, and a zone of the interior; but for the Air Service these
all merge into one. Command becomes complicated, and somewhat over-
lapping, when air forces, based on airdromes in the zone of the interior
carrying our missions in the theater of operations in connection with the
ground troops or far beyond the hostile lines. The Lassiter Board has
chosen to state that "this force should be organized into large units, insur-
ing great mobility and independence of action." Future emergencies will
require at the very outset, before the ground armies can get under way, and
in many cases before the Navy can make its power effective, the maximum
use of air power on strategic missions. Provision for the command of these
air forces has not been satisfactorily made, nor is it known by me that there
are even provisions for such initial air operations. We should gather our air
forces together under one air commander and strike at the strategic points
of our enemy—cripple him even before the ground forces can come in con-
tact. Air power is coordinate with land and sea power and the air com-
manders should sit in councils of war on an equal footing with the
commanders of the land and sea forces.
Coast defense is a problem which it appears only a united air force can
satisfactorily solve. The functions of the Army and Navy air forces
overlap, and considerable confusion still exists as to the coordination that
is necessary and the functions each service perform in order to secure an
actual and practical defense. As an immediate and practical step toward
efficiency and economy, the Army Air Service should be definitely charged
with all air operations conducted from shore stations. Ultimately all air
forces in the aerial defense of our coasts should be placed under one air
commander and powers delegated to this commander that would permit
the greatest latitude in the performance of his mission.
A proper uniform for the Air Service has heretofore been recommended
by me to the War Department. The high standing collar of the Army ser-
vice uniform is wholly inappropriate for use by flying personnel. Medical
officers have recommended against it and fliers themselves have repeatedly
complained of its interference in the performance of their duties. The
present uniform is also unsuited for work about aircraft. The Chief of Air
Service should be authorized to submit a design for a suitable uniform for


  p. 1521 (#439)                      #

1925]
1521
Professional Notes
his officers and men. Morale, as well as Aying and working efficiency, would
be greatly increased thereby.
Estimates from year to year for the Air Service are in accord with the
prescription of the War Department. Cuts in the Budget have naturally
been shared by the Air Service. In his first message to Congress the Presi.
dent said: “Additional planes are needed for the Army. .
."
The National Advisory Committee for Aeronautics stated in its annual re-
port last year: "Whatever may be the demands of economy, serious consid-
eration must be given to the increasing relative importance of aircraft in
warfare, and funds appropriated to equip and maintain adequately the Air
Service of the Army and Navy.” In sending this report to Congress, the
President laid particular emphasis on the importance of continued develop-
ment of military and naval aviation. I believe if the entire estimates for the
Air Service were considered apart from those for the Army and the Chief
of Air Service designated to defend them under a separate appropriation
title, benefits would accrue to both the Army as a whole and the Air Ser-
vice in particular.
The Air Service is a supply branch and its work as such is almost en-
tirely for its own service. Methods applicable to a supply branch like the
Quartermaster Corps or the Ordnance Department, that supply several
branches of the Army, are not always adaptable to the Air Service. Air
Service procurement, storage and issue problems, and the policies regarding
distribution and usage are matters that should be a responsibility of the
Chief of Air Service, guided by very general policies established by the
Secretary of War.
In furtherance of my conviction, as stated in paragraph 4, above, that
additional responsibilities should be placed upon the Chief of Air Service,
I recommend that immediate action be taken on the following:
Legislation should be prepared to make effective the provisions of the
Lassiter Board for the expansion and development of the Air Service and
this legislation should be submitted to Congress, accompanied by a special
message from the President, setting forth its importance, in time for action
to be had thereon not later than in the first session of the Sixty-ninth
Congress. The recommendations of this board were approved in principle
by the Secretary of War on April 24, 1923, and later in detail, after the
joint board had given careful consideration and made only minor changes.
(J. B. No. 349, Sept. 11, 1923.)
Legislation should be prepared for the reorganization of the Air Service
and as an air corps apart from the War Department. This legislation
should be submitted to Congress, accompanied by a special message from
the President setting forth its importance, in time for action to be had
thereon not later than in the first session of the Sixty-ninth Congress. The
work in preparation and submission of this legislation should not operate
to delay action in making effective the recommendations contained in (a)
above. Among the provisions that should be included in this reorganiza-
tion are:
There should be in war plans one air commander, who, in at least the
initial stages of an emergency, should control all operations of the air
forces, both in the performance of distance strategic missions and in joint
action with the land and sea forces.
The Army Air Service should be definitely charged with all air opera-
tions conducted from shore bases.
The Chief of Air Service should be responsible for the tactical training
and efficiency of all Air Service units with a doctrine first of offensive ac-
tion. This should include the means to secure and assure this efficiency.


  p. 1522 (#440)                      #

1522
(Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
The Chief of Air Service should be required to submit and defend legis-
lation necessary to maintain a proper system for the procurement, assign-
ment, promotion, elimination and retirement of his personnel. The sources
for the procurement of commissioned personnel should include all these
now employed by the War Department.
The Chief of Air Service should be authorized to submit the design of
a uniform suitable for the requirements of his corps.
Estimates for the entire cost of the Air Service should be prepared by
the Chief of Air Service under one appropriation title and defended by him
before Congress.
The Chief of Air Service, in addition to being responsible for the pro-
curement, storage and issue of all items peculiar to the Air Service, should
formulate the policies regarding their distribution and usage. He should
also be responsible for transportation by air of personnel and supplies.
The time has arrived for constructive legislation which will provide for
the expansion and development of the Air Service and I urgently recom-
mend that action be immediately taken by the War Department to bring
this matter to the attention of Congress.
The Performance of Future Airplanes
U. S. Air Services, July, 1925.—Major H. H. Arnold.Most people
would say that the history of aeronautics has not been such as to warrant
anybody's making any sort of prediction for the future. There is, how-
ever, a fair enough basis on which to estimate something about how fast,
how far, and how high airplanes of various types may be expected to go in
the next four or five years. The value of a performance characteristic
prediction is obvious. In the military field such predictions must be made
constantly if our national defense is to keep apace with other nations. In
the commercial and sporting worlds such estimates are necessary if our
planes are to compete on the race course and in aerial transportation with
other nations.
In the set of curves which accompany this article it has been my effort
to present curves that will show the trend of design rather than the per-
formance of any particular airplane. To avoid confusion, I shall discuss
in the following paragraphs the subject of airplane speeds, ceilings, and
endurance in order.
The speed of heavier-than-air craft has, perhaps, received more popular
attention than any other one characteristic. This is due, no doubt, to the
fact that the airplane's speed is so much greater than that of any other
vehicle. The curve showing the world's record for maximum speed is
shown as beginning with about 150 miles an hour in 1917. As a matter of
fact, no world record was made in that year. However, that point was
selected as a representative point on the upward slope of the curve, where
actual engineering design had begun to appear. From 1913 to 1917, many
events transpired to change the form of this curve. The World War inter-
vened, during which no efforts were made at setting world's records. From
the point of view of design it was not until after the war that engineers
really set about the work with the same scientific attack applied to other
engineering problems. In 1919 the first postwar record of about 166 miles
an hour was made by a Frenchman. That speed has been regularly in-
creased, the record going back and forth between the United States and
France until at the present time the record stands a little over 278 miles
an hour.
It is of interest in passing to speculate as to what the form of the curve
would have taken had not the war intervened. It is certain that airplane
designers received a great impetus from wartime lessons. It is also certain


  p. 1523 (#441)                      #

1925]
1523
Professional Notes
that the curve would have reached greater heights during the years 1915-17
had there been no war. The slope, however, probably would not have been
quite as steep had it begun at that time. It may be that about the same
point would have been reached at the present date, although a more gradual
development would have brought it about. From this same line of reason-
ing, we wonder what the continuation of the curve in the next few years
will be. Will it follow the dotted portion shown on the chart, or curve
downward, or possibly incline more steeply upward?
All of the queries in the preceding paragraph are, of course, difficult to
answer because they are in an area as yet unexplored. In the case, however,
of the curves showing the performance of pursuit, observation and bom-
bardment airplanes which lay a considerable distance below the world's
record speeds, the trend in the near future is not so obscure. We are here
50
SPEED IN MILAS PER MOUR
200 250
J00

SO
100
150
350
1929
SPEED HAS BEEN REGULARLY INCREASED, THE RECORD GOING BACK AND FORTH
BETWEEN THE UNITED STATES AND FRANCE UNTIL AT THE PRESENT TIME
THE RECORD STANDS A LITTLE OVER 278 MILES AN HOUR.
only traveling over a path already opened by the world's record craft. It is,
then, a fair guess that the speeds of the various types may be expected to
follow approximately the curves shown in the dotted portion of the chart.
Returning to the maximum speed curve, it is worth while to consider
if we may expect a high speed limit or at least what factors might enter
into it. First of all, unless some method is discovered for protecting the
pilot, speeds much greater than that of the present world's record will be
difficult of attainment on account of the effect on the human body. On the
other hand, the airplane itself is going to have to undergo some big changes
if we are to continue up the incline shown by the dotted line. Somewhere,
we know, there should be a "terminal velocity" governed by the head re-
sistance of the airplane and the power available to drive it. When this
point is reached, however, it is probable that the wings of the airplane will
have mostly disappeared, it being presumed that sufficient lift to support
the craft in the air will be provided at such great speeds with an extremely


  p. 1524 (#442)                      #

1524
(Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
small amount of surface. It is worthy of mention also, that before such
speeds are reached, we shall also have to progress considerably further in
the matter of propeller design. Because of all these requirements, it is
hardly prudent to predict just where the maximum speed record will fall
in 1929. However, as pointed out before, the same difficulty does not apply
to service airplanes, inasmuch as even though they followed the curves
extended as shown, they would arrive in 1929 at a speed much less than the
present world's record.
While on the subject of military aircraft and great speeds, it is by no
means certain just how great a speed is desirable. It is, of course, possible
to build a pursuit airplane that will travel fifty, seventy-five, or possibly
more miles an hour faster than the present ones. The question then arises
ALTITUDE IN TNOW AND FEET
30
40

20
1989
IN PURSUIT AIRPLANES IT IS PRESUMABLE THAT, FOR SOME TIME TO COME,
WE SHALL GO ON STRIVING FOR GREATER ALTITUDE, BECAUSE THE ADVAN-
TAGE TO THE PILOT WHO IS ABLE TO FLY ABOVE HIS ADVERSARY IS YET
OF IMPORTANCE.
whether there will be any value in having such a pursuit airplane. Would
it be possible to maneuver it? Would it ever be necessary to maneuver it?
If the craft were itself capable of maneuvering at such extreme speeds,
could the pilot stand it, and at the same time would it be possible to manipu-
late fighting equipment fast enough to be effective? These are some of the
questions, then, that may be expected to influence the pursuit speed curve
as well as matters of pure airplane design.
In the case of observation and bombardment airplanes, even though the
curves are extended along the lines they have been going, we are again
below the excess speeds of the pursuit craft. Observation and bombardment
airplanes have certain characteristics which must be maintained, which may
in the future limit speed more than they have in the past. In other words,
it may be that the curve extensions will not be as indicated by past per-
formances.


  p. 1525 (#443)                      #

1925]
1525
Professional Notes
In observation airplanes, greater and greater radii of operation are
being required. This, in turn, means that a greater load of fuel must be
carried. If a greater load of fuel is to be carried, this, in turn, may intro-
duce features of design which will cut down the speed unless a new power
plant appears.
In the case of bombardment, the same reasoning applies as to observa-
tion craft. Every day greater loads of bombs are demanded and at the
same time the ability to carry them further into enemy territory. The de-
sign of an airplane is a compromise and consequently if we get great load
carrying and endurance we must sacrifice some other characteristic.
This reasoning, of course, will be overthrown in the event that a power
plant is discovered which weighs only a fraction of our present power
plants for the same horse power and which requires only a fraction of the
fuel on which to operate.
In the past, several designers have made the mistake of designing their
airplane as of today, knowing full well that it could not be produced ready
for flying in less than about a year. The result has been that at the date
of production the airplane was a year behind the times. This is strikingly
shown on the observation curve by the small triangle (a), (b), (c). If an
airplane is to be designed in 1925, which will be produced in 1926, then it
must be designed for the characteristics shown by point (b) on the curve,
Otherwise, it will have a speed less than it should equal to (b-c), which
ten or fifteen miles might be quite serious in case of war, with a country
whose engineers had designed their airplanes with advanced requirements
in mind. If this same line of reasoning is applied to a four-year develop-
ment program, when present-day standards are used, it will be seen by the
curves that we might arrive in 1929 with an observation airplane of bom-
bardment speed, as shown at point (d), instead of the speed it should
have, shown at point (e).
A study of the curves of the world's altitude records and the altitude
curves of military aircraft show much the same characteristics as the speed
curves discussed above. Unfortunately, the present world's altitude record
does not tally very well with the present average ceilings of service type
airplanes. For this reason the trend of the curve is not as indicative as it
might be. In other words, it is difficult to tell whether or not the curve
should take the form shown by the dotted portions A or B..
In any event, the curves will be materially affected by the development
of apparatus especially made for the operation of airplanes at high alti-
tudes. This apparatus will include superchargers for the engine and some
sort of provision for the pilot, either in the way of oxygen breathing equip-
ment, electrically heated clothing, or air-tight cockpits.
Again we arrive in our discussion as to the altitude which may be de-
sirable for military purposes. In the case of bombardment airplanes, it
will be affected by the accuracy of bomb sights, the climb and endurance
of the craft, and possibly to some slight degree by the development of
anti-aircraft guns. In the case of observation, average visibility and the
range of photographic equipment will be important factors. In pursuit air-
planes it is presumable that for some time to come we will go on striving
for greater altitude characteristics because the advantage to the pilot who
is able to fly above his adversary is yet of importance. Whether this im-
portance is lessened by excess speed is something of a question. The choice
may be even forced as to whether we desire pursuit airplanes for extremely
high altitudes or for extremely great speeds.
The endurance of airplanes from a military viewpoint is always of the
utmost importance. The world's record at the present moment is nearly
thirty-eight hours. If the curve continues regularly, we may expect in the


  p. 1526 (#444)                      #

1526
(Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
next two or three years an endurance record of forty-two hours or more.
What this means to military aviation is that presently a limit will be reached
beyond which, with present fuel and engines, it will be impossible to go.
We shall then have arrived at the same point in this direction cited as
"terminal velocity" in the case of speed records. This may be upset at any
moment by the same development of power plants as mentioned above.
Assuming, however, that such a level for the curve is found, then the design
of military aircraft is a simple matter of compromise between fuel load and
distance.
Curves showing the progress of military airplanes in the matter of en-
durance have not been presented, since the development has not been rapid
or accelerated enough to make the curve of interest. Pursuit airplanes for

ENDURANCE IN HOURS
10
70
30
40
THE WORLD RECORD FOR ENDURANCE OF AIRPLANES IS NEARLY THIRTY-EIGHT
HOURS. IF THE CURVE CONTINUES REGULARLY, WE MAY EXPECT IN THE
NEXT TWO OR THREE YEARS AN ENDURANCE RECORD OF FORTY-TWO HOURS
OR MORE.
several years have had an endurance of from one and one-half hours to
two and one-half hours, which is still the case. At the end of the war the
Caproni and Handley-Page Bombers were capable of three or four hours
endurance and today our long distance bombers are capable of from seven
to nine hours continuous Aight. Practically the same statement applies to
the observation airplane, the difference being, of course, in the fact that the
observation machine travels at a greater rate of speed.
In conclusion, it seems wise to let each reader make his own prediction
as to what the speed, endurance, and ceiling of various types of airplanes
will be in 1925, 1926, and 1927, from the data given, rather than to put
down figures that might be misinterpreted. The estimate which the reader
makes will be accurate in porportion to the care he exercises in applying
the reasoning set forth.


  p. 1527 (#445)                      #

1925)
1527
Professional Notes
Airships for Military Purposes
C. deF. Chandler, Lieutenant Colonel, U. S. Army, Retired, U. S. Air
Services, July, 1925.-According to the nomenclature adopted by English
speaking nations several years ago, the term airship refers only to the
dirigible balloon form of aircraft. Structurally, airships are referred to
in three classes : non-rigid, semi-rigid, and rigid types. The smallest and
most simple form is the non-rigid, whereas the rigid type, of which the
Los Angeles is an example, has a rigid metal frame to maintain its shape.
The semi-rigid is intermediate in size, with structural features that merge
into the smaller and larger classes.
In principle, experience acquired in previous wars is a good basis for
teaching the art of war but often there is disagreement regarding the
lessons deduced from earlier conflicts. The United States Army used no
airships during the World War, while the Navy lacked the opportunity for
operating their few directly against the enemy: consequently little atten-
tion is devoted to military airships at the present time. The important
operations of airships by other nations during the World War is known to
few officers in this country. Both the War and Navy air bureaus give
consideration to the military capabilities of airships, but it is doubtful
whether ground troops understand the extent of the aid that can be rendered
to their several arms by airships of various sizes. The purpose of this
article is to set forth briefly the service that can be expected from airships.
OPERATIONS IN DESERT REGIONS
Southwestern United States, likewise across the Mexican border, is an
extensive region presenting difficulties for ground troops due to lack of
water at convenient distances, together with few roads and railways.
Twenty miles between potable water is not uncommon, and occasionally
water must be consumed that tastes unpleasantly of alkalis. The infre-
quent rains usually come in the so-called cloudburst manner, cutting deep
ruts and arroyas while passing off rapidly over the sun-baked ground.
The vegetation generally consists of small shrubbery such as mesquit, cactus
and sagebush.
The faithful army mule and the more potent motor truck can transport
supplies in these dry regions and have done so successfully, but twenty miles
a day is usually sufficient for ground troops in roadless and waterless re-
gions. Even the more mobile cavalry is seriously hampered by the absence
of forage except for that transported long distances by wagon or motor
truck. With these conditions, operations against bandits by ground troops is
a slow and expensive process of doubtful efficacy as exemplified by the
Punitive Expedition into Mexico in 1916.
Here is a military situation in which small airships of either the non-
rigid or semi-rigid types would prove extremely valuable. The twenty-mile
daily march of infantry corresponds to a half hour flight by a small airship.
Ordinarily, small parties of bandits are able to move much faster than
troops, thus escaping easily unless a very large force is employed thoroughly
to comb a region and occupy it by garrisons in every village.
The superior speed of a small airship permits overtaking parties of
horsemen easily; while the ability to move slowly or stop near the ground
affords the opportunity for observing equipment, camps and questioning
individuals. Machine guns and a few, light bombs enable the airship to
inflict swift and sure punishment if attacked by bandits. A careful in-
spection of fifty square miles of rough country daily should be regarded as
an easy task for a small airship having a crew of only three or four persons.


  p. 1528 (#446)                      #

1528
[Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
The area scouted will depend upon the adaptability of the terrain for
concealment and the number of stops required for interrogations.
In this connection, a logical question is, why not employ airplanes to per-
form such missions. The answer is that while airplanes can fly over this
desert region as well as elsewhere, a safe landing without serious damage
to the plane chassis is almost impossible due to the deep ruts and small
shrubbery. Without landing, the airplane is unable to come close to the
ground for satisfactory examinations and interrogations of suspicious per-
sons. It is this feature that makes the small airship particularly suitable
and the airplane unsuitable for operations against bandits in desert regions.
Operations involving hostile armies in any region are preceded by recon-
naissance patrols and contact patrols that can be performed at least in part
by small airships.
The field equipment such as transportable mooring masts and wind-
breaks for sheltering airships moored on the ground, are technical details
outside the scope of this article: these devices are in process of development
by the Army Air Service.
ANTI-SUBMARINE OPERATIONS
An expression frequently mentioned is that in warfare a new means of de-
struction soon results in the development of a counter remedy. The most
effective answer to the submarine vessel is the depth-charge: the manner of
its use from the vessels of the destroyer class is well known. There seems
to be a serious lack of appreciation in America of the proved value of air-
ships carrying depth charge bombs when operating against submarines.
The destroyer attack consists in steaming quickly to the spot where the
wake of the torpedo is first observed and there dropping a depth-charge.
That method permits two chances of error: The wake may not have been
observed at the beginning, or the submarine may have changed its location
after launching the torpedo.
The ability of aircraft observers to see through a considerable layer of
water affords a most valuable advantage. The altitude of aircraft above
the surface allows space for the dispersion of reflected sunlight, whereas the
concentrated reflected light interferes with seeing below the surface when
just above the water. Objects below the surface appear as shadows to aerial
observers. When a dark spot has the general shape of a submarine, the air
pilot has no doubt regarding his target..
Shortly after the World War Armistice, an officer of the Royal Air
Force described to the writer some of his experiences in piloting a small
airship on anti-submarine patrols. When a small spot of oil appeared or
bubble of air rose to the surface of the ocean, the airship regulated engine
speed so as to remain over that position for further careful observation.
Even though a submarine remained quietly at a depth too great to note the
shadow effect, it would not be long before oil or air bubbles betrayed
its presence. Then a depth-charge would be dropped accurately over the
target. At times the destructive effect was so great that personal effects
from the inside of the submarine would come to the surface following the
blast of the depth-charge.
For operations of this nature, a seaplane also could drop a depth-charge
if the target is observed during the brief passage at normal flying speed.
Obviously, the airship is superior for this service because of the ability to
hover while watching suspicious surface spots and at the same time easily
changing altitude according to light effects in searching for target shadow
and other indications.
Previous to equipping airships with depth-charges, the practice was


  p. 1529 (#447)                      #

(1925)
1529
Professional Notes
for airships discovering submarines to signal for a destroyer to come; in
the meantime following every movement directly above the submarine.
It is not always possible to know whether a submarine has been destroyed
after attack. One article from British sources reported forty-nine sub-
marines sighted by airship patrols, of which twenty-seven were successfully
attacked. The punishment by almost certain destruction doubtless was
responsible for enemy submarines preferring not to attack vessels convoyed
by airships.
The optical advantage of the airship previously mentioned, permits of
locating submarine mines as well as submarine vessels. The Royal Air
Force reported having sighted 134 mines of which 73 were destroyed.
At first the airship could only summon surface vessels to destroy mines,
but later in the war certain airships carried guns that could and did ex-
plode mines.
AIRSHIP Convoys
Airship convoying surface ships proved to be very effective protection
against submarines. The records of the Royal Air Force show that no
vessels were sunk by submarines while under convoy of aircraft, although
in the same waters the German submarines attacked ships when convoyed
only by destroyers.
Comparing the use of airplanes with seaplanes for convoy service, there
has been an impression that the former require far more personnel for
operation and maintenance. The most convincing answer on this point is
provided by British figures, as follows:
Airplanes
and
3.52
........
Airships Seaplanes
Men employed per hour flown ........ 1.62
Hours flown per men employed ........ 1.04
.40
Average duration of patrol ............ 6 hr. 17 min. 2 hr. 2 min.
When the effectiveness of airships for convoy and anti-submarine ser-
vices became certain, the expansion by the British was rapid toward the
end of the World War. Actually, the number of hours flown by airship in
each year were as follows:
1915
......... 339 hours
1916
................. 7,078 hours
1917 ..............
......22,389 hours
1918
.............................53,554 hours
Similarly the French used airships extensively from a number of stations
along the coast both for convoy and anti-submarine defense, but the opera-
tions statistics have not been made public as quoted above for the British.
Although it is conceded that seaplanes are able to operate in winds
of greater velocity than practicable for airships, it is interesting in this con-
nection to learn that from January 1, to November 11, 1918, there were only
nine days that weather conditions prevented British airships from flying.
During the last seventeen months of the World War, British airships
provided escorts for a total of 2,210 surface vessels; also accomplished
9,059 anti-submarine patrols. While performing these missions the air-
ships cruised nearly one and a half million miles. The total distance
traveled by British airships during the World War period was 2,245,000
miles.
As the atmosphere over the shore bases has the same characteristics as
atmosphere over the ocean, from an airman's viewpoint it makes no differ-
ence in the present division of duties whether the responsibility for this


  p. 1530 (#448)                      #

1530
(Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
service rests with the Navy or the Army. Like many things in life, “What
is everybody's business becomes nobody's business," so that little if any-
thing is being done toward providing in time of peace the coast defense
airship stations that will be needed on the first day of the next war.
STRATEGIC RECONNAISSANCE
A rigid type airship having a gas volume of five million cubic feet
should be able to accomplish a non-stop cruise to Europe and return if
all the pay load capacity is utilized for fuel. The military uses for such
a craft should easily be apparent.
It might be well at this time to recall the panic-stricken requests from
every community along the Atlantic seaboard during the early months of
the War with Spain. The exact location of the Spanish fleet was not
known. Each coast city and village was sure that its importance invited
attack. The natural procedure under the circumstances was for each mem-
ber of Congress along the seaboard to demand that the entire U. S. Navy
be stationed so as to protect his district.
In the spring of 1893 the cost of a few large airships, if then procurable,
would have been provided many times most willingly to remove the doubt
regarding the Spanish fleet. Unfortunately, that lesson is being forgotten,
due to time and because our last war was staged 3,000 miles from home.
A British authority on aeronautics has stated that a large airship is
capable of making a reconnaissance of 100,000 square miles of ocean each
day. The first impression may be that the statement exaggerates, but a
brief analysis is sufficient to prove it entirely reasonable. At an altitude
of one mile or more, visability at sea for anything so large as a fleet of
war vessels, is easily fifty miles on each side. Therefore it is only neces-
sary for an airship to travel forward 1,000 miles in a day to investigate
the 100,000 mile area. An airship having a speed of eighty miles an hour
(70 knots) therefore need travel only twelve and one half hours to cover
the area stated.
Admiral Beatty is quoted as saying that one rigid airship can do the
work of six scout cruisers.
MOTHER SHIP FOR AIRPLANES
Airplanes have been released and also attached to airships while in flight.
Whatever has been done once can be done again. When it is a matter of
human skill or engineering development, continued practice quickly produces
improved methods and facilities. The question no longer remains as to the
possibility of employing large airships as carriers for airplanes. After
having proved the case, money should be supplied willingly to follow-up the
experiments already made in this country. Nevertheless, it is advisable
to continue construction of surface vessels as airplane carriers until large
airships have been produced with facilities equal to present surface ships
for this purpose.
The taxpayers who supply the sinews for our national defense are not
much interested whether it is the Navy or the Army or a separate Executive
Department of the Government that develops this important military
arm for their protection, but experience has shown that excuses are never
accepted when the test of war arrives unexpectedly. According to the
organization at present provided by law, it should be the duty of either the
War or Navy Department to construct promptly an airship of at least five
million cubic feet capacity: its principal mission being experimental em-
ployment as an airplane carrier.


  p. 1531 (#449)                      #

1925]
1531
Professional Notes
A five or six million size rigid airship will fall short of providing a
satisfactory airplane carrier, but for engineering reasons, popularly phrased
as "Safety First," an airship of this size should be constructed and thor-
oughly tested before increasing the gas volume to perhaps ten million cubic
feet which is certain to be ample for the purpose.
Assuming a rigid type airship inflated with ten million cubic feet of
helium, it would be able to accomplish a non-stop voyage to Europe and
return (6,000 miles), allowing reserve fuel supply for an additional 3,000
miles, and still transport a military load of 187,000 pounds of airplanes or
other munitions.
MERCHANT MARINE
The Truth from Admiral Palmer
New York Times, 29 June, 1925.-Admiral Leigh C. Palmer, president of
the Emergency Fleet Corporation, addressed the National Foreign Trade
Convention at Seattle last Friday very frankly. His subject was ships en-
gaged in foreign trade. Admiral Palmer must have made his hearers
gasp when he said:
"After I became president of the Fleet Corporation I spent some time in
looking over the entire situation and shortly came to the conclusion that
the main trouble with our newest infant industry, the government-owned
merchant marine, was that it was suffering from too much easy money.
Instead of its getting down to real business and trying to come some-
where near living within its income, it was depending unduly upon the
national treasury.”
So Admiral Palmer entered upon a policy of getting down to real busi-
ness. He cut out some of the waste. The average loss on 320 cargo vessels
per voyage was reduced from $25,000 to $17,000. This was brought about
by consolidating lines that were in competition with one another and by
dropping ships from the active list. The result was that as many voyages
were made as before, "with a substantial increase of cargo and revenue
and a reduction of operating expenses." Unnecessary personnel in the
Fleet Corporation was eliminated and the payroll reduced in eighteen
months by $2,000,000. And here the Admiral made his hearers gasp
again: "We regard the improvement already made as merely a begin-
ning." He hoped to get the loss per voyage of the Government-owned
cargo fleet down to $8,500 per ship.
So far the prospect was rosier. But if the fleet could not be transferred
to private ownership, replacement with new and improved ships would
have to be faced. What would the cost of that be? Three hundred
-cargo ships are now being operated. Perhaps fifty could be sold. "If
our replacement program," said Admiral Palmer, "calls for twenty vessels
a year, the cost would average about $20,000,000 per year for the new
construction of the cargo fleet alone.” To this would have to be added
replacement of passenger liners and combination passenger and cargo
vessels, at a cost of $10,000,000 a year. “Thus," he went on, "unless the
Government can find a way to transfer its fleet to private ownership, as
contemplated by the Merchant Marine Act, we face the definite prospect
of having to spend about $30,000,000 a year continuously for replacement
alone." With improved administration the entire cost to the Government
of maintenance would be $40,000,000.
That figure of $40,000,000 was bedrock. The Government could not do
the job of operating its ships for less. But the "average American private
owner" could reduce the $13,500 loss per voyage to $4,500, said Admiral
Palmer, and “the same fleet, on similar services if operated under British
conditions would break about even." So this was the conclusion :


  p. 1532 (#450)                      #

1532
[Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
"This last figure, $4,500, may be taken as an approximate measure of
the amount of government aid that would be required to place American
vessels on a competitive footing with British vessels."
He was speaking of cargo ships only. Passenger service constituted
"a more or less special problem so far as government encouragement or aid
is concerned." Mail subventions and naval defense requirements might
take care of them. The cost of that to the Government he put at $7,500,000
a year. Add the same amount of "government aid” given to American
cargo vessels in foreign trade and the bill would be $15,000,000. The
"differential" of $4,500 between the operating costs of private American
and British ships might be largely offset, the Admiral intimated, by
"the extremely favorable terms on which American operators can purchase
vessels today.” This seemed to brighten the prospect a good deal, but really
only for a few years, because the time would come when lower British
costs of operation would tell again. The president of the Emergency
Fleet Corporation could not get round those lower British costs and finally
declared: "I want to emphasize the necessity of adopting an adequate
and workable scheme of government aid without much further delay."
He declined to suggest the form. He put that up to Congress, but we may
be sure that Congress will balk when anybody cries subsidy.
A Plan for the Protection of American Shipbuilding
By F. P. Palen, Vice President, Newport News Shipbuilding and Dry
Dock Company, Nautical Gasette, 13 June, 1925.—I think Congress should
protect the shipbuilding industry so the Standard Oil Company and the
United Fruit Company will have their vessels built in the shipyards of the
United States instead of foreign yards, as they are doing at the pres-
ent time.
I have no criticism to make of the action of the Standard Oil Company
and the United Fruit Company in placing their contracts in foreign ship-
yards, as they are doing exactly what I would do under our present laws.
My quarrel is, therefore, with our laws and not with the steamship
owners. Laws which cause American citizens to buy vessels from Krupp's
when at the same time they do not buy machinery or steel from Krupp's are
not just and fair to the shipbuilding industry of the United States.
If the vessels ordered by Americans from foreign yards during the past
two years had been built in the shipyards of this country, this work
would have gone a long way toward keeping the shipyards going.
On the other hand, if Congress does not provide protection for the
industry, which will be sufficient to cause the vessels required by American
owners to be built in the United States, I can see no hope for the industry.
I speak as a disinterested person, as I have no financial interest in any
shipyard.
Congress may think that the machinery and steel industries are of more
national importance than shipbuilding and therefore should be protected,
but in time of war shipbuilding always has been more important and al-
ways will be, so it seems to me that as a matter of national defense as
well as a matter of equity, equal protection should be given to these in-
dustries.
If the President and Congress believe that shipbuilding should be
protected so American citizens can have vessels built in the shipyards of
the United States at a cost as nearly as possible on a parity with the cost
of building them in other countries, then the problem becomes very simple.
There are many ways of protecting the shipbuilding industry to accomplish
this result.


  p. 1533 (#451)                      #

· 1925]
1533
Professional Notes
deered.
American owners should be encouraged to build in the United States
shipyards rather than forced to do so, and with this thought in mind I
think the simplest and most direct method of protection will be the best.
I therefore recommend an investment by the government in vessels for
foreign trade equal to the excess cost of building vessels in the United
States, and in return for this investment the United States retain certain
rights in the vessels from which a direct benefit will result, as well as the
indirect benefit resulting from maintaining the industry.
In time of war, the United States has always paid excessive prices for
ships, on account of its shipping policy. In fact, the United States spent,
lost and wasted enough money on account of its shipping policy during the
last war to protect its shipbuilding for the next one hundred years.
I appreciate that the United States has the right to commandeer ves-
sels in time of war, but this right is of no value if there are no vessels
under the American flag that are suitable for its purposes, as was the
case during the Spanish War and World War. We are approaching the
time when obsolete vessels must be replaced. The Standard Oil vessels
and the United Fruit Company vessels, above referred to, will not fly
the American flag, and therefore cannot be commandeered.
If the United States will invest wisely reasonable sums year by year
in vessels operated by American citizens in the foreign trade, it will benefit
and build up its shipyards and shipping and will make available vessels
when needed, at reasonable prices.
I have set forth these thoughts in the form of a bill for presentation to
Congress and I suggest that the shipbuilding industry request the President
and Congress to provide protection sufficient to accomplish the results I have
above outlined.
The bill is as follows:
An Act for Protecting the Shipbuilding Industry of the United States
of America
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives of the United
States of America in Congress assembled :
Section 1. To provide vessels under the American flag that can be
purchased or chartered at reasonable prices by the United States in time
of war or national emergency; to provide for the purchase and charter of
such vessels by the United States at reasonable prices; to provide for the
replacement of vessels in the foreign trade as they become obsolete; to en-
courage citizens of the United States to build vessels to meet the demands
for the proper growth of our foreign trade, and to maintain a force of
workmen skilled in the art of shipbuilding in the shipyards of the United
States: It is declared the policy of the United States to encourage and
aid its shipbuilding industry sufficiently to cause ships to be built in the
shipyards of the United States for the foreign trade. To accomplish this
end, the United States will acquire an interest in the vessels built under
this Act and will pay a portion of the cost of vessels so built.
Section 2. That the government of the United States shall have the
right in case of war or national emergency to purchase or charter any of
the vessels built under this Act upon the conditions and terms hereinafter
set forth; that in the event a vessel built under the provisions of this Act
is owned or operated in violation of its terms or the flag changed during
the period the United States has an interest therein, the vessel shall be
subject to seizure and sale by the United States and the rights of the
United States as to its interests therein shall take precedence over all
mortgages, claims, liens, etc., against the vessel, and notice to this effect


  p. 1534 (#452)                      #

1534
[Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
shall be recorded in the Custom House at the vessel's hailing port and on the
vessel's papers carried on board.
Section 3. That vessels built under this Act shall be owned by citizens
of the United States as provided for in the Merchant Marine Act of 1920;
the vessels shall be of the most modern design and shall be approved by
the United States Shipping Board ; the vessels so built shall not engage
in the coastwise trade of the United States; the price of changes made
during the construction of the vessels, shall be submitted by the owners
to the United States Shipping Board for approval.
Section 4. That there shall be paid from any money in the treasury
not otherwise appropriated, upon the warrant of the Chairman of the
United States Shipping Board and with the approval of a majority of the
members of the Board, to the builders of vessels in the United States who
conform to this Act, a sum not less than 20 per cent or more than 30 per
cent of each and every vessel so built; the Comptroller of the treasury
shall be and he is hereby authorized and directed to make such payments
when duly certified by the chairman of the United States Board; and
the sum of Twenty Million Dollars ($20,000,000) shall be and it is hereby
appropriated for payments to be made on vessels constructed under this
Act; the interest of the United States in a vessel so built shall be de-
preciated at the rate of 5 per cent of the amount paid by the United States,
per annum, and shall cease at the end of twenty years.
Section 5. In the event of a sale and change of the flag of a vessel
built under this Act, before the interest of the United States ceases, the
United States shall be repaid for the interest it holds at the time of sale.
Section 6. That in case of war or national emergency, the United States
shall have the option of purchasing or chartering vessels built under this
Act for a period of twenty years after the date of documentation, on the
following terms:
If the vessel is purchased, the sum to be paid the owner by the United
States shall be the original cost of the vessel to the owner (executive of
the amount paid by the United States to the shipbuilder) less 5 per cent
per annum for depreciation.
If the vessel is chartered, the sum to be paid the owner by the United
States shall be at the rate of 11 per cent of the original cost of the vessel
to the owner (exclusive of the amount paid by the United States to the
shipbuilder), provided that all the costs of operation, maintenance, repairs,
insurance, and so forth are paid by the United States during the charter
period and the vessel is returned to its owner in as good condition as when
chartered, ordinary wear and tear excepted.
It may be noted that the United States can give protection equivalent to
Section Four of the Bill by making loans from the Construction Loan Fund
equal to 50 per cent of the cost of vessels built in the shipyards of the
United States for the foreign trade, without interest, and payable in twenty
equal annual installments.
President Coolidge Requests that Fleet Corporation Conduct
Negotiations for Sale of Ships
Nautical Gazette, 20 June, 1925.— Although the Shipping Board has
displayed greater activity within the past six months in selling govern-
ment tonnage, there have been divisions among the members of the Board
as to the policy to be pursued in the disposition of its ships. The split
in the Board on the sale of the five President liners to R. Stanley Dollar
is still fresh in the minds of the American people, and more recently the


  p. 1535 (#453)                      #

1925)
1535
Professional Notes
commissioners have been at loggerheads over Chairman O'Connor's in-
dividual efforts to interest Henry Ford in the Government's laid-up ships.
Because the Board does not seem to be able to agree whenever any pro-
posal for the purchase of vessels comes before it, and because it is desirable
that prospective purchasers of government tonnage be afforded every
facility in their negotiations, President Coolidge has taken a hand in the
matter. He has addressed a letter to the Board requesting that the question
of the sales of ships should be left with Admiral Palmer, president of the
Fleet Corporation, that he be given authority to conduct negotiations for
the disposition of tonnage and that the Board keep out of the picture until
the time comes for it to give its final sanction to the deal.
President Coolidge began his letter by referring to revived interest in
the purchase of government ships, and remarked about the difficulties in-
volved in the negotiations of sales contracts.
"I have the strong feeling,” he said, "that such complex negotiations
cannot be competently carried out by the often independent discussions by
buyers with the several members of the Shipping Board. Furthermore,
there is an unwillingness on the part of some of our shipping men to enter
such an involved scene of negotiations.
“In order that we should make a vigorous attempt to carry out the
purpose of the Merchant Marine Act—that is, the disposal of the merchant
marine into private hands-on equitable terms, it seems to me vital that
these negotiations should be placed in one single hand, reserving to the
Shipping Board the final voice in the acceptance or rejection of the
specific contract.
"I would like to suggest to the Board that all negotiations of every
character for the disposal of ships or lines should rest in the hands of
Admiral Palmer, that the members of the Board should refuse to see or
discuss these questions with any individual during the course of such ne-
gotiations; that Admiral Palmer should be authorized to sign contracts
subject to the approval of the board. The Board will then be in a posi-
tion to exercise its proper function in the acceptance or rejection of
the contracts.
"I am convinced that better terms will be secured for the government
and more progress in carrying out the intent of the act than can be
accomplished under the present basis of organization."
It was stated officially at the White House that fear lest difficulties
encountered by prospective purchasers might hamper the disposal of govern-
ment merchant tonnage induced President Coolidge to suggest to the Ship-
ping Board that it turn over to the Emergency Fleet Corporation all
functions connected with the negotiation of ship sales.
That the board leave to the Fleet Corporation the handling of negotia-
tions is as far as the suggestion in the President's letter to the Shipping
Board goes, White House spokesmen added. No other consideration en-
tered into the President's action in proffering his suggestion. It was
indicated that President Coolidge was not dissatisfied with any of the ship
sales recently consummated by the Board and that past transactions had no
connection with the proposal to let President Palmer of the Fleet Corpora-
tion conduct ship sales negotiations in the future.
Mr. Coolidge took action, spokesmen reported, because it was being
constantly called to his attention that people desiring to buy government
vessels were becoming discouraged because of the uncertainty as to whom
they should apply in dealing with a board of seven members.
Purchasers want some one person with whom they can negotiate in-
stead of a board of seven members. Thus, the President was moved to
make his suggestion simply for the convenience of possible buyers.


  p. 1536 (#454)                      #

1536
(Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
Spokesmen said that it was the President's idea that Mr. Palmer would
conduct sales negotiations up to the point where a contract of sale could
be presented to the Board for its approval and then the matter would
rest with the Board.
The principal objection voiced to the suggestion made by the President
in the letter to Chairman T. V. O'Connor was that a question of policy is
involved in the sale of services and that the Board could not pass on that
question without having direct contact with prospective purchasers of es-
tablished services. It was pointed out that the Board has to decide whether
or not the purchaser will maintain the established service and that direct
control between the Board and bidders is desirable. Individual ship sales,
not related to established services, have been and are being handled as
the President suggested, the Board merely approving or rejecting sales
negotiated by the Fleet Corporation.
In official circles the President's action is being taken as indicating that
the abolition of the Shipping Board will be included in the Administra-
tion's program for shipping legislation at the next session of Congress and
that President Coolidge is coming round to the view that the merchant
marine problem can best be solved by the concentration of operating func-
tion in the Emergency Fleet Corporation as an independent agency, until
liquidation can be accomplished, and the incorporation of the regulatory
activities of the Shipping Board in the Commerce Department to be di-
rected by an Under Secretary of Merchant Marine.
The President, it is maintained, by stepping into the ship sales situation
at the Board has served notice that he has abandoned the "hands off"
policy which he has observed since the Board's last reported delegation to
the Fleet Corporation of full authority over the fleet.
It is asserted that the President has become more and more dissatisfied
with the state of affairs in the Shipping Board and the difficulty of holding
an independent agency within the lines of administration policies, whereas
the incorporation of the functions of the Board into a department of the
government, under a head responsible to the White House, would greatly
simplify matters.
Abolition of the Shipping Board could be more easily accomplished than
the reorganization of that body since the system of regional representation
now in vogue would make it almost impossible to reduce the membership.
Retention of the Emergency Fleet Corporation would be made necessary
by the fact that its actual function is liquidation and that the operation of
the merchant fleet pending liquidation could not properly come within the
scope of the duties of any of the existing departments.
The suggestion that the functions of the Shipping Board be transferred
to the Department of Commerce met with some opposition in local ship-
ping circles. Captain C. A. McAllister, vice president of the American
Bureau of Shipping, said:
"It would be a fatal mistake to transfer the operation of the govern-
ment ships to the Department of Commerce. It would mean the end of
all constructive effort in behalf of the American merchant marine. The
Shipping Board, with all its shortcomings, is devoting its attention speci-
fically to the interests of the merchant marine. This is a function which
could not be performed by a subordinate of any government department.
"In my opinion, it would be far better to establish a department of
transportation having to do solely with all means of transportation, in-
cluding railroads, airways and shipping, with representation in the Cabinet.
Shipping is just as important to the people of the country as the railroads,
and far too important to be put under control of a bureau of an already
overloaded department."


  p. 1537 (#455)                      #

1925]
1537
Professional Notes
Problems Confronting American Ships in Foreign Trade
By Leigh C. Palmer, President, Fleet Corporation, Nautical Gazette,
30 May, 1925.–Our merchant fleet comprises two main divisions; that
which is employed in coastwise or domestic trade and that which is engaged
in foreign trade. The former is fully protected by law from the competition
of foreign ships and therefore is on a safe basis similar to that of domestic
industries protected by tariff laws. The latter, that employed in foreign
trade, is entirely unprotected by the government, economically, and is
subject to the keenest competition in a free and open world market.
The coastwise merchant marine may be dismissed from present con-
sideration with the observation that it is a vitally important factor of
our national defense as well as of our domestic transportation system and
must continue to receive the full protection of our Government against the
possible encroachment of cheap foreign ships and cheap labor.
It is our merchant marine in overseas trade that presents our real prob-
lems-problems which apparently are not much nearer a solution today
than they were five or six years ago when our war-created fleet came into
being. But it is these problems that must be solved if the national de-
mand for an adequate and permanent merchant marine is to be satisfied.
And the solution must come soon if we are to avoid further great loss in
public funds and deteriorated ships.
Of the total American tonnage, except tankers, employed in foreign
trade, about 80 per cent is government-owned, for which reason, doubtless,
careless speakers frequently refer to the government fleet as the merchant
marine. As a matter of fact, if the coastwise fleet be taken into con-
sideration, the government-owned portion of the active merchant marine
is only about 40 per cent of the whole. However, the government-owned
fleet may properly be regarded as the controlling element in our merchant
marine in foreign trade and the future of the merchant marine will depend
very largely upon how we shall employ, administer and ultimately dispose
of this fact.
The Fleet Corporation is operating this fleet on the trade routes laid
down to parallel foreign competitors. While there may properly be differ-
ences of opinion as to the necessity of maintaining some of the routes or as
to the details of services on this or that route, it may be said that, on the
whole, the present services conform to American foreign trade require-
ments, which are, first, that our people shall be assured of free and direct
access to all important foreign markets, and second, that our commerce
shall be reasonably protected against discriminatory trade practices and
unnecessarily high freight rates.
Unquestionably, we are maintaining more comprehensive services on
some of the routes than the bare operating results would appear to justify,
but here we must discriminate between the large question of protection of
national trade interests and the less important, though more tangible, one
of ship earnings or losses. Obviously, it is quite impossible to appraise
in terms of dollars the benefits derived from our fleet in the way of in-
creased and improved transportation facilities and their general effects
on our industries and trade, while it is easy to show what these general
benefits have cost us in the way of fleet operating losses.
I think I may safely say that the services at present maintained by the
government are not far different in extent and character from those that
would be maintained by efficient foreign operators if ours were withdrawn
except that we are serving more ports on some of the routes than the trade
warrants. But while our services are appropriate to the trade generally,
they are costing us too much in comparison with those of our competitors.


  p. 1538 (#456)                      #

1538
[Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
This brings us to the two principal points of our problem: first, that
American ships are handicapped by a heavy differential in costs, and second,
that American operators are more or less at a disadvantage in being new-
comers into the international shipping game. As for the first point, the
differential can be readily adjusted, at least approximately, as it arises for
the most part from our higher shipbuilding costs, higher wages and other
items of cost in which the price of labor is a factor. This differential, which
for convenience may be called the tangible differential, approximately re-
flects the difference between the price scale, or the standard of living, here
and abroad.
Another, which may be called the intangible differential, arises from
any of the thousand and one things which keep the operator from getting the
cargo and the revenue requisite to success and is also dependent on short-
comings in operating efficiency. He might be highly efficient so far as the
physical operation of ships is concerned and able to keep his expenses low,
but if he is new in the field and lacks knowledge of the intricacies of the
trade, if he lacks efficient traffic agencies at home or abroad, if his reputa-
tion for reliability and good service has not been established, if he lacks
advantageous trade connections, he will not get the necessary cargo and
revenue.
So far as the government-owned fleet is concerned, the intangible dif-
ferential may be diminished very considerably if and when we are able to
turn our lines to private ownership, and thereafter the responsibility and the
careful husbanding that inheres in personal ownership will gradually make
the lines more and more efficient and place them on an even footing
with their foreign competitors. In short, the government should dispose
of its fleet to private ownership as soon as possible without sacrificing
the national interests, not merely for the sake of the direct economies which
would result but for the far more important purpose of placing the merchant
marine on an efficient and permanent basis.
That part of the privately owned merchant marine which is engaged in
overseas trade is probably breaking even, or possibly making a profit in
spite of the handicaps of greater first costs and fixed charges, higher wage
scale, duty on repairs made abroad, and other disadvantages as compared
with foreign competitors.
This, however, does not apply to any great number of vessels in foreign
trade and could not properly be used as an argument that aid is not neces-
sary to overcome the differential. It applies to a few so-called industrial
carriers who, in addition to basic cargoes from home ports, are able through
their world-wide business connections and through their own requirements
for raw products from abroad and through their business-like cooperation
in giving foreign competitors some of their outgoing business, to get good
cargoes homeward as well as outward. Such organizations are the nucleus
of the privately owned American merchant marine, and if our ships could be
sold into like capable hands the future of the merchant marine would be
assured.
The greater part of the overseas merchant marine, that part which is
owned by the government and operated through managing agents, is losing
heavily though the average losses are much less than they were a year
ago. I think it is well to try to clear the atmosphere and show just why
we are losing money while our foreign competitors and private American
operators are breaking even or making small profits. We can place on
one side those losses for which our own people are responsible and which
can be corrected, and on the other side those which are beyond the power
of our operators to remedy. For these losses beyond the operators' power
to remedy, some kind of assistance will have to be given if the merchant


  p. 1539 (#457)                      #

1925]
1539
Professional Notes
marine is to be on an equal competitive basis with foreigners; unless it is
on an equal competitive basis, it cannot endure. The losses for which the
operators are responsible can be reduced and ultimately avoided almost en-
tirely through increased experience together with strict economy-in other
words, high efficiency. I am not recommending at this time any particular
kind of assistance; that is a matter open to wide differences of opinion. But
I wish to show just where the differences exist between our own and for-
eign operating results.
I have already referred to tangible and intangible differentials. The
tangible handicaps are higher fixed charges covering interest, depreciation
and insurance, which are due directly to the higher cost of ship construc-
tion in America; higher crew cost, that is, wages and subsistence, due
to the higher cost of labor and the higher scale of living in our country;
and the higher cost of repairs and of administration due to the higher price
level of rents, service and personnel.
The handicap of high fixed charges, however, is almost negligible at the
present time for the reason that ship values the world over have been
marked down to about a common level; but it will become of great im-
portance when it becomes necessary for American lines to replace existing
tonnage with new and improved vessels. Vessels built in American ship-
yards cost approximately 25 per cent more than similar vessels built in Great
Britain, and in this connection it is interesting to note that British vessels
in turn are now costing considerably more than vessels built in Germany
and some other European countries. Since interest, depreciation and in-
surance are proportional to vessel values, and as these charges combined
amount to about 15 per cent per annum, it will be realized that our higher
fixed charges on new vessels will be a very serious handicap.
Our wage costs are considerably higher than the British and nearly 100
per cent more than those of certain other countries.
Our higher cost of administration, commonly referred to as overhead, is
not easily evaluated since conditions vary greatly among American organ-
izations and, of course, foreign costs are difficult to ascertain, but it is
probable that the difference is nearly proportional to the difference in the
general price levels here and abroad.
To give concrete form to these items, we may assume that the average
results of a certain government-controlled line shows an operating loss of
$15,000 per voyage while a foreign line of similar ships in the same trade
is breaking even. The tangible differential against our ships will be as-
sumed to comprise the following items :
Higher wages
........$3,400
Higher cost of food, stores and equipment ............ 1,600
Higher cost of repairs ...........
...... 1,500
Higher administrative expense ...
..
1,200
Total
..........$7,700
If the foreign ships are breaking even while ours are losing $15,000, and
if the tangible differential accounts for only $7,700 of this, the remaining
$7,300 is the intangible differential attribute to more efficient operation of
the foreign line as compared with our government-controlled line.
This tangible differential may include:
Inexperience or inefficiency of the operator and his personnel, including
ships' crews, which is reflected in insufficient revenue, and in high operating
costs in general.
Inadequate traffic organization at home and abroad and consequent in-
ability to secure a due share of the traffic.


  p. 1540 (#458)                      #

1540
(Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
Lack of basic cargo, due to a lack of favorable business connections at
home and abroad.
Comparative absence of the favoring spirit or good will, due to recent
appearance in the field; unproved reliability, or lack of established repu-
tation; and the more or less common view held by shippers that the service
is of an emergency or temporary character.
Unfavorable or discriminatory United States laws.
Covering more ports than economic conditions justify.
On this assumption it is seen that about half of the present differential
between our own and foreign operating costs is attributable to intangibles
which can be corrected in large part or abolished, and that the other half
represents the actual excess cost of our operation over that of competing
foreign vessels. By elimination of uneconomic ports and better turn-around
a private American operator might reduce the tangible differential by
one-third.
Certain private American lines apparently are operating their vessels
in overseas trade at a profit, or at least without loss. They probably
are not handicapped by the above-mentioned intangible differentials; in other
words, they have highly efficient organizations. They have, however, the
tangible differential of high wages, and so forth, to contend with, and no
doubt are able to carry that differential by reason of their favorable and ex-
clusive relations with other interests which furnish profitable cargoes.
With high-priced ships and labor we cannot expect to compete success-
fully with cheap ships and cheap labor on all the ocean highways; but
there are some routes on which American ships are not seriously handi-
capped by higher operating costs and in which American lines with ad-
vantageous industrial and shipping connections might, and probably will, be
able to maintain themselves against any competition. Indeed, the best
prospects for the further development of our merchant marine on the over-
sea routes appear to lie in the establishment of lines by strong industrial
concerns for the carriage of their own supplies and products and for com-
mon service. Another prospect lies in our railroads becoming interested in
extending their transportation systems to foreign shores through ownership
of, or affiliation with, steamship lines. Obviously, a line which is assured
basic cargoes for its vessels is in a far more favorable position than one
which has to compete for every ton of cargo it gets.
The Fleet Corporation is following consistently the President's well-
known policy of efficient economy in public expenditures. We have greatly
curtained our operating losses during the past year. We shall not be
satisfied as long as our losses are greater than those which can properly
be accounted for as the unavoidable differential between the cost of public
and private American operation of the necessary services.
In the matter of administrative expenses, the annual payroll has been
reduced during the last four months more than a million dollars through
the elimination of unnecessary personnel. However, the prospect for
the greatest improvement lies in the further reduction of vessel operating
expense and the building up of revenues. While the recent decrease in
yearly losses is a great stride forward, it is only a start toward placing
the government fleet on a near-business basis and making it possible
eventually to dispose of our lines to private owners as contemplated by
the Merchant Marine Act.
During the last sixteen months we have been clearing ground. We have
reduced our losses from $50,000,000 to $36,000,000 a year, although handling
the same amount of business and in July two months from today, we will
be operating at a loss of but $28,000,000 a year.
I don't want to mislead myself nor do I want to mislead anyone else into
the idea of thinking that the reduction in the cost of operating the Fleet


  p. 1541 (#459)                      #

1925)
1541
Professional Notes
Corporation, say from $50,000,000 down to $28,000,000, bear any real rela-
tion to the advance that is being made toward solving our merchant marine
problems. Although this very great reduction in losses, $22,000,000 out of
$50,000,000, will have great weight in getting our services on a more busi-
ness like basis, yet we must not for a moment believe that the progress
toward solving the problems of the merchant marine is proportional to these
figures. The increase in efficiency presented by these figures is of value in
clearing the ground so that the real vital problems of how we are going
to keep the merchant marine on the seas can be taken up. The thought
I want to convey is that in spite of all the increased economy and efficiency
of the Fleet Corporation in the last sixteen months, no real constructive
measure has been adopted by the country to keep our merchant flag per-
manently on the sea.
There is serious doubt as to whether the subsidy principle can be reha-
bilitated in our country. But it has been suggested that while a general, or
blanket, aid applicable to all routes regardless of local or peculiar condi-
tions might be unacceptable, special assistance for the establishment and
maintenance of particular services might well be regarded as proper and
acceptable. For example, if to further a national policy, it were desired
to bring our country into closer relationship with another through im-
proved communication and transportation facilities and give our producers,
exporters and importers an oportunity to develop trade in a new field, it
might be well that public opinion would find it desirable to subsidize a line
that would provide the desired service. The mail subvention or other
form of subsidy has been applied by practically all great maritime powers
for such special purposes.
Usually this form of government aid has been identified with matters
of national defense, the purpose being in part the creation of vessels of
a type desired for war purposes. It has not been applied to cargo vessels
to any considerable extent; but there is no reason why it should not be so
applied if a cargo service is needed to meet a particular national trade
necessity.
Defense of Merchant Ships in A Future War
Journal of the Royal United Service Institution, May, 1925.—In the
various Service publications for the past several years much has been
written about the future of the fighting Services on land and sea, and in
the air, but little attention seems to be paid to the defense of our merchant
ships in another war. Before going deeper into this subject, I would remind
the reader that the fighting Services depend entirely upon these ships for
their maintenance in consumable stores and for sea transport of every
description.
One of the greatest lessons potential enemies can have learnt from the
history of the last war is that a speedy destruction of our merchant ships
would ensure victory over the British Empire. Unlike the main fighting
feet of the Royal Navy, merchant ships must keep the seas, day after
day, in order to maintain both the civil population and the fighting forces.
In view of the great advance of air warfare the system of convoys at
sea, as practiced in the late war, will have to be improved upon. The
offensively armed escort will, in fact, have to be able to meet air attacks
in addition to fighting surface and underwater craft. Merchant ships,
too, will have to be able to defend themselves against (a) underwater
attack, (b) aerial attack, (c) gas attack. It is also suggested that they
should be trained to combine and act together so as to make full use of
their limited primary armament against a single raider. The three or
four simple formations required to place the ships in such order as to


  p. 1542 (#460)                      #

1542
[Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
bring their most effective fire to bear on the enemy could be learned by
any mariner in a few hours.
The young officers who were watchkeepers in our convoys in 1916-18
will most probably be ship masters in the next war, so that the art of
handling ships in unison and station keeping will no longer be looked upon
as a sort of black magic.
The masters and mates of our merchant ships should be taught in peace
how to prepare their ships for time of war. The measures to be taken
should be included in the curriculum of the marine schools and training
establishments in general.
If officers were trained in this way there would be less danger of a
repetition of many regrettable losses which occured in 1914-18.
The Board of Trade could issue printed instructions to the local marine
board, who in turn could inform the navigation schools at the various
ports; thus the aspirants for a board of trade certificate would have at
least a working knowledge of how to safeguard their ships in wartime.
With regard to the use of the defensive armament of merchant ships,
I have before me a letter, written in September, 1913, dealing with the
subject of training merchant service officers in the use of light guns
(3-pdr. to 6-in.). In the letter it was suggested to make the board of
trade certificate provisional until the officer had qualified in elementary
gunnery knowledge. The treasury was, I think, the stumbling-block, and
nothing happened until the war came-in fact, till 1915 and onwards.
The result was merchant ships were manned by a few half-trained gun-
layers and breach-workers, and the other members of the gun's crew
were picked up from the ship's personnel, who probably had never seen
the type of gun they were called upon to work, and yet might have to
deal with an enemy within four hours of clearing the dock gates.
The training of officers in the use of merchant ships' armaments should
not be neglected in peace time. It could be a voluntary nature and might
be carried out by the instructors of the Royal Naval Volunteer Reserve
who are stationed in all our great ports.
Shipping companies would, I think, cooperate in the scheme by giving
preference to the young men who are in possession of certificates of knowl.
edge of armaments by sending them to defensively armed ships.
Turning to questions of matériel, in order to provide for future con-
tingencies, before the perils of war are upon us, I suggest the following
should be done:
1. Give all merchant ships of from 2,500 to 6,000 tons net one anti-
aircraft gun; this gun to be so mounted that it could be used either for
high angle or as part of the ship's ordinary armament, to which it should
be an addition.
2. Ships of over 6,000 tons net to have an additional armament of two
H.A, guns similarly mounted.
3. Gas masks to be supplied to every member of all merchant ships'
complements.
With regard to the latter, the obsolete pattern of gas mask could be used
for the protection of mercantile personnel, with the exception of the people
who are called upon to perform hard physical labor on the upper deck, or
in the stokehold of coal-burning ships. For the latter the improved pattern
is necessary, as men cannot do heavy work efficiently in the older pattern
of mask.
The care and maintenance of anti-gas equipment for the Mercantile
Marine in peace time is a subject which calls for the close cooperation of
the Admiralty and the shipping companies throughout the Empire.


  p. 1543 (#461)                      #

19251
1543
Professional Notes
It is a bold man who will say gas attack at sea from aircraft is a most
unlikely method of attacking our merchant shipping. In the opinion of the
present writer the day is near when chemists and research workers will
produce a gas which can be controlled and regulated according to the
barometer and thermometer readings.
It is not unlikely that, within the next decade, it will be possible for an
enemy to spread a high concentration of gas at a selected level above the
water and distributed over, perhaps, ten square miles of sea. A convoy
harassed on both flanks by a flight of aircraft may be driven into this in-
fected area, when an untrained and unprotected crew will soon be out of
action. On the other hand, a ship which is manned and armed with trained
men and more or less adequate weapons of offence and defence could at
least have more than an equal chance of destroying (not merely evading)
the enemy.
Up to a hundred twenty years ago, all merchant ships were, for their
day, well armed and able to look after themselves. It would be well if we
reverted to the practice of our forebears in this respect and placed our
"common carriers," upon whom the existence of our Empire depends in
peace and war, in a position to defend themselves against the enemy. At
present we are being lulled into a false sense of security by writers of
pretty poems about the sea and pacifists who talk of there being no more
war, until we shall find, when the time comes, that our merchant ships are
just about as capable of defending themselves against these new forms of
attack as sitting ducks on a Norfolk Broad are against the punt gunner.
ENGINEERING
Rival Methods of Ship Propulsion
Engineering, 12 June, 1925.-In a multitude of counselors there may
perchance be wisdom, but there is certainly confusion, so that the
plain man perplexed by opposing opinions is prone to pursue the prudent
policy of Mr. Pickwick at Eatonswill, and to join in the shouts of the largest
mob. There are, in fact, fashions in engineering, as well as in feminine
modes. The building of the Forth Bridge set every structural engineer
talking of cantilevers, with the result that a number of bridges were erected
on this system which might better have been built to other plans. The
successful construction of the City of South London Tube similarly led
to the unnecessary use of shields for other tunnels, and there is a distinct
possibility that the great attention now being paid to the internal combustion
marine engine, may give rise to the adoption of the type in instances where
the superiority really lies with steam. Of course, there are cases in
which one or another of the competing systems has such marked advantages.
that rivalry is impossible. The steam launch cannot compete with the high-
speed motor launch, nor is the internal combustion engine suitable for cross-
channel packets. In the navy, again, it would have been impossible to drive
the Hood with internal combustion engines, and, in fact, in all vessels requir-
ing very large powers, the internal combustion engine is as out of place as it
is in large land power stations. Moreover, in naval service, the "elasticity"
of steam has some advantages. At the battle of the Falkland Islands, it
will be remembered that the steam-driven Kent completely beat her trial
trip record. This feat was the more remarkable in that the Kent had
reciprocating engines, which have less flexibility than the steam turbine.
In the merchant service, there is not the same demand for flexibility,
and the low overload capacity of the Diesel engine is here of but minor
importance, while its unquestionable superiority in thermal efficiency is a
strong argument in favor of its extended use. The question is, however,
by no means so simple as is sometimes assumed. In a letter to the Times
Lord Bearsted, for example, quotes a Birmingham professor as responsible


  p. 1544 (#462)                      #

1544
[Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
for the statement that "the oil engine will remain the most economical type
of heat engine in existence." Such a remark if not attributed to confusion
of thought, is at least open to the charge of carelessness of expression.
It is by no means established that the internal combustion marine engine
is the most economical of heat engines, and, in fact, Sir Charles Parsons
has declared himself ready to guarantee as high an economy with steam
as the best recorded with the marine Diesel Engine.
In short, the term economy and efficiency cannot be regarded as synony-
mous. In efficiency no heat engine can even begin to compare with an
electric motor taking its current from a primary battery. The chemical
energy of the "fuel" consumed in the latter can be converted into useful
work with less than 5 per cent of loss, while with the Diesel engine, high
as its efficiency is, the loss is fully 60 per cent. Nevertheless, although the
suggested combination of battery and electric motor is highly efficient, it is
by no means economical. The cost of the fuel has to be considered, in
addition to the efficiency with which it can be converted into useful energy,
and the protagonists of steam maintain that with current prices of Diesel
oil and fuel oil, power can be obtained with steam at a cost not greater
than if it were generated by Diesel engines.
In a pamphlet recently published, the Parsons' Marine Steam Turbine
Company give some further details of the plant which Sir Charles Parsons
had apparently in mind when taking part in the recent discussion at the
Institution of Naval Architects-a debate, by the by, in which little share
was taken by the advocates of the Diesel engine. The proposals of the
Parsons' Marine Steam Turbine Company have reference to a 14-knot
vessel, engaged on a voyage of 6,000 miles, and fitted with turbines generat-
ing 5,000 shaft horsepower.
A steam pressure of 500 lbs. per square inch is specified, combined
with superheating to 700° F., water tube boilers being used. Several boiler
makers it may be observed, are prepared to guarantee the performance of
boilers of this type at the pressure and temperature named. There would be
three turbines in series, of which the high pressure is designed to run at
5,000 r.p.m., the intermediate at 3,000, and the low pressure at 1,700 r.p.m.
These speeds would be reduced by double-reduction gearing to 90 r.p.m.
at the propeller shaft. A total consumption for all purposes of 0.66 lbs. of
oil per shaft horsepower is guaranteed, and it must be remembered in this
connection, that the guarantees of Sir Charles Parsons commonly hold
good; a rule which, unfortunately, is not observed by all turbine builders.
One notorious Continental firm, for example, is reported to have been 10
per cent to 14 per cent worse than its guarantees in the case of one very
large plant erected by them since the war. The 0.66 lbs. of oil will, it is
claimed, cost no more than the 0.45 lbs. which would be taken "for all
purposes," by a corresponding Diesel engine plant, and, moreover, the steam
plant would have the option of using coal, the guarantee for which "for all
purposes” is 0.98 lbs. per shaft horsepower.
These figures show how far marine engineers have of late years lagged
behind in the development of steam-driven plants. In the past it was the
marine engineer who was mainly responsible for the popularisation of triple
expansion engines and of what used to be considered high-pressure steam.
This was probably due to the fact that powers at sea ruled larger than on
land, and a more skilled engine-room staff was employed at sea than was
customary in land service. Today conditions are reversed, 5,000 h.p. repre-
sents a fair-sized marine installation, while a unit of this output would
be regarded as small in a land power station.
The outcome of the contest between the two rival methods of ship pro-
pulsion will, on the one hand, turn upon the possibility of improving the


  p. 1545 (#463)                      #

1925]
1545
Professional Notes
thermal efficiency of the steam plant and on the other the possibility of
reducing the cost and weight of Diesel machinery. As matters stand, the
best types of turbine can hardly be improved mechanically, but its average
thermal efficiency at sea can certainly be considerably increased. On the
other hand, there seems little prospect of any material increase in the
thermal efficiency of the Diesel engine, but its weight and cost ought to
be capable of reduction. This may involve an increase in rotational speeds,
and it is possible that this may revive some of the engine-room troubles
which vanished on the introduction of the turbine. Destroyer trials were
a serious anxiety to the builders of reciprocating engines, and there were
several disastrous accidents from connecting rod fractures. No doubt a
smash of this kind would be a much less serious matter with a Diesel
engine than it was with steam, where the whole engine room complement ran
the risk of being scalded to death. Nevertheless, it cannot be denied that
high speed reciprocating machinery is more subject to fracture than that in
which the motion is purely rotary, and considerable circumspection will be
required in improving the Diesel engine along this line of advance. No
doubt the difficulties can be overcome, and it is not a little extraordinary
that certain motor bicycle and small motor car engines attain 3,000 r.p.m.-
a speed which at the beginning of the century was considered too high for
turbines of more than some 500 kw. rating.
From the purely academic standpoint, there is certainly something very
attractive in the idea of a prime mover complete in itself. With steam
the fuel is burnt in one component of the plant, and the useful work pro-
duced in another, while in the internal combustion engine the conversion
of the chemical energy of the fuel into power is effected in a single unit.
Short cuts of this kind are alluring, but experience has shown that in
many departments of industry the short cut is not always preferable to the
longer way round. In the Catalan forge, iron was made directly from the
ore, but no great development of iron and steel manufacture was possible
until a much more complicated method of reduction was elaborated, and this
experience has been parallel in other trades. Simple and direct processes
generally imply the use of "raw materials” of somewhat exceptional quality,
and though builders often claim that the Diesel engine can be run on
indifferent oils, these are not in favor with users. In this lies the possibility
of the successful competition of steam with the marine Diesel engine, and
the advantage which it has in this regard may be increased if certain modern
methods of using coal be extended to sea service. At one American power
station it is reported that the boiler room is furnished like an office. All
grime and dust are excluded, and the coal is handled and used with as
little trouble or nuisance as oil, the boiler room crew being reduced to a
mere skeleton of what was formerly required.
It is on this question of fuel costs, direct and indirect, that the contest
for supremacy will ultimately turn, and on this head the last word on behalf
of steam has still to be said. In the matter of reliability, the Diesel engine
appears now to be satisfactory. The testimony in this respect of Mr. Ruck-
Keene, Chief Engineer-Surveyor of Lloyds, given in the discussion at the
Institution of Naval Architects, may fairly be regarded as authoritative.
He declared that in the actual operation of Diesel ships the adjustments
which had to be made to the propelling plant were far fewer than was the
case with steam.
Both the rival types of prime mover are handicapped by the demand of
the propeller for a low rate of revolution, and any considerable diminution
in the weight of the Diesel engine would probably involve such an increase
in the rotational speed as to render necessary the introduction of gearing
between the crank shaft and the propeller shaft.


  p. 1546 (#464)                      #

1546
(Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
MISCELLANEOUS
Limitations of Modern Sea War
By Sir Herbert Russell, Naval and Military Record, 27 May, 1925. -
The recent death of Admiral-of-the-Fleet Sir Doveton Sturdee naturally
evoked general reference to the victor of the Falklands," and his place in
naval history will always be earmarked by that brilliant achievement. But,
it produced singularly little evidence of any realization of the fact that
this was the one—and perhaps the only one-really great strategical feat of
the British Navy during the Great War. In saying this, let me hasten to
add a disclaimer of any suggestion that the strategical ability of the British
Navy gave any manifestation of failure. It was simply that the modern
conditions of sea warfare denied to it opportunity for displaying itself.
Granted that the original disposition of the fleet to its war station was a
step of first-rate strategical skill, when this had been accomplished the naval
war, in its major dimensions, was virtually reduced to stalemate.
It is certainly legitimate to class the drive into Heligoland Bight and the
Battle of the Doggerbank as operations of a strategical order, but I cannot
believe that any competent student of war would admit either to be in
the category of great strategical achievements.
The battle off the Falklands certainly comes within the scope of this
definition. It was a great conception, and conception is the very essence of
strategy. With unerring sagacity it assumed the next move on the part
of the enemy after his decisive success off Cape Coromel, and calculated
to a nicety how to counter that move. The result was a success of very
real material importance, and of immense moral and political value. Thus
the word strategy was exemplified in its fullest and widest application. Of
course, from the moment that Admiral Von Spee's ships came within sight
of Port Stanley the strategical aspect was finished and the tactical phase
began. The German Admiral, outclassed in every combatant point, showed
his own tactical skill in the course that he took. So long as he was able
to continue fighting his one endeavor was to close the range. If he could
only bring his 8-inch batteries within effective striking distance of his
attackers, the tremendous advantage of their 12-inch guns might in a con-
siderable measure be neutralized. The story of the conflict is too familiar
to bear retelling, but it will always remain a very notable action as a
perfect example of the dual qualities or strategy and tactics.
The only strategical element about the Battle of Jutland lay in the fact
that the grand fleet was permanently posted in such a commanding position
as to enable it to force action in the event of the high seas fleet venturing
any distance from its base. But the fight was not the result of any definite
preconception. The battle cruiser squadrons were not sent to sea in any
expectation of drawing Admiral Sheer out of the Jade. Admiral Jellicoe
had worked out various alternative tactical plans to be followed in the event
of a general action according to the circumstances in which the clash might
take place, but he never evolved any strategical scheme for attempting to
force an issue.
Indeed, as far as we know, Admiral Jellicoe opposed (and probably
rightly so) such strategical schemes as were proposed for the employment
of the grand feet. Lord Fisher had a great idea of a "Baltic gamble" which
was entily strategical. It was a conception fraught with unlimited possi-
bilities, but likewise beset too much with the element of a gamble to
commend itself to a less imaginative and more prudent commander. Fisher
was a man of obsessions, who stood for the doctrine of not counting risks.
To have launched a sufficient force into the Baltic to justify expectation
of decisive results would have been to unchain the high seas feet, which


  p. 1547 (#465)                      #

1925)
1547
Professional Notes
might have followed the grand fleet through the Great Belt-or might have
done something unexpected and very much more mischievous.
The answer to the lack of strategical opportunity during the Great War
is that the art of strategy consists in making opportunity. But this is a
species of textbook precept which calls for a good deal of qualification.
There are more ways than one of catching a sdre, but if the hare goes to
ground behind barbed wire and man-traps, then, as Mrs. Glass implies, the
soup must go unmade. Strategy dictates that, in these conditions, it is
wiser to surround the hare and keep him where he is than to run the in-
calculable risk of digging him out, for negative strategy may be even
greater than positive strategy, as Wellington taught the French at Torres
Vedras.
Strategy made its opportunity at the Falkland Islands, because the
opportunity was there to be made, but in view of the experiences of the
naval war it is scarcely surprising to find a plea for a new and wider
definition of the word than is embraced in its traditional acceptance. This
plea has but one defect to my mind; it threatens to complicate the study
of war itself. It is rather like demanding that a mathematical student, who
is set to work out the cubic dimensions of a body, shall likewise know all
about the matter of which that body is composed.
Admiral Sir Reginald Custance, in his masterly exposition of A Study
of War, suggests that lack of a sufficiently wide perception of the meaning
of strategy is responsible for some confusion of thought in the writings of
Mahan. He quotes, by way of example, the doctrine laid down by Mahan
that “The aim of naval strategy is to get command of the sea. ... which
means control of communications”; and he objects that in this the political
object only is indicated-security and the control of communications. Sir
Reginald Custance argues that the military aim finds no place in this
definition of strategy; neither the enemy fleet nor the idea of decision by
battle are referred to.
But, is it not possible that Mahan presupposes the military aim to have
been accomplished in the realization of the conditions he implies? He says
that the aim of naval strategy is to get command of the sea and control of
communications. Surely this aim can never be accomplished so long as the
enemy fleet remains undefeated? Can it be maintained that we succeeded in
establishing command of the sea or control of communications throughout
the Great War? All strategical conception was baffled by the elusiveness
of modern conditions of naval warfare, and in consequence the military aim
remained unaccomplished. This being so, Mahan's definition of strategy
was never attained. With profound respect, I still remain to be convinced
that it is a faulty definition on this account, or that it shows any confusion
of ideas.
On the other hand, the student of war who takes Mahan's interpretation
of strategy as sufficiently comprehensive clears his mental vision to specific
perception. He is dealing with naval war. He need not refer at all to the
polital atmosphere or the political aspect in order to master the military
aim.
Politics certainly enter directly into strategy when the politicians butt-in
upon the military conception. Admiral Sir Berkeley Milne was a victim
of a striking example of this, and Mr. Churchill's conflicting anxieties not
to touch the susceptibilities of Italy, and at the same time nof, to let the
Goeben and Breslau escape resulted, as such interference inevi:ably must,
in their escaping quite comfortably, and giving Mr. Churchill still bigger
opportunities for interference by plunging us into war with Turkey.
It is merely admitting the obvious to say there could be no military
strategy without the political aim, because war is simply the attempt to


  p. 1548 (#466)                      #

1548
[Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
enforce the political aim. But the strategy of war begins when the
diplomacy of politics has failed. Napoleon was a consumerate strategist
and a great politician; the genius which made the one ensured the other,
but when we study the story of Austerlitz or Marengo we are studying
strategy in its heretofore fully accepted meaning, and the colossal ambition
which led up to these battles has no more to do with the actual strategy of
the battles than the Potsdam heroics of the ex-Kaiser had to do with the
breakaway of the German fleet at Jutland.
Will the Capital Ship Pass?
By Sir Herbert Russell, Naval and Military Record, 20 June, 1925.-
To lay down, however tentatively, any precept which seems to violate an
immemorial principle is naturally to challenge dissent. Loyalty to tradition
is an admirable quality, but occasionally it is apt to be a little unreasoning.
The attitude of the Admiralty towards the adoption of steam and iron
is a classic example. I confess to sympathy in that spirit of dogged con-
servatism. I would rather look upon a three-decker under full sail than
a super-Dreadnaught under full steam. I would rather watch a squad of
hearties drilling with boarding pikes than look on at the smartest exercises
in a 15-inch gun turret.
But what is the good ? Science is an inexorable Frankenstien, and,
having unchained him, we are not going to arrest his progress by lamenting
what he has destroyed. We may occasionally ask questions as to the trend
of his steps. I am about to ask one now. The foregoing conclusion that
a great many people will dismiss it as not a matter for argument at all
does not in the least deter me. It is not even a new question, for we have
heard it a good many times since the war, although not put in the same
sense as I am asking it. In short, as Mr. Micawber would have said, what
is the use of the battleship?
The late Admiral Sir Percy Scott raised this same point entirely on the
grounds of combatant value. His view was that new methods of naval
warfare have beset the capital ship with so many menacing restrictions as to
largely reduce her to impotence. At one time he carried a large body of
opinion with him. I believe that this has steadily dwindled to almost
negligible dimensions. Of course, I need hardly add that I am speaking of
qualified opinion. Our old friend, the man in the street, may well be
pardoned for agreeing, that bombs from above, or torpedoes from beneath,
are going to demolish and surface ship. Probably he secretly wonders how
thirty thousands tons of iron can be got to float at all.
But I believe Captain Max Horton merely spoke the simple truth when
he recently stated that the battleship "is on a firmer basis" than she was
during the war. Her powers of resistance have immensely increased; the
antidotes to the new forms of menace have been steadily and successfully
developed; the new forms of menace have made little, if any, relative
progress. The enormous expenditure of ammunition and the great length
of time which it took to sink the British Monarch and the United States
Washington—both absolutely passive targets-afford a pretty striking illus-
tration of the resisting endurance of the modern armored ship. And pro-
gress toward invulnerability has been carried a long stage further than in
either of these vessels.
Therefore, I think we may definitely reject the premise of Sir Percy
Scott that the battleship is of "no damned use" because she can no longer
adequately defend herself. So far from any prospect of her being driven
off the face of the sea by new methods of warfare, she is considerably better
able to take her own part today than she was ten years ago. Indeed, I


  p. 1549 (#467)                      #

1925]
1549
Professional Notes
preface my question with the admission that the battleship of today is
quite equal to continuing the functions of the ship-of-the-line of a century
ago. As a weapon, in fact, she still remains effective in the highest degree.
But I submit that the value of any weapon, however formidable in itself,
is conditional upon one obvious factor: the opportunity for employing it.
And this is where it seems to me that the battleship has lost her potential
position. The Battle of Tsushima won the naval war for Japan. It marked
the beginning of the Dreadnaught era. In this respect it was a most un-
fortunate "lesson." Japan possessed a superiority of weapons, and her
enemy afforded her an opportunity to use them. The Dreadnaught doctrine
presupposed that such opportunity would always be assured. It simply
meant the policy of building ships to beat the enemy by virtue of being
bigger, and faster, and altogether more formidable than anything he pro-
duced. It marked the very apotheosis of the material school.
The Great War very soon revealed the fact that Germany intended to
deny us opportunity for activity employing our superiority in capital ship
strength. With commendable strategic foresight the grand feet had been
concentrated in its pre-arranged war station before hostilities commenced.
By this initial advantage it was assured that the high seas fleet could only
come forth, to any purpose whatever, on the terms of accepting battle.
During the early days of the great struggle expectation was on the very
tiptoe. The nation was eagerly awaiting the grand clash of the great
armadas. Then, as perception grew that the German Grand Admiral was
steadfastly declining any such clash, a murmur arose to go and "ferret the
rats out of their lair." A good deal was said, and more still was written,
about what Nelson would have done. The Battle of Azoukir was held up as
a splendid precedent for dealing with such a situation. In fact, an extra-
ordinary amount of heroic nonsense was talked and written, for even yet
the radical difference in the conditions of naval warfare between Nelson's
time and Jellico's time had not soaked into the national understanding.
Our grand fleet battleships used their guns in action against the enemy
once during four years. And even this occasion was the result of a mis-
conception on the part of Admiral Scheer, who never had the least intention
of a grand clash with Jellicoe's forces. For four long years, with this
solitary unintended exception, the two most powerful fleets the world has
ever seen sat and watched one another. And meanwhile, beyond the ring
they kept, the sea conflict was waged furiously, and for this country rather
disastrously.
There are plenty of academic-minded students of naval warfare who
either have already treated us, or are quite prepared to treat us, to crudite
demonstrations of the influence of this passive phase upon the course of
the whole, stupendous struggle. They allege that we neutralized the sea
power of Germany. I allege that we did nothing of the sort. When the
German Navy was sinking our battleships in the Dardanelles, when it was
bombarding the port of Liberia, and later on, a lighthouse on the American
coast, when it was scattering the western approaches and the narrow seas
with the cargoes that we so urgently needed, can we say that it was
neutralized"?
We dealt with this new form of war, dealt with it magnificently and
with growing success, but not by virtue of our mighty line-of-battle. In-
deed, the grand fleet proved a positive handicap to commerce protection,
since it retained large numbers of cruisers and destroyers at Scapa which
would have been of the utmost value in the campaign against U boats. Of
course, it could not be helped. There was nothing else that could be done.
The Germans condemned our capital fleet to uselessness in keeping its own
useless. We exercised the "silent pressure" about which the late Admiral
տարի


  p. 1550 (#468)                      #

1550
[Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
Mahan wrote so brilliantly. But, when Mahan was writing, more than three
decades ago, there were no means of getting under and past "silent
pressure”; now the phrase has become an anachronism.
Suppose that neither Germany nor ourselves had possessed any battleships
at all, is it not quite conceivable that we should have got on with the naval
war more quickly and more decisively? It is not true to say that the same
thing might equally be asked of any other type of warcraft. All the other
types of warcraft were actively busy. The capital ships alone (with the
exception of the battle cruisers, which assumed the role formerly filled by
legitimate cruisers) played a negative part. The real value we got out of
our superb grand fleet was that it denied to Germany the possibility of
using her fine high seas fleet. We wanted her to use it from the very time
of taking up our war station, but it was quite impossible to force her into
using it.
What is the use of the battleship? To fight the enemy's battleship. But
suppose the enemy battleship will not come out and fight. In Nelson's day
the remedy for this lay in the close blockade. Such a procedure is out of
the question in this age of submarines and destroyers, of aircraft and mines,
and of artillery possibilities such as were exhibited when the Germans
bombarded Paris from a range of seventy miles. Moreover, why closely
blockade an enemy who has already quite made up his mind to lie snug
behind defenses which it would be altogether too hazardous for any battle
fleet to attempt to force?
The weapons of war have been evolved by the conditions of war. The
conditions of war at sea changed but little from the time of the Spanish
armada until the final disappearance of sail power. The battleship per-
petuates the conditions, but in defiance of the changes which have so re-
stricted her opportunity for fulfilling them. Jutland proved that a great fleet
action can never be the compact and decisive affair it formerly was. The
chemical element is going to add another very confusing factor to the
existing disabilities of open-sea combat. How far that factor may be de-
veloped it is impossible to foresee. The Germans are reported to have
carried out many experiments with rainbow smoke screens during their late
naval maneuvers, the idea being to render effective long-range shooting
impracticable.
When the Rodney and Nelson are completed none of the great sea powers
will be at liberty to lay down any more capital ships (presuming the Wash-
ington Agreement continues to be observed) for several years to come, with
the exception of France, which appears to favor a type of very small and
very mobile battle cruiser, more analogous to an armored cruiser than a
present-day capital ship. During this period there will be considerable
activity in the construction of very fast, sea-keeping cruisers, of 10,000 tons,
armed with 8-inch guns of very high velocity and great range. These
vessels seem to me to embody the latest principles of modern sea warfare:
the capacity to either devastate or protect commerce. They are units of
independent action, as distinct from the merely component function of the
ship-of-the-line. Four of them can be produced for the cost of one
capital ship. Economicaliy, therefore, they are a much preferable weapon.
It is self-evident that they cannot do what the capital ship is designed to
do. But if it be a resonable contention that the capital ship is likely to be
denied much opportunity of fulfilling her designed purpose--at any rate,
actively--then surely this advantage is more apparent than real.
War has one single purpose: the reduction of the enemy to submission.
All the methods and weapons of war are a means to this end. In spite of
our overwhelming strength in ships-in-the-line, and the exceptional advan-
tages of strategic position for the employment of this strength, the


  p. 1551 (#469)                      #

1925]
1551
Professional Notes
Germans at sea came dangerously near to reducing us to capitulation.
This is the aspect of naval war which we have to face in the future. Prey-
ing upon commerce has always been a feature of sea warfare, but the old
privateer was a very different sort of foe from the modern submarine.
Steadily we become less and less a country of internal resources. The pros-
pect of starvation was never really an imminent menace during the great sea
wars of the past. It certainly was in the years 1916-18.
The capital ship is kept alive by rivalry. It is impossible for one power
to abandon her unless all the rest do. Competition frequently results in
confusion of thought. The great naval nations go on evolving the most
formidable weapon in the world. They may have their own doubts as to
the wisdom of such a policy, but they do not frankly say to one another
that the time has come to conform to totally changed conditions. If, and
when, they do, I venture to believe that the battleship will be ranked with
the other bygone things of the spacious past.
The Situation in the Pacific
By Major K. B. Ferguson, R.G.A. (Retd.), Journal of the Royal United
Service Institution, May, 1925.-The problems of the Pacific are the prob-
lems of half the globe. On the circumference of this huge ocean are
China, Japan, Siberia, Canada, the United States, Mexico, the Central
American States with the Panama Canal, Colombia, Ecuador, Peru, Chile,
New Zealand, Australia. In addition to these independent states are a
multitude of dependencies, islands, archipelagoes, varying in size and im-
portance from French Indo-China, the Philippine Islands, Borneo, Java, and
Sumatra, to little coral atolls like Pitcairn Island that stands like oases in
a desert of waters. The Pacific Ocean extends from Arctic regions off
Alaska to the Anarctic waters of Ross Sea; and two of the states alone,
China and the United States, include between them one third of the human
race. It is vast in size, and full of fascination. Since it first became known
to Europeans, it has appealed to the imagination of travelers and ad-
venturers; it now appeals also to students of politics, because it is the
scene of international interests that are becoming more momentous every
year.
In a short study today, we can only lay stress upon one or two points
out of scores that offer themselves. I shall first take a glance from the
Japanese point of view. Then I shall turn to the American point of view.
Thirdly, I shall emphasize the importance of China. Finally, I hope to
bring out the lesson which it seems to me all political problems teach us :
the need to consolidate our own Empire, so that in strengthening itself,
it may become a strength and stay to others.
I
Japan has a strong strategical position in the Pacific, and she has
improved the advantage by raising herself to a high pitch of efficiency,
both on land and at sea. But, she has two difficult problems before her ;
one is an outlet for her population, which is growing rapidly; the other is
the problem of external supplies in time of war.
(1) The population of Japan proper is roughly 56,000,000; including
Korea, Formosa, and Saghalien, it is roughly 77,000,000. It increases in
Japan at the rate of about 600,000 a year, and that country is already
closely packed. It is not so dense per square mile as ours in England;
but whereas we have many of the fairest and most fertile portions of the
globe to go to-Canada, Australia, New Zealand, Africa, the Colonies and
Protectorates—the Japanese have at present only Korea, Formosa, and
one half of Saghalien, no one of which offers much scope to an ambitious


  p. 1552 (#470)                      #

1552
[Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
and enterprising people. Canada, the United States, Australia, and New
Zealand are closed, or are closing, their doors to the Japanese. They
would find space enough, and to spare, in Manchuria and Siberia; but
Russia is beginning to show signs of returning to the old Muscovite policy
which we associate with the Tsarist régime, and will probably close
Siberia to the Japanese unless they are prepared to fight for it, which is
out of the question.
No man can foresee what way Japan will find out of her difficulty,
and I wish purposely to avoid wasting time in speculation about the
future. We can only note the broad fact that an expanding population
must go somewhere, and the other broad fact that all the obvious outlets
are closed. A rising flood must find an outlet or produce a catastrophe.
We know what happened in our own country. England developed slowly
in the 1500's, 1600's, and 1700's. Then, with the dawn of the Industrial
Age, she went forward rapidly, and during the last half century we have
been living in a whirl of motor cars, wireless, American "pep," democracy,
and emancipated women. So it is with Japan. It has been estimated
that during the 230-odd years that she shut herself off from the world,
roughly from the time of Charles I to the middle of Queen Victoria's
reign, her population only increased by some 26,000,000. During the last
sixty years, on the other hand, the rise of Japan has been meteoric and
bewildering; and if she goes on at the same rate, it is evident that her
surplus population must find some place to go to. So much for her first
problem.
(2) Her second problem concerns her supplies in time of war. Like
Great Britain, she is dependent on external sources; she can never again
be self supporting. A hundred years ago, the Japanese cultivated their
rice fields, and lived on the produce thereof; rice and fish were their
staple food, they were a self-centered and self-supporting community. Then
they suddenly flung their doors open and became a World Power. They
wanted ships and commerce, iron works and coal; that constant flow of
raw material, of exports and imports, that an industrial nation demands.
But Japan has no more acreage now than she had a hundred years ago,
and the Law of Diminishing Returns does not forget to act. So she has
to get raw materials and foodstuffs from abroad, in the same way as we
do ourselves. The government is making strenuous efforts to increase the
productivity of the land, chiefly in the output of rice, so as to make the
country self-supporting again. But the tendencies are against it. The
Japanese, for instance, are eating increasing quantities of meat, and want-
ing an improved standard of living, with more luxury and comfort; and as
this tendency becomes more marked every year, Japan will depend more
and more on foreign trade. Therein lies a danger, which the efforts of the
most peaceful-minded statesman cannot prevent. We shall see commercial
and industrial competition increasing in the Far East, and there is no
reason to doubt that it will lead to armed conflict some day, as it did among
ourselves in Europe a few years ago.
I would like, at this stage, to point to a group of figures which show
the industrial development of Japan within the lifetime of a middle-aged
man of today. In 1868, or fifty-six years ago, at the time of the restoration
to power of the grandfather of the present Mikado, she had no factories
at all in the modern sense. In 1900 she had some 7,000; today she has about
25,000.
The growth of Japanese shipping has kept pace with this rapid industrial
growth. Japan has her trade routes not only across the Pacific, but over
the whole world; and we, who realize that the safety of our empire
depends on our being able to keep our trade routes open, can sympathize
with her, because she is in the same position. If her communications


  p. 1553 (#471)                      #

1925)
1553
Professional Notes
with the outer world are cut, she will be in danger of starvation, not
only in the matter of food, but also of raw materials-wool, cotton, iron,
etc. It is not enough for her to have a strong strategical position if she
remains vulnerable on those lines of communication. It is not enough to
know that in her corner of the Pacific, thousands of miles from Europe
and the United States, she cannot be beaten in direct attack. She has to
bear in mind the fact that she could be worn down without being attacked,
if her supplies were cut off.
That is her point of view toward America and Europe. But she also
has to take into account the two remarkable Powers to west and north of
her. She may have nothing to fear from China or Russia at the present
moment, because both are in a chaotic state of government. But if we are
to believe the best authorities on China, that vast country is being
gradually transformed. I do not think that any amount of transformation
will ever make the Chinese an aggressive race, because we have four
thousand ycars of their history to show that it is not in them. They
have from the earliest times been a pastoral and agricultural people, good
traders and workers, good artisans and laborers; never a fighting race
like the Japanese or Prussians. But they may quite conceivably develop
more power to resist aggression on the part of others, and that is enough
to alarm Japan. Roosevelt, in his Autobiography, wrote of "the frightful
calamities that have befallen China because she has had no power of
self defense." Perhaps without ever becoming aggressive she will develop
that power of self defense; and if she does, Japan, like all the rest of us,
will have her work cut out for her.
North of China, again, is the formidable power of Russia-outwardly
changed, as a man's appearance is changed after fearful sickness, but in
essentials the same as ever before. Do you remember the stories we used to
hear about exiles to Siberia in the time of the Tsars? about sinister secret
police of Russia? about the squalor and sufferings of the mujik? about the
fiendish cruelties of Ivan the Terrible and Peter the Great? about the
expansion of Russia towards Turkestan and Mongolia, and her ambition
to have outlets on the Black Sea and the Pacific? It is all just the same
now; if they manage to retain power, the present rulers of Russia will
follow on the same line as the old ones; or, if they are driven out by some
new Ivan or Peter, he will go on as before. If we do not realize that,
Japan does. When she looks ahead, she has to take into account the
likelihood, if not the certainty, that some day China, or Russia, or both,
will become a grave menace to her. Now that she has annexed Korea and
so planted her foot on the mainland, she is even more precariously involved
than if she were only an island power. It is as if we came into possession
of Denmark, or of the Cherbourg promontory in the north of France.
Think what a difference it would make to our position in Europe !
I cannot dwell longer on the Japanese point of view, so I merely repeat
the three points on which I have laid stress:
1. The problem of her surplus population.
2. The problem of external supplies.
3. The possible danger from China and Russia as near neighbors.
I now cross over to the other side of the Pacific, and look at the
situation from the American point of view.
II
Our American cousins have their frailties and virtues like everyone
else, but false modesty is not one of them. They do not underrate their
own importance in the world. They are convinced that the U.S.A. is
the greatest of the Great Powers, the hub of the universe, and that they
must be "top dog" in the Pacific. The Japanese have precisely the same


  p. 1554 (#472)                      #

1554
[Aug
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
idea about their own country, so the two must necessarily come into
conflict; not armed conflict, perhaps, but economic conflict, and a conflict
of ambitions.
The United States gave hostages to fortune when they stretched across
the Pacific to Hawaii and the Philippines. It is not for a humble student
of world politics to judge whether, on balance, they are a source of
advantage or a weakness to her. One of the greatest of modern Americans,
Theodore Roosevelt, held that the Philippines were indispensable to America
as an advanced base. Other strategists deny this, and go so far as to
say that the Philippines would be a gift to Japan within the first few
weeks of a conflict, because before an American fleet could steam 5,000-
odd miles to defend this base, the Japanese would be in possession of it;
and furthermore, that the American fleet would then be helpless for lack
of coal, and would consequently be at the mercy of the enemy. However
that may be, America has thrown herself right across the Pacific, and in
the Philippines she is the very door of China. We cannot blame the
Japanese if they feel misgivings about this. Mr. Rooosevelt himself told
them that their sphere was in Asia, while the American sphere was on
the continent of America: in other words, that each power could keep on
its own side of the Pacific, and they need never collide. If in spite of that
they see the United States spreading across to the Philippines, with stepping
stones at Hawaii, Midway Island, and Guam, they are quite right to take
necessary precautions.
The attitude which Americans have taken up over the immigration
question has naturally accentuated the rivalry between them and the
Japanese. The Americans of the Pacific States, who are the people who
matter in this case, dislike and look down on the Japanese. They make
no distinction between them and the Chinese, Siamese, or other races of
Eastern Asia, but bracket them all together as "yellow men"; in fact,
many of these people, who for twenty years have been agitating for the
exclusion of the Japanese, and who are at the back of the recent anti-
immigrant troubles, look upon them as simply another form of "nigger."
The intense racial feeling along the Pacific coast is not comprehensible
to us in England for the same reason why we cannot understand the
intense feeling of the French against the Germans. We have never been
in the same peril as France from a stronger neighbor on our frontier,
and we have not enough imagination to put ourselves in her place. In
the same way, England enjoys immunity from racial dangers, and people
who are thus immune cannot imagine how those dangers affect other
people. The objection of the Americans to Japanese is partly racial and
partly economic. It is racial in that they object to the idea of having
Japanese proprietors of American soil, employing American men and
women in a subordinate capacity. It is economic in the sense that the
American artisan or laborer cannot compete with Japanese labor, which
is equally efficient and very much cheaper. So American trade unions are
up in arms. Our own people in Canada, Australia, and New Zealand are
not less emphatic than the Americans, and do not differentiate much
between Japanese and other yellow or brown races.
The Americans are quite within their rights in objecting to a Japanese
invasion. Mr. Roosevelt put the case fairly and squarely, as usual, when
he said: “The Japanese themselves would not tolerate the intrusion into
their country of a mass of Americans who would displace Japanese in the
business of the land. I think they are entirely right in this position. I
would be the first to admit that Japan has the absolute right to declare
on what terms foreigners shall be admitted to work in her country, or to
own land in her country, or to become citizens in her country. America
has and must insist upon the same right. The people of California were


  p. 1555 (#473)                      #

1925]
1555
Professional Notes
right in insisting that the Japanese should not come thither in mass, that
there should be no influx of laborers, of agricultural workers, or small
tradesmen-in short, no mass settlement or immigration."
The Japanese complaint is that the recent American legislation is uncalled
for. They maintain that the so-called “Gentlemen's Agreement" of 1908,
under which Japan herself, out of deference to America, restricted the
flow of Japanese immigrants into the U.S.A., was working well and doing
all that was necessary and that the new legislation discriminates between
immigrants from Japan, who are shut out, and those from France, Italy,
and other European countries, who are still allowed to come in. In other
words, they complain that the issue is now purely racial, and insulting to
them.
It is naturally an intolerable position for them. They resent being
classed with Chinese and other Asiatic races, because they consider that the
events of the last thirty years have given them a superior status. They
also resent the suggestion of inferiority to white races which is implied in
their exclusion from white men's countries, because they consider, quite
rightly, that those events have put them on a footing of equality with the
white races. They defeated the Russians twenty years ago, and sat in
judgment on the Germans and Austrians after the Great War. They were
among the Big Five at Versailles; and, after having accepted their aid in
1914, we can scarcely turn around now and deny them equal rights with
ourselves.
How far Japan will be able to redress this inequality and assert
a right to enter other people's countries,-this remains to be seen. It is
a problem of the Pacific which we or our descendants will some day come
up against in an acute form. For the present America has made up her
mind, and is not going to draw back. She is evidently determined to make
the Pacific seaboard safe for her own democracy. She sets us a good
example in this respect.
Will Japan fight America ? The question is constantly raised, but
is one of those speculative problems with which I have no time to deal here.
It seems to me that Japan is in more danger from China or Russia than
from the U.S.A., or ourselves on the other side of the great Ocean.
Whether in a passive or an active rôle, she is more closely committed in
northeastern Asia than anywhere else, and is more likely to come into
conflict with her rivals there. Now that she is being shut out from the
North American continent and from Australasia, she has has an additional
reason to look westward for means of expansion. Secondly, the annexa-
tion of Korea has made her a continental power. Thirdly, Russia contains
aggressive elements which may at any time renew the menace to Japan in
the Far East. For more than one reason, therefore, Japan has to watch
her neighbors to west and northwest of her carefully.
III
I have sketched briefly the points of view of Japan and the United
States. Behind these two protagonists is the vast form of China.
China is the pivot round which all Pacific problems revolve. In size
she is one of the greatest powers on that ocean; in population she is by
far the greatest. You will find that every one of the western powers, in
its outlook upon the Pacific, keeps one eye all the time on China. We
have all tried, with vary success, to grab portions of her territory. We
have tried to dominate her trade, and obtain the first place in her huge
markets. We have heard allusions to the "yellow peril," "slumbering
millions" and "awakening giants.” But what is not always realized fully
is the latent strength of the Chinese. Most of us look upon them as an
inferior race, only semi-civilized and very backward. Backward they cer-


  p. 1556 (#474)                      #

1556
[Aug
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
tainly are, if we take them collectively. The peasants and laborers in
remote parts of the country live in a state of ignorance, squalor, and misery,
though I doubt if it is worse than in Russia and other parts of Europe.
On the other hand, the better class of Chinese are an exceedingly fine race.
To look upon them as inferior to ourselves, or less civilized, would show
ignorance on our own part. They have traditions that go back not only
beyond our Norman and Anglo-Saxon periods, but far beyond the early
ages of Greek and Roman civilization. They are people of great natural
ability, supreme in every branch of commerce. And in addition to their
natural ability, they have a courtesy of manner that makes them pleasant to
deal with, either in business or in social intercourse.
They are extraordinary people; and it strikes me more forcibly the
longer I think about it, that China is not conquerable. You cannot
conquer such an immense mass of people, and their civilization is so
strongly rooted that you cannot even shake it seriously. At present,
however, this vast and clumsy organization has no head, no organization,
no fixed purpose, no means of carryng out a purpose. Yet it is very
much alive, and its potential strength is beyond the reach of our imagina-
tion. To talk of Japan conquering it, or annexing it, or even guiding it, is
unthinkable to me, because China is greater than Japan in every way but
one: namely, that she hates and despises fighting and every form of
strenuous competition. That seems to me to be the only respect in which
she is not the equal or superior of any other people, white, brown, or
yellow.
I shall not attempt to give an outline of Chinese political history
during the last few months. Chinese civil warfare has a style of its own,
not like anything else with which we are familiar. And even if I could
explain the ups and downs of Chang Tso Lin, Wu Pei Fu, Feng Yu Hsiang,
Tuan Chi Jui, and other Celestial leaders, it would serve no useful purpose,
because the relation of these men to the inner life of China is the relation
of foam on the crest of a wave to the deep waters that lie beneath. I
would, however, emphasize the fact that China is changing, slowly,
perhaps, but surely, under the influence of western civilization. Nothing
will make the Chinese become European. They have too much indi-
viduality; and a civilization that has endured for 4,000, 5,000, or 6,000 years
is not going to alter fundamentally in the course of a man's lifetime. But
they will alter externally, even as we have altered in the last fifty years,
though we are still the same people of Shakespeare and Nelson. Scientific
knowledge, hygiene, and mechanical invention will filter through these
myriads of people, and make a vast difference in them. Observers on the
spot tell us there has already been an extraordinary change in the last few
years. You have no doubt heard about the Young China Movement,
which is largely directed by young students and people of radical, not to
say revolutionary, tendencies. Like youthful enthusiasts all the world
over, these young Chinese want to reform everything, and obtain the
millennium by return post. Their zeal often outruns their judgment and
their powers; but they are a great force, and their influence upon the future
of their country is likely to be momentous.
What China needs today is a strong government to keep order and
assist in her development. At present the weakness of the central
government is a hindrance to herself, and is a source of anxiety and danger
to everyone else. The lives and property of our fellow-countrymen can
never be thoroughly safe with an unstable government that cannot put
a stop to bandit outrages and the vagaries of military chieftains. On the
other hand, a well-ordered and prosperous China will tend toward
stability. It is not in the Chinese to be an aggressive nation, and the idea
of swarms of them rushing forth to invade the American Continent,


  p. 1557 (#475)                      #

1925]
1557
Professional Notes
Australia, and New Zealand is fanciful. They will be more likely to assert
their right to regulate their trade with us, and to shut out foreigners when
they feel inclined. That may become inconvenient for us from the
commercial point of view, but we cannot deny them that elementary right
if we go on calling them a sovereign power. Such an eventuality is,
however, not likely to happen in our time.
Before passing on to the concluding portion of my lecture-the
consideration of our own position in the Pacific-let me sum up a few
impressions. The general impression we get from our subject is that
forces are rising up in the Pacific which may some day get out of control.
(1) One is the expansion of Japan, whose population is increasing rapidly,
but is refused admission into other countries where it might find an outlet.
(2) A second force is rising up in China. Her population question is also
likely to become acute, especially if she adopts western methods of
hygiene, and avoids the frightful wastage which has hitherto been due to
disease and pestilence. (3) A third is the expansion of the United States,
which are still as it were a young giant, growing rapidly. (4) On the
north-west corner of the Pacific is a fourth-Russia, a huge power, of
which no wise man would attempt to predict the future five years ahead.
(5) In the northeast and the southwest of the great ocean you find our
own empire, represtented by Canada, New Zealand, Australia, various
dependencies, and two links in the chain which binds London to the Far
East, Singapore and Hong Kong. Here are five forces that are growing up
in the Pacific; and we have made no mention of the interests of France in
Cochin China, or of the South American States.
Another impression we get from this study is that the broad line of
cleavage in the Pacific is racial, and not national. Japan belongs to Asia;
the inhabitants of America belong to Europe. If Japan were to fight
Canada or Australia for the right of immigration, the U.S.A. would join in
with our Dominions, and vice versa. The same idea is at the back of the
Japanese mind when they think of an Asiatic Monroe Doctrine-Asia for
the Asiatics. It is a perfectly just idea. Japan ought to support China
in her claim to independence, and if she were large-minded enough to do
so, they would be a formidable combination. But at present it seems un-
likely, because there is hatred between the two. Like other nations, Japan,
instead of helping China, has aimed at suppressing her, and squeezing
everything out of her that could be squeezed. The Chinese have been
alive to this, and will try some day to get their own back from the
Japanese. Yet this does not alter the fact that Japan really belongs to
Asia, and must find her ultimate development along Asiatic, and not
European, line.
IV
Meanwhile, how do we stand ourselves in the Pacific? The British
Empire is potentially the greatest power in the world at present, and she
has interests in the Pacific second to no other. Three of the Dominions
are there; two of the foremost trading centers in the world, Hong Kong
and Singapore; and groups of dependencies like Fiji, British North Borneo,
New Guinea, and the Mandatory Islands south of the Equator. We are
thus involved on the western seaboard, on the eastern, and on the southern.
Only to the northwest, where Japan, China, and Russia stand facing one
another, is there no portion of the British Empire.
Our position in the southwestern Pacific has received much attention
of late in connection with the question of Singapore. I try to look at that
question not from the point of view of a soldier, who may be expected to
show professional bias, but from that of a plain citizen, who only has an
ordinary measure of common sense to go by. Looking at it in that way,


  p. 1558 (#476)                      #

1558
[Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
I notice that a continuous chain of bases and coaling stations runs from
the United Kingdom through Gibralter, Malta, the Suez Canal, and Aden,
or alternately through Sierra Leone, Cape Town, and Mauritius, to
Ceylon and Singapore, and from there to Hong Kong in one direction,
Australia and New Zealand in the other. If we are prepared to adopt
the policy of Denmark, and leave ouselves entirely unprotected, well and
good. But if we are going to make any preparations at all in case trouble
should arise, it appears to me to follow that Singapore should be strongly
fortified, so that our chain cannot be broken there. The more I study
other nations, the less I like those things with the new-fangled name of
"moral gestures.” A moral gesture is the last thing to earn the respect
of a Japanese, or a Chinese Tuchum, or a high-minded American, or a
patriotic Frenchman; they will like us better if we say to them fairly and
squarely: "We propose to fortify Singapore because it is a vital point on
our line of communications between London and our people in the Pacific.
It is obviously no menace to you Japanese and Americans because it is too
far from either of you, and is outside the zone that we agreed upon at the
Washington Conference, within which no new fortifications were to be
constructed. Our ships in Far Eastern waters need a base where they
can be secure and can carry out necessary repairs. Singapore is better
than Hong Kong for another reason: That it gives us more security against
aircraft; and the volume of trade that passes through the Malacca Straits
is so vast that we must have the means of protecting it adequately."
I can understand, without necessarily accepting it, the argument
that advocates Sydney Harbor in preference to Singapore. I can also
understand, without necessarily accepting it, the argument of those
critics who contend that a fortified base at Singapore is a waste of money
in these days of submarines and aircraft. But I cannot work up any
sympathy with "moral gestures," and am out of touch with people who
appear afraid of what Japan or America may say about Singapore. The
Prime Minister said recently in fine words: “Our duty is to lead the
world, and not to follow anybody." If we apply that test to Singapore,
we shall do what our responsibility imposes upon us, and not wait for the
approval of the powers. The best men in every country know quite well
what our motives are, and those are the only men who really matter.
It is instructive to contrast the positions of Canada and the Australasian
Dominions in the Pacific. Canada is the go-between between the United
States and ourselves. She has so much in common with the United States
that she will frequently appreciate their point of view when it is obscure
to us; at the same time she has a national consciousness strong enough
to remind the United States that they are only one half of the North
American Continent. We cannot be too often reminded of the standing
wonder of that undefended frontier of 3,000 miles between Canada and
the United States. I know nothing like it in Europe,
Australia and New Zealand, not being in contact with another Power,
have a difficult character from that of Canada. In spite of their distance
from us, away at the Antipodes, they are in closer sympathy with the
Mother Country, and in their relation to the problem of the Pacific they
look solely to themselves and the Home country, having no powerful
neighbor to think about. The Singapore question, which is vital to
Australia and New Zealand, does not affect Canada in the same way.
Australia and New Zealand depend more on us than Canada does; and if
all three feel anxiety about competition from Asiatics, Australia, and New
Zealand look to us for protection, whereas Canada derives a great deal of
security from the fact that any menace to her is a menace also to the
United States, which they will help her to repel. For that reason Singa-


  p. 1559 (#477)                      #

19251
1559
Professional Notes
pore is of vital consequence to the Australasian Dominions; it is the first
link in the chain that binds them to London.
I would not feel justified in attempting to discuss the situation in the
Pacific from the point of view of naval stragety. I am to some extent
afraid of the frown of authority, but still more afraid of the ridicule of
critics who know more about naval strategy than I do. I notice that each
of the three strongest powers in the Pacific says one of the others is doing
something she should not do under the Washington Agreement; some-
times it relates to gun elevation, sometimes to naval maneuvers, or to
fortresses, or vessels other than capital ships. It is too much to expect
anyone to trust anyone else in those distant waters. Japan learnt a
bitter lesson in 1895, when Russia, Germany, and France squeezed her
out of the Liao Tung Peninsula on an unctuous pretext, only for Russia
to step into her place three years later and seize the very territory she
had said it would be wrong for Japan to occupy. The dubious action of
Japan in presenting her Twenty-one Demands to China in 1915 may have
been the natural outcome of the treachery she had experienced twenty
years later. The British Empire will remain predominant in the Pacific,
as it ought to be, if it is entirely open handed in its dealings with friends
and rivals alike.
This study of the problems of the Pacific has led me to two conclusions,
among others :
(1) That many of the dealings of the western powers with China
cannot be defended on any principle except that Might is Right. Might
need not necessarily mean any form of oppression or cruelty. It can go
with courtesy, chivalry, mercy, justice, and kindliness. It can be used to
make men happier, healthier, and in every way better. But from the
time when Europeans first appeared in the Pacific until today, the Chinese
and Japanese have never wanted them; and if we have any right to be
there, it is might only that gives us that right. It would be foolish to
suggest that we should evacuate China merely because China does not
want us, but perhaps some day China will put her house in order, and be
in a position to compel us to treat her in the same way that we treat Japan,
France, or any other power with which we have dealings.
(2) My second conclusion arises out of that possibility: it is, that the
line upon which we of the British Empire should go in the future should be
not only to allow China, but even to assist her, to develop her power. We
must never admit the idea Japan expressed in 1914 when she said she
could not tolerate the awakening of some 400 million Chinese which would
follow if China went into the war on the side of the Allies. A man who
begins by being afraid of his rival is already half beaten. The British
Empire has no occasion to be afraid of any other power, least of all of
China, because as I have pointed out more than once, the Chinese have
never, since the dawn of their history, been an aggressive race. To those
who are still afraid of a "yellow peril," I would commend the reading of
a small book called “The Awakening of Japan," by Okakura Kakuzo,
published in 1905. He says there:
"Not once during the whole of their history do we find the native dynasties
of China and India coming into collision with one another. The only oc-
casion on which China ever menaced Japan was in the 12th century, when
her own Mongol conquerors tried to impose their authority upon us." (203).
Recent events in China may give the impression that a military spirit
is becoming prevalent there, and that the present system of Tuchuns, all
at loggerheads with one another, reducing the government of the country
to a state of chaos, may be followed some day by the rise of a super-
Tuchun, another Yuan Shi Kai, who would first consolidate his own power,


  p. 1560 (#478)                      #

1560
(Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
and then direct it against us Europeans. It is conceivable if we imagine
such a man merely asserting the sovereignty, independence, territorial and
administrative integrity of China. It is not conceivable if we imagine
any active designs against us; any threat to our Dominions and Possessions
in the Pacific. It is conceivable that the young people of to-day may live
to see China an independent State in the same sense that Japan is, having
done away with extra-territoriality, and compelled us to deal with her as
an equal, not an inferior Power. But from that to becoming an active
menace to other nations is a far cry. It is not necessary for us to trouble
ourselves about the possibility for the present.
I can, however, see no limits to the expansion of the Chinese if, after
assimilating our knowledge of science and hygiene, they increase and
multiply even more rapidly than at present. It is appalling to think that
if they multiply even at the same rate as we do—and our rate of increase
is not very rapid-they must have added 60,000,000 to their popualtion
since I was in China as a subaltern! 60,000,000! and the whole population
of the United Kingdom is only about 43,000,000! A force like this is,
as I said before, something elemental which it passes the wit of man to
cope with. Nature alone can cope with it. She has hitherto kept down
that immense population by various means-partly by an extra strenuous
application of the law of survival of the fittest, in various forms of
plague, pestilence, and famine; partly by visitations like the Taiping Re-
bellion, which is said to have cost 15,000,000 lives; partly by physical
agencies like the Yangtze shifting it course from one bed to another and
drowning people like swarms of insects. In what way she will deal with the
problems of a new China which has adopted Western scientific methods
and engineering we cannot attempt to foretell.
In the present consideration of every problem that arises, we have
one question to ask ourselves: What is the best line to take for the welfare
of the Empire?-remembering always that it is our duty to lead the
world, and not to follow anybody. If there were any way of obtaining the
opinion of the Chinese and Japanese as a whole, it would be seen that we
stand higher in their regard than any other Power. I am inclined to agree
with the author of that excellent new work-Western Civilization and
the Far East, Lieutenant Commander Stephen King Hall, R.N.—that the
reason for this is that in our dealings with them we have never made
professions of idealism, which they do not understand, but have gone on
straightforward business lines, which they can grasp. We have, too, the
initial advantage of standing high in the regard of all Asiatic races. They
naturally do not like us, partly because they do not go in for altruism
and universal love, but still more because it would be too much to expect
anyone to like strangers who come in at the gate unbidden and refuse to
go away again. Without liking us, however, they respect us, and if we
remain the strong and straightforward people we have been, they will
continue to respect us.
If we keep before us the idea of a strong and united empire, we
shall avoid mistakes that others have made. I have already alluded to a
Japanese idea on the outbreak of the Great War, that if China were allowed
to come in on the side of the Allies, it would lead to an awakening of her
400 million people, and would be a menace to Japan. That is an unworthy
notion. Japan can never lead the Asiatic races, as she aspires to do, if
she is afraid of them and keeps them in bondage, and they will not
be worth leading. The Japanese make a mistake in supressing, or trying
to suppress, the Chinese. If they had been more large-minded, they could
by this time have bound the Chinese to them by bonds of gratitude, and
made themselves all-powerful in the Western Pacific.


  p. 1561 (#479)                      #

1925]
1561
Professional Notes
If we keep to our Imperial ideals, we shall also avoid the mistake
certain Americans are making in exasperating the Japanese by their im-
migration laws. I have never seen any reason given for supposing that
the “Gentlemen's Agreement" of 1908, by which Japan herself undertook
to restrict her immigration into the United States, was not sufficient. So
far as an outsider can see, it would appear that extremist opinion has
prevailed over more moderate counsels, and that something has been done
that was uncalled for. The Japanese will not forget it; no self-respecting
nation would. I am afraid there has been a lack of generosity on the side
of the Americans of late, and I devoutly hope my own countrymen will
take note of it, and banish every thought of jealousy and fear from their
minds.
It appears to me to be inevitable that a conflict should occur some day
in the Pacific, hut it may not take the obvious form of a fight between two
nations like Japan and the United States. The leaders of Japan are too
shrewd to take on such a colossal fight with their present resources, and
the United States are not likely to initiate such a war. It is more likely
to be a struggle between East and West; between two civilizations, Oriental
and Occidental; between their idea of Contentment and our idea of Progress.
A struggle of that kind is not to be settled by war. We have the example
of the last war to prove that: It has settled nothing. The conflict between
France and Germany is as bitter as ever; so is the so-called conflict between
Capital and Labor; while a new form of plague has arisen, Bolshevism,
the final effect of which no man can foretell.
When this huge conflict in the Pacific does come, it will take a course
as unexpected as that of the Great War, and produce still more frightful
results. But we cannot prevent it by saying "Oh! how dreadful.” We
shall do better to admit that it will come, and shape our policy accordingly.
In my humble opinion, the best preparation we can make is, by every
word, thought, and act, to help to consolidate the British Empire; above
all, to have things in good order here, in the United Kingdom, because
the empire will always depend on the Mother Country, and our destinies
in the Pacific will be unrolled here, in London. This in our interests,
but also in the interests of others. The development of China; the
future progress of Japan, the revival of Russia in the Far East; the
racial and economic problems of the United States on their Pacific sea-
board; the security of Australia and New Zealand-all these will be
affected, for better or for worse, by the condition of the British Empire
as a whole. The destinies of the Pacific, which are the destinies of half
the globe, depend more than we realize on this little island of ours, whose
sons
"are neither children nor gods, but men in a world of men.”
CURRENT NAVAL AND PROFESSIONAL PAPERS
“The Nations Organization for War," by Major Osvaldi Natalini, Italian
Army, in U. S. Infantry Journal, June.
“Coast Artillery Shooting." Coast Artillery Journal, May and June.
“The Passing of Old Ironsides." Scientific American, July.
“Gas Turbines.” Engineering, June 12.
“Maritime Power and Continental Alliance.” Journal of the Royal
United Service Institution, May.
“Old and New Theories in Gun Erosion.” Army Ordnance, May-June.
“The Naval Side of British History," by Geoffrey Callender. Little,
Brown and Company, Boston, 1925.


  p. 1562 (#480)                      #

1562
(Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
The Naval History of the World War, (Book), by Captain Thomas
G. Frothingham, U. S. R., Harvard University Press (2 vols., $3.75 each).
The Roots and Causes of the Wars, (1914-18), (Book), by John S.
Ewart, Doran (2 vols., $12.50).
Fought for Annapolis, (Book), by Fitzhugh Green, Appleton, 1925, $1.75.
Contents of the Transactions of the Society of
Naval Architects and Marine Engineers, Vol. 32, 1924.
"Aeronautics in Naval Architecture," by Commander J. C. Hunsaker.
"Hydraulic Seagoing Hopper Dredges," by Captain W. D. Styer.
"Self-unloading Bulk Cargo Vessels of the Great Lakes," by Penton and
Sadler.
"Comparison of Model Propeller Experiments in Three Nations,” by
Rear Admiral D. W. Taylor.
"The Extent of Cavitation in U. S. Scouts and Destroyers,” by Captain
E. F. Eggert.
"Wake and Thrust Deduction of Self-Propelled Single-Screw Models,"
by Professor E. M. Bragg.
“Application of Fuel Conservation and Engineering Performance Stand-
ards to Shipping Board Vessels, by C. J. Jefferson.
"Design and Construction of Refrigerated Ships," by L. Williams.
"Scrapping Warships,” by Commander Rossell.
"Trials and Operation of the Motor Ship Cubore," by A. B. Homer.
"Problems in Connection with Conversion of the Hog Island Steamer
Seekonk to a Motor Ship," by J. C. Shaw.
"A Diesel Electric Tug," by F. L. DuBosque.
“Address” (at the banquet), by Admiral Plunkett.


  p. 1563 (#481)                      #

NOTES ON INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS
FROM 7 JUNE TO 7 JULY
PREPARED BY
PROFESSOR ALIAN WESTCOTT, U. S. Naval ACADEMY
EUROPEAN SECURITY NEGOTIATIONS
FRENCH NOTE TO GERMANY.—The course of negotiations between Great
Britain, France, and Germany for a mutual security agreement, affecting
especially the Rhine frontier, was made clear on June 18 by full publication
ini m vermany Tomar mutual security a teement, ater
of the German proposal for a Rhine compact made last February, the
British and French correspondence preliminary to a reply, and finally
the French note to Germany delivered on June 16 with the full approval
of the British Foreign Office.
In brief the British attitude, as indicated in the correspondence, was
that Great Britain in the interests of European peace was willing to give
up her policy of isolation, and pledge herself to the use of force in
guarantee of the Rhine frontier. But while Great Britain looked with
favor upon the establishment of arbitration treaties between France and
Germany or with other European powers she was not prepared to guarantee
them by force. In other words, Great Britain would guarantee only the
Rhine frontier.
The French reply to Germany on June 16 was cautious but generally
conciliatory and favorable. It accepted the idea of a compact guaranteeing
the Rhine boundary, and also an agreement to arbitrate all issues between
France and Germany, subject, however, to certain conditions. These in-
cluded: (1) Germany's entrance into the League of Nations; (2) Ger-
many's full acceptance of all the provisions of the Versailles Treaty, and
also her acceptance of other treaties resulting from the war; (3) inclusion
of Belgium; (4) negotiation of arbitration treaties between Germany and
her other neighbors. The note in conclusion stated that France would be
glad to see the United States associated "in this work of general peace and
security.”
FRENCH PRESS FAVORABLE (From New York Times of June 20).–Paris,
June 19.-The French press almost unanimously agrees the compact offered
to Germany in response to the Reich's proposals of February 9 is as complete
a guarantee of European peace as could possibly be realized under present
conditions. Obviously the weak point from the French view is the refusal
of England to bind herself to intervention on the east front as she does
on the Rhine front, but even this difficulty is believed to be solved in Great


  p. 1564 (#482)                      #

1564
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
[Aug.
Britain's agreement to fulfill all obligations that may be imposed upon her
by membership in the League of Nations should the League establish a
case of aggression against the territories of France's allies in Eastern
Europe.
In fact, for the French the most important document published in con-
nection with the note itself is that concerning the liberty of France to
occupy the Rhine zone in event of an act of aggression by Germany against
any of her eastern allies. It is generally conceded the note itself is not
any too clear on the subject. Foreign Minister Briand, in order not to
offend German pride, evidently had to glide over this aspect of the situation
gently and diplomatically, but the French insist the stipulation is unquestion-
ably there by reason of Austen Chamberlain's letter of June 9, in which the
British Premier agrees the Rhine compact must in no way prevent France
"from exercising any action conforming with the guarantees which she shall
have been accorded under arbitration treaties between Germany and her
neighbors."
One viewpoint which deviates from the general tone of optimism in the
French press is that of Pertinax in the Echo de Paris, who declares the
success of the Briand-Chamberlain compact is theoretical rather than real.
“The pact is essentially bilateral, as noted in the speech of Mr. Chamber-
lain on March 24 and the recent speech of Mr. Baldwin," he says. “Between
France and Germany the pact establishes British arbitration. If we ever
want to cross the Rhine, this arbitration, determined by British interests and
conceptions at the moment, will become for us a powerful obstacle."
In the main, however, the French press agrees the compact will con-
stitute full protection of French interests if Germany becomes a member
of the League of Nations and thereby binds herself to decisions of the
League. The compact conforming sufficiently to German proposals of
February 9, the French do not see how Germany can avoid acceptance.
In this discussion of the security compact considerable regret is being
expressed that it must go into effect without the adherence of the United
States. General Taufleib, examining this aspect of the situation in the
Information, lays stress on the advantages to the United States from
participation should trouble arise in the Far East.
"Ever since participation of the United States in regulating the problem
of reparations through application of the Dawes plan," says General
Tauflieb, "the United States, in fact, has adopted a course of action which
logically should result in adhesion to a pact guaranteeing the security of
the principal European nations. Would not such an accord help to solve
the question of disarmament which our American friends hold so much to
heart? In attaching its signature to a pact of this kind the American
Government would give it force and authority such as would make the
pact an irresistible instrument of peace. I know the reluctance of our
American friends to become involved in new European quarrels. But let
them turn their eyes to the clouds menacing from the direction of the Pacific
and Asia. Are not events developing between Moscow and Peking which
are likely to change the scene of international preoccupations? The struggle
of tomorrow in all likelihood will find Asiatic peoples encouraged by Com-
munist propaganda and supported by Japan on one side and the United
States on the other, assisted by European powers in an effort to defend
the present social state. In this struggle the United States will feel the
necessity of having behind it the support of Europe, united, strong and
fully prepared to concentrate itself to its cause."
BRITISH Press COMMENT (From Living Age of June 13).-The Outlook
(London) is not hopeful that France and Great Britain will be able to agree
upon a security pact under any circumstances, and whatever hope it


  p. 1565 (#483)                      #

1925]
1565
Notes on International Affairs
cherished in this direction has been dashed by the uncompromising attitude
manifested by the Little Entente at the Bucharest Conference last month.
Britain will never consent to go to war to maintain the present frontiers in
Eastern Europe, while France can hardly permit a change in these frontiers.
France, then, must choose between the sea power of Britain and the
land power of Central Europe, and is, of course, free to avail herself of
that arm which she thinks will benefit her most. No British statesman and
no British journalist would presume to guide her choice. But one word of
caution may be uttered. Before 1914 she combined an entente with Britain
with an alliance with Russia. That combination cannot be repeated because
there is no German fleet a-building nowadays. She can have her pact in the
West or her pact in the East; but not both.
Sisley Huddleston says in the New Statesman that France cannot sur-
render her present system of alliances for any kind of general pact without
discussion, and then only subject to the following conditions:
(1) The unconditional entry of Germany into the League of Nations
before the pact comes into force. Those who derive amusement from the
inconsistencies of diplomacy will appreciate the irony which is to be found
in France's insistence on Germany's admission into the League from which
she was anxious not long ago to exclude her former enemy.
(2) The strict observance of all the Articles of the Versailles Treaty,
particularly in respect of Germany's disarmament and the demilitarization
of Rhineland.
(3 The consolidation of the territorial status quo for the German
frontiers in the East as in the West.
(4) The inclusion of England as a party to such a pact, with all that
such inclusion implies in the shape of direct action against the one country
which France fears may denounce any of its clauses.
The Little Entente is alarmed not only by Germany's reservations in
her proposal for a security pact, which imply an eventual readjustment of
her eastern frontiers at the expense particularly of Poland, but also by the
rumor that she may use this reservation to trade upon in securing a union
with Austria. It is the latter possibility that has alarmed Czecho-Slovakia,
which is not directly threatened by Germany's other frontier claims. As a
correspondent in the Nation and the Athenaum says:
Such a union would be the first and least contestable change which
Germany could claim on her eastern frontier, for it is indeed hard to see
by what principle of nationality, self-determination, or international comity
German-Austria is refused the right to decide her own fate by a free
plebiscite, and, if she desires, to put an end to the miserable, unnatural
existence she has been forced to lead for these last six and a half years.
This, however, the Czechs are determined to prevent. “The deadly blows
to us," said Dr. Benes once, "have always come from the South; but
Vienna can never deliver them unless she has the strength of Germany
behind her.”
Allies TO EVACUATE RUHR (From New York Times of June 24).--
Paris, June 23.-The Council of Ministers today approved the plans of
Premier Painlevé and Foreign Minister Briand for fulfillment of the promise
given in London by Premier Herriot to evacuate the Ruhr region a year
after the Dawes plan became effective-August 15.
The retirement of the troops, according to the Cabinet's plans, will begin
at an early date, however, and it is expected that the anniversary of the
Dawes plan will see the departure of the last French and Belgian detach-
ments.
. This is another indication of the new order of things in France and
shows the firm intention of the French Government to place the fullest


  p. 1566 (#484)                      #

1566
(Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
reliance on the Dawes plan for reparations and on the League of Nations.
It is also assumed that France is confident an agreement with Germany for
the protection of the Rhine front will be effected and that the four or five
conversations in Paris and Berlin between the governments and ambassadors
of the two countries which have taken place since Tuesday of last week
when the French reply to the German offer of a compact delivered to Berlin
are considered as indications that Germany is fairly satisfied with the terms
the French offered.
DEBT NEGOTIATIONS
GREAT BRITAIN Asks SETTLEMENT.—It was announced on July 1 that
the British Government had sent a memorandum to France and all other
nations in debt to Great Britain suggesting that a date be set for opening
negotiations for settlement. The note, while couched in friendly terms,
laid down the principle that Great Britain's debts were entitled to the same
treatment accorded those of other powers.
ITALY AND UNITED STATES OPEN PARLEY.—During the last week in July
preliminary conferences were held in Washington between Treasury
officials and the Italian Ambassador over a settlement of the Italian debt
to the United States. This amounts to about $2,138,500,000, of which about
$500,000,000 represents accrued interest. Ambassador di Martino was ac-
companied by Mario Alberti, of the Credito-Italiano, as financial representa-
tive of the Italian Government. Further negotiations were postponed until
August, during which interval Mr. Alberti went to Italy to collect needed
data.
ARMS TRAFFIC AGREEMENT.-After forty-one days in session the Arms
Traffic Conference ended on June 17. The convention adopted was reported
to be entirely satisfactory to the American delegation. It was signed by
nineteen of the forty-four nations taking part, and becomes valid for each
nation upon formal ratification. On the last day protocols were added out-
lawing the use of poison gas and bacteria in warfare.
The anti-gas protocol closely adheres to the Washington five-power con-
vention. It declares that as the use in war of asphyxiating gas has been
justly condemned by the civilized world, the signatories to the protocol
agree to prohibit its employment or the use of bacteria in warfare.
The arms traffic convention purposes permitting international knowledge
of all movements of arms and war materials from one country to another
by a system of licenses and certificates and a requirement for publicity of
transfers of such arms and materials. Elaborate classifications of various
forms of arms and munitions are made. In some cases licenses or certificates
are required for exports and in other cases publicity of the exports must be
made.
FRANCE
THE WAR IN MOROCCO.—During June the military situation in Morocco
developed few changes. The Riffian offensives, although they inflicted
slight material losses, seriously injured French prestige in Morocco and
spread disaffection among the tribes under French authority. On the other
hand, the defensive policy employed by the French gave no promise of an


  p. 1567 (#485)                      #

1925]
1567
Notes on International Affairs
early end of hostilities, while the adoption of aggressive measures was made
difficult not only by complications with Spain but by the firm opposition of
the Socialist party in France. Premier Painlevé visited Fez and the
Moroccan front in the middle of June.
Conferences at Madrid between French and Spanish commissioners to
agree upon a joint policy in Morocco continued through June and promised
to extend through July. Agreement was reached upon a plan for a co-
operative blockade of the Mediterranean coast of Morocco by French and
Spanish warships to prevent smuggling of munitions to the warring tribes-
men. Although kept informed daily regarding the negotiations, and es-
pecially concerned in any agreement affecting Tangier, Great Britain did
110t take active part in the Madrid Conferences.
According to Spanish reports, the peace terms demanded by Abd-el-Krim,
leader of the Riff tribesmen, included cession of the whole Wergha valley
and recognition of the complete independence of the "Riff Free State."
CAILLAUX FINANCE MEASURES.—On June 26 Finance Minister Caillaux
introduced in the French Chamber his measures designed to relieve the
difficulties of the French Treasury and make a beginning of the con-
solidation of the floating debt. His proposals included a temporary limited
increase in circulation of 6,000,000,000 francs to meet immediate calls on
the Treasury, and a new issue of bonds at an interest lower than that on
old bonds, but with the inducement that the bonds will be paid at the gold
rate.
UNITED STATES AND LATIN AMERICA
WARNING TO MEXICO.-After conferences with James R. Sheffield.
American Ambassador to Mexico, Secretary of State Kellogg on June 12
made a public statement in which he announced that relations with Mexico
were not entirely satisfactory, that the United States Government expected
Mexico to restore properties illegally taken and to indemnify American
citizens, and that the Calles Government could have the support of the
United States only so long as it protected American lives and rights and
fulfilled its international obligations.
President Calles gave to the press a reply on June 14 declaring that
Mexico was duly carrying out her international obligations, and resenting
what he referred to as the "threat to the sovereignty of Mexico" in Mr.
Kellogg's statement. It was announced on June 24 that Ambassador
Sheffield would return to Mexico with a note specifying the complaints
of the United States over the treatment of American nationals.
NEAR EAST
REVOLUTION IN GREECE.—-On June 25, by a coup d'état without bloodshed,
General Pangalos, head of the Greek army, overthrew the Michalakopoulos
Cabinet and took over the government. Admiral Konduriotis remained
president, and General Pangalos became head of the new ministry. General
Pangalos is an ambitious soldier and strong nationalist.


  p. 1568 (#486)                      #

1568
[Aug.
U. S. Naval Institute Proceedings
CHINA
Anti-FOREIGN DISTURBANCES.—Anti-foreign feeling in China came to a
head at Shanghai during the first week in June as a result of a strike in a
Japanese cotton mill, which quickly spread to other factories, and was
encouraged by students and radical political agitators. A general strike
was proclaimed. The movement spread to other cities and threatened to
develop into a nation-wide uprising against foreigners. On June 16 W. W.
Mackenzie, a British engineer, was shot and killed near Shanghai, and on
the following day a British motorcycle policeman of the foreign concession
was mobbed and seriously injured.
At Canton the situation was complicated by warfare between two factions
of the former followers of Sun Yat Sen, the conservative group, the
Yunnanese, being finally driven out of the city by the radical faction. On
June 23 it was reported that British and French machine guns had been
used against Chinese demonstrators who threatened the foreign concession,
and on the following day a French merchant was killed and several
foreigners injured.
Both the French and the British Governments lodged protests against
the killing of their citizens, and strong notes were presented to the Chinese
Government by the diplomatic corps at Peking.
On July 1, when the situation in China had apparently become quieter,
it was announced at Washington that the American State Department was
considering with other powers the advisability of holding in the near future
an international conference on Chinese problems, to consider especially the
surrender of extra-territorial privileges and to permit China to raise the
customs rates on foreign goods. According to the terms of the Nine Power
Treaty negotiated in Washington in 1921, a customs conference to permit
increased duties must be held in China within three months after all nations
had ratified the treaty.
RATIFICATION OF CHINESE TREATIES.—On July 1 Foreign Minister Briand
before a committee of the French Chamber strongly urged immediate
ratification by France of the pending treaties relating to China. Up to
this time France was the only nation that had withheld ratification, with
the motive, apparently, of forcing the Chinese Government to full payment
in gold francs of the French share of the Boxer indemnity. According
to press reports, however, this indebtedness had been settled by an arrange-
ment between the French and Chinese Governments by which China agreed
to a loan-equivalent to a subsidy on account of the low interest-to the
bankrupt French Banque Industrielle de Chine. Complete ratification of the
Chinese treaties would be followed by a customs conference pledged to
grant China an increase of the Chinese tariff rates from 772 per cent to 122
per cent, thus providing the Chinese Government with essential revenues.


  p. 1568 (#487)                      #

SPECIAL NOTICE
Naval INSTITUTE Prize Essay, 1926
A prize of two hundred dollars with a gold medal, and a life member-
ship in the Institute (unless the author is already a life member, in which
case he will receive the commuted value thereof), is offered by the Naval
Institute for the best essay submitted on any subject pertaining to the naval
profession.
The following rules will govern this competition :
1. The award of the prize to be made by the Board of Control, voting
by ballot and without knowledge of the names of the competitors.
2. Each competitor to send his essay to the Secretary-Treasurer
in a sealed envelope marked "Prize Essay Contest.” The name of the
writer shall not appear on the essay, but instead thereof a motto. Accom-
panying the essay a separate sealed envelope will be sent to the Secretary-
Treasurer, with the motto on the outside and the writer's name and
motto inside. This envelope will not be opened until after the decision of
the board. Essays must be received on or before January 1, 1926.
3. In addition to the “Naval Institute Prize," one or more essays may
receive “Honorable Mention,” if of sufficient merit to justify that award;
or, in the event that no essay is adjudged of sufficient merit to receive the
“Prize," the best essay submitted may receive "Honorable Mention" in
lieu thereof.
4. In case one or more essays receive “Honorable Mention" the writers
thereof will each receive a prize, the amount of such awards to be de-
cided by the Board of Control in each case.
5. Announcement of awards will be made as soon as practicable after
January 1, 1926.
6. Essays awarded the "Naval Institute Prize" or "Honorable Men-
tion" will be published in the NAVAL INSTITUTE PROCEEDINGS as soon as
practicable. Essays not awarded a prize may be published at the discretion
of the Board of Control, and the writers of such articles shall be com-
pensated at the established rate for articles not submitted in competition.
7. Articles should be limited to twenty (20) printed pages in the Pro-
CEEDINGS (approximately 8,000 words), but shorter articles will receive
equal consideration.
8. In the event of the prize being awarded to the winner of a previous
year, a gold clasp suitably engraved will be given in lieu of the medal.
9. All essays must be typewritten, and submitted in duplicate.
H. A. BALDRIDGE,
Captain, U.S.N., Secretary-Treasurer.


  p. 1568 (#488)                      #

1925]
1571
Secretary's Notes
Address of
In the past, many errors have resulted from the
habit of changing an officer's address as soon
Members
as his transfer orders are published in the papers.
No change will be made in the future except upon receipt of
notification by the member concerned. Reliance upon the former
method may, in extreme cases, mean a delay of almost four
months. To insure the prompt delivery of the PROCEEDINGS and
other communications from the U. S. Naval Institute, it is essen-
tial that members and subscribers notify the Secretary-Treasurer
without delay of every change of address. No responsibility can
be accepted for failure to receive the PROCEEDINGS, where mem-
bers fail to comply with this rule. Changes of address should
reach the Institute by the 23rd of the month, to be effective for the
issue of the PROCEEDINGS of the following month.
The Naval Institute is desirous of obtaining sev-
Wanted:
eral copies of Luce's Seamanship (any edition),
Luce's
and would appreciate it if anyone having same
Seamanship
would communicate with the Secretary-Treas-
urer, stating edition, condition, and price desired.
H. A. BALDRIDGE,
Captain, U. S. Navy, Secretary-Treasurer.


  p. 1568 (#489)                      #

BOOK REVIEW
THE TESTING OF HIGH SPEED INTERNAL COM-
BUSTION ENGINES. By Arthur W. Judge. D. Van
Nostrand Company, New York. $7.50 net.
The use of the internal combustion engine today is so universal, and it
has become so intimately associated with our daily lives that most of us
accept its development as a matter of course.
The high standard of efficiency and reliability of the modern internal
combustion engine is in a large measure due to the time and labor spent
in research and test work in the laboratory and on the apparatus of which
the internal combustion engine is the prime mover.
Much time and labor can be saved, and the value of tests and researches
increased if one can use in part the experience of previous investigators.
The author of this volume, due to his vast and varied experience, is
eminently fitted to guide and advise investigators in this kind of work.
The book is intended primarily for internal combustion engineers, manu-
facturers, motor engineers, test and laboratory assistants, students and
others who have to deal with engine tests. Much of the subject matter is of
a fairly elementary nature. For the advanced worker and research en-
gineer a general survey of the subject is given, copiously supplemented with
footnote references to original papers and results, and also with a bibli-
ography.
There are twelve chapters, a bibliography and four appendices as follows:
Chapter I, General Principles ; Chapter II, Test Procedure; Chapter III,
Fuel Tests and Exhaust Gas Analysis ; Chapter IV, Measurement of Air
Supply; Chapter V, Water Supply and Heat Measurements; Chapter VI,
Measurement of Brake Horse Power; Chapter VII, Pressure Measure-
ments; Chapter VIII, Indicator Diagrams: Chapter IX, Temperature
Measurements ; Chapter X, Automobile Testing; Chapter XI, Aircraft
Tests; Chapter XII, The Analysis of High Frequency Movements;
Appendix I, Formulae Used in Test Calculations; Appendix II, S. A. E.
Testing Forms; Appendix III, Air Ministry Schedule of Standard Type
and Production Tests for Aircraft Engines; Appendix IV, The Calculation
of the Quantity of Air which Passes through a Throttle Plate.
The various subjects are well presented in a book of 384 pages, pro-
fusely illustrated with excellent cuts and diagrams.
G. B.


  p. 1568 (#490)                      #

SECRETARY'S NOTES
The Institute desires articles of interest to all branches
Articles of the service, including the reserve force. Non-
members as well as members may submit articles, and
authors receive due compensation for articles published. Com-
pact, well digested articles are more likely to be accepted for
early publication. In accepting articles for publication, the In-
stitute reserves the right to have such articles revised or rearranged,
where necessary, in order to bring them up to the required stand-
ard of articles published in the PROCEEDINGS—the cost, if any, to
be deducted from the compensation due the author.
Contributors are requested to observe the following special in-
structions in preparing articles for the PROCEEDINGS:
(a) In writing names of ships put only the initial letters in
capitals and underscore the names. The underscoring sig.
nifies to the printer that the word is to be in italics. The
same applies to names of publications. Foreign words not
anglicized should also be italicized.
(b) In preparing tables and computations employing fractions,
sub-numbers, etc., do by hand that part which cannot be
made perfectly clear by the typewriter.
(c) In typing the script use double space between lines.
(d) When a quotation is included in an article the editor should
be assured by appropriate notation that the writer has care-
fully verified the quotation as presented,
Discussion of articles published in the PROCEED-
Discussions Ings is cordially invited. Discussions accepted
for publication are paid for at approximately
one-half the rate for original articles.
Book
Reviews
As soon as practicable after the publication of books
on subjects of professional interest, the Institute
aims to publish authoritative reviews of them.


  p. 1568 (#491)                      #

United States
rary
Naval Institute
Proceedings
| VOL. 51
SEPTEMBER, 1925
NO. 271


INS
40
VAL
NA
STI
NAVAL
ACADEMY
U.S.
TUTA
ODENS
1873
SCIENTIA
CONTENTS
Excellence of Naval Material.-Craven
Aviation at the Naval Academy.–Baldridge .
Naval Aviation Training.-Raby. .
Aviation in Coast Defense.—Johnson
Star Identification Diagram.—Burkhead and Benson .
The Bridge Across the Atlantic. Stirling . .
The Nation in Arms and National Doctrine.-Scammell
Possible Improvements in Our Gunnery Training.-Blandy
The Panama Canal's Biggest Ship.-Hinds
Graphical Aids to Navigation.—Mason . . . . .
A Home-made Planisphere.-Wood . . .
A Mooring Board Problem.-Gatch . .
Retardation of Ships' Speed Due to Turning.-Me
Discussion . . . . . . . .
Professional Notes :
Notes on International Affairs .
Book Reviews :
Secretary's Notes .
. . .
1573
1632
1646
1652
1667
1669
1684
1696
1703
1707
1710
1716
1719
1723
1753
1799
1806
1815
.


  p. 1568 (#492)                      #

It Was The Idea Of Progress That
Brought The Naval Institute
Into Being
Columbus was a dreamer—but behind his dreams there was a
definite practical purpose. The wealth of Cathay, the spices and
perfumes of the East Indies were at the feet of the man to dis-
cover a new route to those lands. Intense study and a logical
process of reasoning had convinced Columbus that this planet upon
which we live is round. His was a mind years in advance of his
times. It was difficult to convince men of the soundness of his
project and the means for the accomplishment of his dream were
impossible to obtain for a long period. But, it was his idea which
gave this man the unbounded courage and untiring perseverance
to accomplish a quest even greater than that which he had
anticipated.
It was this idea of seeing beyond the times that led to the
organization of the Naval Institute. In the Navy, perhaps, more
than in any other profession, men with vision and far-sightedness
are needed. It is only by study, exchange of ideas, and an ability
to impart our ideas to others that any progress is made. For this
reason the Naval Institute has, through the publication of its
PROCEEDINGS, always encouraged officers to think along naval lines
and helped them to present their ideas to the Navy in a suitable
form. Articles in the PROCEEDINGS have been forerunners of
many of the great improvements in our Navy. But Progress
demands that we never stand still. The Naval Institute dreams
of greater advancement in years to come.
To accomplish the maximum amount of good it is desired that
every officer in the Navy be a member of the Naval Institute and
a subscriber to the PROCEEDINGS. To advance with one's pro-
fession one must keep acquainted with every move in that pro-
fession. The Naval Institute offers to officers of the Navy the
simplest method of doing this. The annual membership dues are
$3.00 (including subscription to the PROCEEDINGS). A check
payable to the Secretary of the Naval Institute, Annapolis, Mary-
land, will bring immediate attention.
The above was written by Midshipman (now Ensign) Harry Wagner of
the class of 1925, U.S.N.A., who won first prize for the most acceptable
advertisement for the Naval Institute to appear in the 1925 Lucky Bag.
The Lucky Bag staff, ineligible in the contest, determined the prize winner.